FLEETWOOD,
OR
THE STAIN OF BIRTH.
A NOVEL OF AMERICAN LIFE.
BY THE AUTHOR
OF PHILIP IN SEARCH OF A WIFE, &C. &C.
CHAPTER I.
There is a busy motion in the Heaven;
The wind doth chase the flag upon the tower;
Fast sweep the cloudsthe sickle of the moon,
Struggling, darts snatches of uncertain light.
No form of star is visible.
Schiller
.
Midnight
brought with it no abatement of the
violence of the gale. During the day it had swept
in eddying gusts through the broad avenues and
narrow cross-streets of the city, carrying
desolation
and dismayprostrating chimneysscattering
the slates from the roofsand making sad havoc
with the wooden signs, which adorned the districts
devoted to traffic. One man, as he was passing up
Broadway, had been knocked on the head by the
shaft of a canvass awning, and instantly killed.
Others had been severely bruised by the flying
fragments, strewn at random by the blast.
The dwellers on the North River had been
appalled
by the lurid aspect and the rapid swelling
of that majestic stream. Its tortured waters would
writhe and convolve into huge ridges of foam, as
if a new ocean were struggling for birth beneath
the laboring surface. The adjoining piers and
abutments were soon overwhelmed by the rushing
tide. Boats and sloops and schooners of a
considerable
size were wrenched from their moorings
and driven by the unsparing gale high into the
street, side by side with the habitations of
landsmen
.
Most of the cellars near the river were
completely
inundated, and the destitute and despairing
inmates driven forth houseless.
It was indeed a night of storm and desolation
a night when those, who were comfortably
sheltered
from the loosened elements, could not omit
thanking God that they were not at that moment
sharers in the lot of the hapless child of penury on
the bare ground, or of the struggling seaman, whose
bark lay off the too adjacent coast.
The streets of the city had been deserted at an
early hour that evening by all, whom necessity did
not compel to run the risk of being made subjects
for the coroner and the penny reporters. The air
grew chiller as the night advanced, and the snow
fell in smothering profusion. The city lamps were
unlit, but, with your eyes turned from the teeth of
the blast, the
snow-light
, as it is beautifully termed
by the Germans, would disclose objects with
tolerable
distinctness.
While the gale was at its height, the door of a
house in what was then one of the most fashionable
streets of the city might have been seen to open,
and a young man to issue forth unattended. But
some one, who was holding the door ajar, called
him back before he had reached the side-walk, and
a hurried interchange of words took place.
You had better stay, Challoner. It is a dreadful
night. Come back.
No, I thank you, Winton. I shall get along
very well. Good night!
Good night then, since you insist upon going.
Winton closed the door, and returned to a parlor
elegantly furnished and comfortably warmed, where
notwithstanding the lateness of the hour, a board
liberally spread with all the delicacies of the season,
including canvass-backs and the choicest wines,
stood in the middle of the room. Folding-doors
communicated with another apartment brilliantly
lighted, where a table covered with cards and red
and white counters indicated that the party had
been engaged at faro. Four gentlemen besides
Winton, the host, sat down to the hot supper, which
now claimed their attention.
Why the deuce didn't Challoner stay? asked a
pursy, red-faced little man, who had evidently been
in luck that night.
I couldn't persuade him, although I offered him
a bed, replied Winton.
How much did he lose to-night? inquired a
young man named Brockden, who seemed to have
little appetite for the delicacies before him.
Some two thousand at least, replied Winton.
I never knew such a run of ill luck, as he has been
the victim of, the last month or two.
And yet no one would suspect from his manner
that he was a loser rather than a winner, said the
red-faced individual.
True; I never knew a man so keep his temper
and equanimity under losses. If I am not much
mistaken, he has staked his last dollar to-night and
lost it.
Indeed! said the red-faced man. Try these
ducks, Brockden. You will find them superb. His
last dollar, did you say?
As our business does not lie with the exemplary
company, to whom we have thus suddenly
introduced
our readers, we will quit them and follow
him, who was the subject of their discourse. No
sooner had the door closed upon him than he threw
his cloak over his arm, took off his hat, tore open
his vest, and stood with his face to the blast as if
its snow-laden currents were hardly strong and
chilly enough to cool the fever of his brain. His
person thus bared to the storm, he walked on
slowly like one immersed in thought.
It is allall gone! murmured he. I did not
leave myself enough even to buy a loaf of bread.
What a wretchwhat an insane wretch I have
been! And how can I now meet Emily, beggar
that I am? God of mercy! I do not know the
man in this populous city, to whom I can go
to-morrow
to borrow a five dollar bill. And then my
creditCredit! I have none. Ay, lash me, ye
keen winds! Oh! that ye might bear me like a
leaf away from these human habitations and sink
me in the wide ocean!
Challoner leaned against a lamp-post and groaned
in spirit. He suddenly started, and looked around
as if to assure himself in regard to the locality
where he found himself.
It is the very house! said he. I cannot be
mistaken. Can it be that she lives there still? And
if she doeswhat then? What then, Challoner?
Art thou indeed so degraded that thou wouldst
ask alms of herof her, the daughter of shame,
who first lured thee aside from the paths of
pleasantness
and peace? Nay; say rather it was thy
own folly and wickedness, that led thee astray.
And yet in spite of her degradation, I believe she
truly loved me onceas much surely as her fallen
nature was capable of loving anything. I have
lavished hundreds upon her. She must be rich;
for unlike her frail sisterhood, she was not a
spendthrift
.
Truly I know of no one rather than her to
whom I would apply for aid. At any rate, Augusta,
I will test your generosity!
And thus determining, this weak-minded man
proceeded to put his project into execution, and
knocked at the door. But Challoner was not so
thoroughly bad a person as his conduct would
seem to declare. He had been left, when quite a
1*
child, an orphan; and his guardian, who was an
old bachelor named Hardinge, had brought him up
in the most lax and indulgent manner. The boy
always found his pockets well filled with money,
and was early accustomed to expensive tastes and
habits, notwithstanding the property left by his
parents did not exceed ten thousand dollars.
Hardinge
himself had introduced him when hardly
eighteen years of age to a female some five years
his elder, whom we have heard him apostrophise
by the name of Augusta; and perhaps he was
often indebted to the influence she exercised over
him, that he was saved from still more destructive
pursuits.
Challoner had just entered upon his twenty-first
year, when his guardian died, and left him the
uncontrolled possessor of his patrimony, which had
been reduced about one half during his minority.
A still more important event soon afterward
occurred
.
Challoner fell in love. He dropped the
unworthy connexion, to which we have alluded,
and began to regard life more seriously. The
father of Emily Gordon was arrogant both on
account
of his wealth and his family; and he frowned
upon Challoner's pretensions. But a smile from
the maiden herself was sufficient to inspire
Challoner
with hope and resolution. He applied
himself
to the study of the law, and built grand castles
in the broad domain of the future. Three years
flew by. Mr. Gordon not only still forbade his
daughter to receive Challoner as a suitor, but
expressed
his determination that she should marry
the booby son of his old friend Norwood. The
propriety of an elopement now began to be
discussed
by the lovers at their clandestine
interviews
;
and Challoner, in an evil hour, entered into
some stock speculations with a view to making a
fortune by rapid steps. Before the result could be
known, some new act of tyranny on the part of old
Gordon rendered it easy for Emily to be persuaded
to run away with her lover, and get married.
They could not have done a more indiscreet thing.
The whole of Challoner's little fortune, with the
exception of a few hundred dollars, had melted
away. His wife's family refused to be reconciled;
and the father and brothers denounced him as an
adventurer and a pauper. His pride and
indignation
were fully roused.
Oh, that I might retaliate by riding by them
with my wife in my own coach! was his foolish
and vindictive wish. He took apartments for
himself
and wife at an expensive hotel; but his sojourn
there was not long, for his means were quite
exhausted
a few months after his marriage. He
removed to obscure lodgings; but the insane hope
still possessed him to elevate himself in his external
circumstances by some extraordinary run of good
luck, far above the contempt of his wife's relatives.
Alas! how true it is that none but the
contemptible
are apprehensive of contempt. Had he been
possessed by a true, honest pride, he would have
looked down, even in his extreme poverty, upon
those who professed to despise him. He would
have shown his superiority by his calm
indifference
to their slights. But a false and paltry
ambition
made him constantly uneasy and discontented
so long as he could not live in a splendid house,
and drive as neat a span of greys as old Gordon
himself. In his impatience to rise above want, he
resorted to the gaming table. At first his success
was extraordinary. In two months he found
himself
once more the possessor of ten thousand
dollars
.
But ten times ten thousand would not have
satisfied his ambition. He did not think it worth
while even to change his lodgings in consequence
of his good luck. He applied himself more
devotedly
than ever to gaming; but fortune was no
longer propitious. The cards were against him;
and they continued so until the evening we have
described, when he found himself stripped of his
last dollar, and stooped to solicit aid from one,
who lived on the wages of infamy and guilt.
Such was the noise of the gale, that it was nearly
an hour before he could make himself heard by the
inmates of the house. With much difficulty he
persuaded a black maid-servant, whose voice he
distinguished from an upper window, to open the
door for his admission, and then bade her carry
his name to her mistress. He walked into a
parlor
fronting on the street, where the remains of a
coal fire still shed a flickering light on the walls;
and, in a few moments, a female bearing a candle,
and clad in a wrapper of plaided silk, entered the
room. She appeared to be about thirty years old,
and in spite of the inevitable impress, which sin
ever leaves upon the female countenance, there
were abundant traces of beauty in her face and
figure. Placing the candle upon the centre-table,
she advanced towards her midnight visitor with
both hands extended to greet him, and exclaimed:
Edward! can it be you?
Yes, Augusta, he replied in a sorrowful tone.
We meet once more. I did not think ever again
to enter this house.
And why not? It is six years since we have
met. But I forget, you are married. At least so
I read in the newspapers. But bless me, Edward!
how pale you look! Your hair is covered with
snow. Are you ill? Can I do anything for
you?
Yes; sit down, and listen to my story. But
first tell me, Augusta, how has the world treated
you?
Prosperously enough. This house and
furniture
are mine; and I have an account at the bank.
My daughter will be an heiress, Edward, and I
mean she shall grace her wealth.
Indeed! I had forgotten all about little
Adelaide
.
She must be quite a young lady by this
time. Surelythat is to sayI
hope
you are
bringing her up virtuously.
Do not doubt it. She has not been in this
house since she was four years old. I have placed
her at an excellent boarding-school, and I mean
that all her mother lacks both in accomplishments
and morals, shall be hers. But I would hear
something
in regard to your own affairs. What has
happened, Edward; and why are you here?
I blush while I say it, Augustamy purpose is
to ask for a small loan.
The female started as if surprised; but
whatever
her secret motives may have been, she
replied
:
If it were only for the sake of auld lang
syne, Edward, you shall have what you want.
But pray tell me what has happened? You have
more than once profited by my advice; and
perhaps
I may help you by words as well as by
deeds.
My story is soon told, replied Challoner.
Did you ever see my wife?
About a year since she was pointed out to me
in Broadway, replied Augusta. She seemed a
mild, beautiful creature, and disposed as I was to
hate her for having robbed me of you, I could not
help feeling pity as I looked in her pale face, and
marked its patient, melancholy expression.
Ah, Augusta, she is too good for a reprobate
like me. When I think of her uncomplaining
temper
,
her attentive kindness, and her confiding
devotion
to myself, I often bitterly feel a consciousness
of my unworthiness. I married at a time when I
was little able to support a wife, and in the face
of the opposition of her whole family. The
stinging
contempt which they expressed for me roused
my whole soul. `I will show them that I can
support Emily in the position to which she has
been born,' thought I. For her sake, Augusta,
although the fact is still unknown to her, poor
thing, I became a gambler. There, you have the
whole secret of my past miseries, and my present
wants. This very evening I have lost at faro
upwards
of two thousand dollarsall the money I
possessed in the world!
Two thousand dollars! Why, Edward, you
could have lived comfortably on that for at least a
year.
Yes, wretch that I am! exclaimed he. And
when I had money in abundance, instead of
securing
for her comfortable apartments, and paying for
them, I had the baseness to remove to mean and
contracted lodgings, that I might have ample funds
with which to speculate at the gaming-table. And
Emily will soon bea mother!
Where do you reside? inquired the female.
Truly, I forget the name of the place, said he,
but I have it written down. Here it is.
He handed her a slip of paper, which she
retained
.
And how much money, she added, will serve
your purposes for to-night?
A hundred dollars will be sufficient, said he.
I will give you my promissory note for the
repayment
.
It will answer, she replied; and unlocking a
small desk, she drew a check, while Challoner
drew up the note as he had suggested.
Here, Edward, said she, handing him the
check, you have the amount you desire. Take
my advice, and provide first of all for your wife's
comfort.
I will do so, exclaimed he. Dear Augusta,
if I live, you shall not repent this act of
generosity
.
The tears stood in his eyes. Your profligates
are often marvellously tender-hearted.
And now, said the female, hasten home to
your wife. Poor creature! What must have
been her anxiety on your account this dreadful
night! Hark! The City Hall clock strikes one.
Challoner pressed her hand, bade her good night,
and quitted the house.
And how are we to explain conduct so
inconsistent
on the part of an abandoned woman? If
love were the ruling motive, why should she have
shown so much consideration for her lover's wife?
Was it pridethe pride of assisting an elegant
young man about town? Perhaps so. But then
why should not that pride have induced her to
attach him once more to herself? Why send him
home to his wife, and bid him look to her welfare?
Perhaps, after all, we do the woman injustice in
imputing to her merely interested motives. Who
shall say that it was not a pure impulse of
goodness
which prompted her? A momentary triumph
of her good angel? A transient flicker of that
original brightness, which had not yet wholly
gone out in her derogate soul?
Despising himselfhis heart torn by contending
emotionsChalloner hurried along the street in
the direction of his lodgings. The gale roared and
rattled over his head, and the fine, icy snow
whirled
,
like a shower of needles, into his face.
Poor Emily! muttered he. What a dreary
time she must have had of it, alone in those old,
ricketty apartments! But I will live to repay her
for all the privations she has endured on my
account
.
Yes; I will yet be richhonored
envied
Challoner never completed the sentence with his
lips. At that moment, as he was turning the
corner of a well-known street, a chimney was
hurled into fragments by the blast. The scattered
debris
struck him violently on the head, and felled
him to the earth. God forgive me! he groaned
forth. My poor wife! my unborn child! Help!
I cannot die! I am not fit to die! God knows I
meant to change myWhat, ho! Will no one
hear? He strove to rise; but, as he moved, the
blood poured profusely from his wounds upon the
drifted snow. With a mighty effort, he staggered
to his feet, uttered a last cry for help, fell and
expired. The storm howled on, and spread its
flaky winding-sheet over his body; and there he
was found, under the incarnadined snow, a ghastly
spectacle, by the early morning light.
CHAPTER II.
Have ye a sense, ye gales, a conscious joy
In beauty, that with such an artful touch
Ye lift her curls and float about her robes?
Milman
.
Seventeen
years after the tragical event, which
we have narrated, two young men, equipped for
a shooting excursion, were sauntering along one of
the most beautiful portions of that shore, which
forms the Connecticut side of Long Island Sound.
They carried fowling-pieces, and were apparently
in pursuit of that delicate little bird, the snipe,
which frequents the salt water sands. But either
the game was scarce, or the sportsmen were
indisposed
to make very vigilant exertions to find it.
They would occasionally stop, and picking up a
handful of the smooth flat stones, which lay in
ridges along the beach, send them skipping over
the smooth surface of the Sound; or they would
stand and watch the progress of some distant
steam-boat, as with a black streamer of smoke
issuing from her funnel-pipe, she ploughed the
tranquil
waters.
At length the wanderers reached a ledge of
rocks, which seemed to offer so tempting a
resting-place
,
that they sat down, and called to their dogs
to crouch at their feet, as if disdaining to seek a
farther acquaintance with the sky birds, who had
thus far baffled all their murderous skill.
Isn't this a bore, Fleetwood? asked the larger
of the two companions, whose full face and figure
seemed to indicate a predominance of the sensual
over the intellectual faculties. Isn't this a bore,
Fleetwood? I can't imagine how you can tarry in
this stupid place except upon compulsion. If you
were dependent as I am upon a rich, capricious old
aunt for your expectations of future affluence, and
if, as one of the conditions of being her heir, you
were obliged to do penance a month or two every
summer in her stupid little cottage on Blackberry
Hill,why, there would be some excuse for you.
But here you are,just twenty-one, and a free
manwith five thousand a year under your
control
,
and liberty to cut in upon the principal, if you
choosewith no one to say, do this, or do that,
come here, or go thereand no one even to bother
you with advice, unless it is old Snugby your
former
guardian. By Jove! I wish I were in your
situation.
In
my
situation, Glenham! replied the younger
man, while a melancholy smile passed over his
countenance. Without mother, father, sister,
brother! In
my
situation!
Ahem! I should not consider it such a mighty
misfortune to be so deprived, returned Glenham,
displacing
his shirt-collar, that his fingers might coquet
with a pair of incipient whiskers. To be
perfectly
independentabove the reach of rebuke and
interferencemaster of one's actions and of a
handsome
fortuneJove! What ingratitude not to be
happy!
Did I say I was not happy?
You seemed to regard your lot, as in no
manner
preferable to mine.
True! You have parents, who are fondly
attached to you; sisters, beautiful and affectionate
a brother, who has just entered upon an
honorable
professional career, and to whom you can look
for guidance and encouragement. But II am
literally
the last of my race. I know not one human
being, who is bound to me by the ties of
consanguinity
.
Happy man! ejaculated Glenham. As for
me, I have a whole regiment of country cousins,
whom I would like to exchange with you for your
pointer, Veto.
Indeed, Glenham, it is no light thing to be so
alone in the world. Had I only a sister! Heavens!
How I would love herhow I would cherish
worship hera sister!
Nonsense! With your face, figure and fortune,
you can find sisters enough in the worlday, more
than sisters. But how happens it, my dear
Fleetwood
,
that you are so unencumbered? Is it
possible
that there isn't even one of that delightful and
numerous class of individuals, known as poor
relations
,
who claims alliance with yousome great
grandfather's second cousin's nephew's needy
niece, for instance?
Not one! Not one!
Indeed! If it is not intrusive, I would like to
know by what strange fortune you have been left
so delightfully isolated.
My story is soon told, and yet it is not wholly
devoid of romance. My grandfather having taken
the king's side during the war of our revolution,
was, as soon as our independence was established,
stripped of an estate large enough to be cut up
into half a dozen townships. Too much attached
to the country, however, to quit it altogether, he
removed to the West with his family. While
sailing
down the Ohio in a flat-bottomed boat, his party
was attacked by Indians, and all but my father,
who was then a boy, were massacred. This
explains
the reason of my having no relatives on the
paternal side.
But how happens it, that you were equally
fortunate on your mother's side?
My mother, (and here Fleetwood's lips
quivered
slightly as he spoke) was the only daughter
of a French gentleman of high rank, who, with his
wife and their maternal relations were murdered at
Lyons by Collot D'Herbois, in 1793. Coralie, (such
was my mother's name,) was saved by her nurse,
who afterwaads escaped with her to New Orleans,
where on the death of her protector, the little girl
was adopted by a company of charitable nuns, by
whom she was admirably educated. They were
unable to persuade her, however, to join the ascetic
sisterhood. She had not reached her seventeenth
year when my father saw heran elopement and
marriage were the consequenceand of that union
I am the unworthy issue.
Quite a little romance! If I mistake not, you
lost both your parents by shipwreck?
Alas, yes! We were bound to Charleston to
pass the Spring in a milder climate. We were
wrecked in the Palmetto, off Hatteras. After the
first shock, I knew nothing until I found myself on
the beach with some one supporting my head and
chafing my temples. On learning that both my
parents were lost, I became delirious and continued
so for several days. It is now six years since that
disaster, and I have tutored myself to speak of it
with calmness.
Adventures seem to run in the family.
I could tell you much more to prove it. But I
will finish my story now that I have got so far,
although
the catastrophe is already told. My father,
Frederick Fleetwood, whose name, but not whose
virtues, I inherit, accumulated his large
property
by fortunate speculations in cotton just after
the cessation of the last war. He then came
north, and recovered the most eligible
fragment
of his ancestral estate on the Hudson,
building the house which you have seen. He was
a man of a nice sense of honor, generous,
high-spirited
,
and full of all noble impulses. Both he and
my mother attached a little too much importance,
I think, to the circumstance of gentle blood. Both
could trace back their lineage to some of the most
illustrious personages of England and France;
and both would often make me promise to keep
pure and uncontaminated by unworthy alliances
the noble stock from which I sprang. Their wishes
I shall ever regard as sacred, not because I care
for `the blood of all the Howards,' but because the
recollection of those parental injunctions will ever
be stronger in my heart than the throes of passion.
Thank you for your story, said Glenham.
But see! What a shot is there  by the water's
edge! Here goes for one more chance! Bang!
Fleetwood did not look to see the result of his
companion's aim; for before the smoke of the
explosion
had cleared away, a slight feminine scream
arrested his attention. He turned and saw a
young female on the brow of a small sandy
acclivity
,
in the act of falling from a spirited horse. He
darted to her relief, and caught her in his arms,
while her horse in his fright was twisting round
like water as it leaves a tunnel. Breathless and
faint with alarm the lady suffered Fleetwood to
support her for nearly a minute, during which he
surveyed her face with undisguised admiration.
A little black velvet cap had fallen from her head,
giving the gazer an opportunity to examine with
all an artist's enthusiasm its matchless proportions
the sweep of that low but intellectually developed
foreheadthe light chesnut hair, that parted from
the centre, undulated to the temples and broke into
closely clinging curlsthe chiselled loveliness of
the featuresthe regular and immaculate teeth,
which the delicate upper lip, lifted so as to form
Cupid's bow, fully revealedand the long eyelashes
that curtained the depressed, dark blue balls.
Who can she be? muttered Fleetwood. She
is strangely beautiful! And what a figure!
Glenham now approached, after having satisfied
himself that he had committed no havoc by his last
shot among the birds. By Jove! he exclaimed,
as he drew near, there is Fleetwood, once more
in luck; with his arms about the waist of a pretty
woman! How the deuce happens it, that such
adventures
never occur to me? I see it all. The
horse took fright at the discharge of my gunthe
lady felland Fleetwood was just in time to catch
her ere she touched the ground. Confound the
fellow! How he studies her face! How he
manages
to let the wind blow her curls against his
cheek! And now he puts his hand upon her heart
to see if it beats! And now he places his lips near
her own to see if she breathes! And now he looks
at her like a mother on a new-born child. I do
believe the fellow is half in love already. And
nowthe devil! what is he after now? Ahem!
Ahem! Ahem there!
What, Glenham, is that you? exclaimed
Fleetwood
,
arrested by his companion's satirical cough,
in the act of warming the lady's lily-like cheek
with a kiss. Mount the horse instantly,
Glenham
,
and ride for assistance to the nearest house.
Do not delay. The life of a fellow-being may
depend
upon your speed.
In what part of my eye do you see anything
green? retorted Glenham, using a school-boy's
colloquial
vulgarism. I will hold the lady, and you
shall ride the horse. Come! now prove the
sincerity
of your concern.
I will prove that by remaining where I am,
replied Fleetwood, who recoiled from entrusting
his precious burthen to his companion's care.
But lookshe revivesher breast heaves.
The lady attempted to lift her hand twice, but it
fell to her side. Then she raised it suddenly to her
forehead, pressed it for an instant to her eyes,
dropped
it, and starting from Fleetwood's support,
looked
inquiringly about her.
Your horse is close byhe was frightened by
the firing of a gunwheeled, and would have
thrown youbut you have escaped uninjured, said
Fleetwood rapidly, and in his tenderest and most
respectful tones.
I rememberand I am indebted to you, sir
am I not?that my head was not dashed against
some of these rocks?
I wish I could say, lady, that I believed your
life was in danger, for the thought of having saved
it would have been to me a life-long joybut the
danger, I am bound to say, was slight. Your horse
was spinning about in this little heap of sand, and,
had you fallen, you would have found a soft
resting-place
.
Nonsense, Fleetwood, muttered his
companion
in a side-whisper, I would have protested that
her brains were on the point of being dashed out,
when, at the imminent peril of my neck, I rushed
to her relief. I see you don't know how to win a
woman.
At this moment an equestrian party of five,
consisting
of three young ladies, a female of a certain
age, and a black servant with a gilt band about his
hat, made their appearance, having been concealed
hitherto by the ridge of the sand bank.
As I live, here is Miss Adelaide Winfield
parleying
with two young men! exclaimed the female
of a certain age, who, I may as well tell the reader
now, as hereafter, was Miss Holyoke, the keeper of
a boarding-school for the finishing of young
ladies
in the little village of Soundside, where the
scene now lingers.
And pray, Miss Winfield, may I ask the
meaning
of all this? interrogated Miss Holyoke, reining
in her horse, and casting a very acidulated glance
upon the young sportsmen.
Glenham started forward, and, making a
respectful
obeisance, said: Pardon me, Miss
Holyoke
;
if blame rests upon any one it is upon me.
The discharge of my gun frightened the lady's horse,
and she would have been inevitably killed upon the
spot, if my friend here, Mr. Fleetwoodallow me
to introduce him, my dear Miss Holyoke; Mr.
Fleetwood, of Fleetwood, New Yorkas I was
saying, the young lady would have been dashed
into splinters if my friend here had not, at the risk
of his own life, seized her horse by the head, and
caught her as she was about being hurled against
that rock, which you see there, with the skeleton by
its side.
Glenham's style of beauty was not displeasing to
Miss Holyoke; and his address was calculated to
allay her rising indignation. She dismounted, and,
approaching Adelaide, inquired if she had received
any harm from the accident. Her apprehensions
were speedily quieted. Beyond a momentary
agitation
the young and fair equestrian had
experienced
no bad effects.
Mount your horse, then, Miss Adelaide, and
let us proceed homeward, said the
chaperon
of the
party.
Allow me the honor of assisting you, said
Fleetwood, who, in silent admiration, had for some
moments been contemplating Adelaide.
Clinton, you will save Mr. Fleetwood the
trouble, said Miss Holyoke waving her hand
imperatively
,
and addressing the black attendant, who
was on his feet holding the recently terrified horse.
Clinton obeyed, and placing his ebony hand for
a stepping-stone, lifted the young lady lightly and
dexterously into the saddle.
May we have the honor to call and inquire
into the lady's health and your own? asked
Glenham
,
with his most persuasive smile.
The young ladies of the Holyoke Seminary
receive
no male visitors farther removed than first
cousins, said the instructress.
Awful Miss Holyoke! At that moment
Fleetwood
would have given more for a passport to
your good graces than for the freedom of all the
courts of Europe.
Seeing her fair troop all ready for a start, Miss
Holyoke called Clinton to her side, placed a hand
upon his shoulder, and mounted into her saddle.
Forward now, young ladies! she exclaimed.
Adelaide cast one parting look full of gratitude upon
Fleetwood ere she drew the green veil over her
features, made a slight and gracious inclination of
the head, then touching her horse's mane lightly
with her riding-whip, followed the cortege, less
anxious apparently than she had been, to be in
advance
.
Confound the old prude! exclaimed Glenham,
before the instructress had well got out of hearing.
If she cannot be circumvented, however, I am no
judge of woman. What are you gazing at,
Fleetwood
?
You cannot see them, for they're out of
sight, as Lord Burleigh would say. Is little Velvet
Cap riding away with your tongue as well as your
heart? Speak, man! Confess! Or, if you can't
speak, give us a shake of your head.
Who can she be? ejaculated Fleetwood in a
half reverie. They called her Adelaide
Adelaide
who?
Fleetwood did not attempt to shoot any more
that day. He found a suddenly awakened
sympathy
in his breast for wounded birds.
CHAPTER III.
Oh she is fair!
As fair as heaven to look upon! as fair
As ever vision of the Virgin blest,
That weary pilgrim, resting by the fount
Beneath the palm, and dreaming to the tune
Of flowing waters, duped his soul withal.
Taylor
.
Adelaide's
position at Miss Holyoke's school
was far from an enviable one. Her parentage was
unknown. Boys and girls are more quick even
than grown persons to detect aught that is
equivocal
in the birth or genealogy of their companions,
and wo to the unhappy victim of their suspicions,
if he or she be of a sensitive disposition!
No one, with whom Adelaide was brought in
2
contact, appeared to know anything concerning her
that was disreputable; but all distrusted her
respectability
.
Miss Holyoke herself, though she
had her sex's share of curiosity upon most
subjects
,
was discreetly cautious how she pursued her
inquiries too far in regard to her pupil. She was
fearful lest the investigation might result to her
prejudice; and then Miss Holyoke might be
scrupulous
about retaining her in her strictly genteel
establishment. Now there was a proper degree
of uncertainty in regard to the young lady's
position
.
All that the instructress knew, and all that it
concerned her to know, was that her quarter's dues
were punctually paid in advance, and that Adelaide
had a larger amount of spending money than any
of her companions. A respectable banker in
Wall-street
was the person to address in case an extra
supply of money was at any time wanted, or in the
event of the illness of the young lady. Apprised
of thus much, Miss Holyoke, it cannot be denied,
had her own surmises and conclusions; but she
maintained an imperturbable silence on the subject.
And what did Adelaide herself know in regard
to her origin and family? Little more than her
instructress and schoolmates. She was now in
her sixteenth year, and had been six years a
resident
at Soundside in Miss Holyoke's family. The
remembrances she preserved of the period of her
childhood were fleeting and shadowy. She had a
faint recollection of a cottage beside a broad
stream; and of a porch, where she used to sit with
two or three little children of her own age and eat
blueberries and milk; and of a lady richly dressed,
who used to stop before the gate in her carriage
and take her in her lap and ask her questions as to
the treatment she received. The impressions of
these distant events were for the most part
pleasing
;
and yet the image of the lady seemed to be
always connected with painful though indefinable
associations. Sometimes Adelaide would persuade
herself that it must all be a dream; and then some
little incident or trait would stand out more salient
than the rest from memory's canvass, and convince
her of the reality of the whole.
She remembered well the events of the few years
immediately preceding her transference to her
present
abode. She had resided in the family of a Mr.
Greutze, a teacher of music in Philadelphia; and
there she had not only been treated with kindness
and attention, but had acquired a ready colloquial
knowledge of the German language and attained
considerable proficiency in music. To be sure she
learned little else under his care; but it was with
the most poignant regret that she quitted a roof,
where she had heard no other accents than those
of harmony and affection. Soon after her
departure
from Philadelphia, the Greutze family,
consisting
of a husband, wife and two daughters, broke
up their establishment and returned to their native
Germany. She had heard nothing of them for
upwards
of five years, and was ignorant of their
address.
Up to her thirteenth year Adelaide lived in happy
ignorance of any conjectures that might be
interchanged
by others in regard to her parentage. In
answer to repeated interrogations which she
addressed
to those, under whose protection she might
be, it was told her that she was an orphan; and
that the relatives of her parents were in Europe.
She would often ponder intently on these
circumstances
;
but, child as she was, she never distrusted
the ingenuousness of her informers. She would ask
herself in these solitary moments of reflection,
how happens it that I have neither brother, sister,
kinsman or kinswoman, who takes sufficient
interest
in me to visit me at least once a year? And
then the remembrance of the richly dressed lady,
who used to come in her carriage every Saturday
to see her, would rise to her mind, and give her
new food for reverie and conjecture.
At length the terrible suspicion, which others
entertained
,
was forced with crushing effect upon her
own apprehension. The occasion was this:
Adelaide
had been wandering through some of the shady
by-lanes of the village, and returning home, had
been summoned into the parlor by Miss Holyoke.
She found a lady present, a stranger to her, who
rose from the piano as she entered.
Adelaide, my dear, said Miss Holyoke, here
is some new music I have just received from New
Yorksome waltzes from the famous new opera
of Amiliewill you play them for us?
I will try, returned Adelaide. I cannot
always
read music correctly at sight; but this seems
to be very simple as well as very beautiful.
She took her seat at the pianoglanced a
moment
at the sheet before her while pulling off her
glovesand then running her fingers lightly over
the keyswent through the whole series of waltzes
in a very correct and spirited style of execution.
When she had concluded, Miss Holyoke turned
to the strange lady, and said: You see, Miss
Ashby, that my pupil plays without hesitation this
music, which you called so difficult, and which you
declined attempting. I fear you are not sufficiently
qualified for the office of musical teacher in the
Holyoke Seminary for young ladies.
Miss Ashby bit her lips, and turned a glance full
of malice and hostility upon poor Adelaide, who
now began to be painfully conscious of the
comparison
in her favor.
A few hours afterwards Adelaide was sitting
alone in her little chamber. She had a strange
distaste, this solitary child, for all dark and gloomy
colors. Everything in the room she occupied gave
evidence of this. The walls, window-curtains,
chairs, table, bureau, sofa, bed and coverlid were
all of a pure white. The floor had its white cloth.
Even her books were covered with paper of a
stainless white. A crystal champagne glass,
holding
some white roses, stood upon the white marble
mantel-piece; and Adelaide, dressed in a robe
entirely
white, with slippers of a delicate lilac hue, sat
in a half recumbent posture, tapping an ivory paper
folder against her lips, and conning a lesson in
ancient
history.
She suddenly started, as if a dark cloud had all at
once come between her and the sun. She turned,
and saw Miss Ashby, whose whole attire was
intensely funereal, enter the apartment.
I couldn't leave Soundside without coming to
bid you good-bye, my dear, said the lady, with a
smile so constrained and sinister, that Adelaide
instinctively
shuddered. She rose, however, and
with an air that spoke high breeding, replied,
Pray be seated.
I can stop but one moment, said Miss Ashby.
How charmingly you
did
play, my dear, to be
sure! Is not your mother a piano-forte teacher?
I am an orphan, Miss Ashby, replied Adelaide.
Poor thing! An orphan! Ahem! That is,
your father doesn't claim you, my dear. Now I
should think he would be quite proud of you. But
then society is so dreadfully prejudiced in such
cases!
What do you mean, Miss Ashby? Speak more
plainly, gasped forth Adelaide, swallowing her
heart, which seemed ready to leap from her breast,
so sudden was the shock communicated by the
revolting
intimation.
Surely, my dear, you are aware that
Aware of what? exclaimed Adelaide, starting
to her feet, her eyes kindling, and her whole frame
dilated with excitement.
Dear me! You are enough to frighten one,
child! returned Miss Ashby. Of course, I
supposed
that you knew what all the world said of
you.
And what do the world say? asked Adelaide,
in a subdued tone.
They say that your father and mother were
never married, and that you are
Oh, no, no! do not say it! exclaimed the
heart-broken
child, bursting into tears, and covering her
face with her hands.
Dear me! I supposed, of course, that you knew
all about it, said Miss Ashby; and to do her justice
this was partially true; but a feeling of
irrepressible
envy checked the outburst of her better feelings.
I must go now, she continued; or I shall miss
the coach that is to convey me to the steamboat.
Pray, don't take on so, child. You thought you
were an orphanwould you not be rejoiced to find
that you have a parent?
Adelaide looked up from her weepingher head
erectand her tear-laden eyes sparkling with a
sudden animation. A smile of indescribable
sweetness
such
a smile as might play across the lips of a
commissioned seraph while announcing pardon to a
sinnerillumined her features, and returned an
answer
more eloquent than any that could have been
framed by words, to the interrogation. Even the
spiteful Miss Ashby relented for a moment. But
the mischief was done. The humbling suspicion
was awakened, and it must either gather force, or
be removed forever in the mind of Adelaide.
Miss Ashby took her leave; and Adelaide was
once more alone. This child possessed an
intelligence
beyond her years. Confided from an
infantile
age to the care of strangers, nature and her own
instincts seemed to make amends for the absence
of a parent's tender and ever vigilant
superintendence
.
Conscience was to her in the light of a
mother
;
or shall we believe that there were good and
guardian spirits about her, who infused into her soul
a sense of right and beauty? One singular habit
would seem to countenance this idea. She would
daily arraign herself for real or fancied errors, and
impose such penalties as she deemed suitable.
These penalties were always rigidly fulfilled. Thus
she was her own accuser, judge and punisher. And
the very freedom from others' scrutiny and
restraint
which she enjoyed, made her the more
watchful
and severe towards herself.
Constant activity, mental, manual or physical, was
one of the first of duties in her eyes. Every
portion
of the day had its appropriate employment.
Debarred by the express will of those, who supplied
the means for her education, from no pursuit which
agreed with her tastes, she was allowed to range
at will through the fields of German and English
literature. Her long residence in the family of the
German musician, Greutze, had enabled her to
render
herself as familiar with his language as with her
own; and the works of Jean Paul, Schiller, Goethe
and Klopstock were as well thumbed by her as those
of Shakespeare, Goldsmith, Scott and Byron.
It will not be considered surprising, therefore,
that Miss Ashby's heartless intimation was
immediately
understood by Adelaidethat she saw at once
the true character, in a worldly point of view, of
her imputed position. Hours flew by, during which
she remained lost in meditation. At length Miss
Holyoke came to seek her.
What is the matter, Adelaide, that you have
not come down to dinner? she asked, as she
entered
the room.
Ah! tell metell me, whose and what am I?
exclaimed the agitated girl, seizing the hand of her
instructress.
Miss Holyoke, as has already been seen, knew
nothing positive in regard to her pupil's genealogy.
But it now occurred to Adelaide that the absence of all knowledge upon this point was the best proof
in confirmation of the truth of the suspicion aroused
by Miss Ashby's interrogations. From that
moment
there was a marked modification of some of
this young girl's traits of character. Agitation of
mind was succeeded by a violent fever, from which
she recovered slowly. But her constitution, though
delicate, had much recuperative energy; and it was
at length re-established in all its original purity.
Convalescence, however, was accompanied with
change. Naturally social in her disposition, fluent
and communicative in conversation, and quick to
bestow and elicit confidence, she now became shy,
reserved and abstracted. She imagined, and not
unjustly, that her schoolmates were well aware of
the suspicion that blurred her reputation. She was
too proud and too generous to involve others in the
consequences of associating with one, whose
respectability
was doubted. And thus she kept aloof
from all companionship.
But love was a necessity of her nature; and
unable to lavish her exhaustless treasures and
manifestations of love upon human kindfor the
whole population of the village was thrifty and
healthyshe found objects for its sheltering care
in the brute and vegetable creation. An old horse
turned out in a barren field to starve and die, was
sure to receive food and protection from her hands.
She would watch over a languishing shrub or tree
with an almost parental solicitude. She would
shrink from succoring no living creature, however
fearful and revolting. It mattered not whether it
was a wounded snake or a perishing bird. Both
equally claimed her kind offices; for she assigned
the existence of both, in the words of Origen, to
the exuberant fulness of life in the Deity, which,
through the blessed necessity of his communicative
nature, empties itself into all possibilities of being,
as into so many receptacles. And this thought
made her regard the life of the meanest insect or
reptile with reverence.
An instance illustrative of the force of this
sentiment
is worthy of mention. A noble bull-dog, who
went by the name of Cossack, was condemned to
be shot on suspicion of hydrophobia. Adelaide
protested against the sacrifice; for having some
acquaintance with the diseases of animals, she
believed that the imputed malady did not exist in
this case. Her appeals, however, were in vain.
Cossack must die. A gun loaded with buck-shot
was aimed and fired at his heart. The charge
took effect in his thigh. With one bound the
agonized creature broke his chain. Amid screams
of terror the spectators fledall except Adelaide.
He will bite youhe is mad, exclaimed the
man who had fired the gun, and who, in his alarm,
had swung himself high on the bough of a tree.
Adelaide remained firm; and the dog swaying
from side to side, stood with drooped head, his
tongue lolling out and covered with foam, and the
blood oozing from his wound.
Poor fellow! Cossack! Cossack! said
Adelaide
,
endeavoring to attract his attention.
Escape while you can, you fool-hardy girl!
cried the man with the gun. At least, get out of
the way, and let me fire again.
Cossack, as if he recognized the meaning of the
man's words, lifted his head, looked imploringly at
Adelaide, and dragging himself a few paces with
difficulty, fell at her feet.
He is mine now, said Adelaide, stooping to
pat him on the back and seizing his chain. The
dog has been poisonedhe is not mad, she
continued
,
looking at his tongue.
Gently but firmly she persisted in her object,
until at length it was agreed that she should take
charge of the wounded animal. But how would
she dispose of him? For Cossack could not walk,
and all the bystanders were too much afraid
that he would bite to lend their assistance to
remove him. But true kindness is ever fertile in
expedients. In the little enclosure where Adelaide
maintained her superannuated horse was an old
sleigh half filled with straw, and containing parts
of an old harness thrown by as useless. By the
promise of a few pennies Adelaide persuaded a
butcher's boy to tackle the horse to the ricketty
vehicle and bring him as far as the barred gate.
Then quitting her wounded
proteg
for a few
moments
,
she opened the gate and led the horse to
where poor Cossack lay panting, but regarding her
movements with evident interest. With
considerable
effort she lifted him tenderly into the sleigh,
and placed him upon the straw, although in the act
her hands and dress became smeared with blood.
Then fastening the end of the dog's chain securely
to the side of the sleigh, she assured the spectators
that there was no longer any danger, and leading
the horse with the vehicle and its contents at his
heels back into the enclosure, she applied herself
to the examination of Cossack's wound and the
administration of the proper remedies.
Her heroism and care were, after several months,
amply rewarded. Poor Cossack was crippled in
one thigh for life, but he recovered his health, thus
refuting the slander that pronounced him mad.
Never did brute repay human protection with such
tokens of gratitude as he ever afterwards exhibited
towards Adelaide. For hours he would lie
extended
with his head resting on his fore paws, and
his big sagacious eyes lifted so as to observe every
change upon her face. His lameness prevented
his following her when she went forth on horseback,
but he would often limp after her in her pedestrian
rambles through the alleys of the forest or by the
water's side.
In the frame of mind, which we have described
as consequent upon Adelaide's doubts as to her
parentage she reached her sixteenth year, and the
period of her encounter with the two young
sportsmen
on the beach.
CHAPTER IV.
I arise from dreams of thee,
In the first sweet sleep of night,
When the winds are breathing low,
And the stars are burning bright.
I arise from dreams of thee,
And a spirit in my feet,
Hath led mewho knows how!
To thy chamber-window, Sweet.
Shelley
.
It
cannot be supposed that a young man of
Fleetwood's prospects in life and personal
advantages
,
should have lived so unexposed to peril as to
be likely to be seriously captivated by a casual
sight of a pretty face. But his taste for the
beautiful
in nature as well as art, was too refined not to
be awakened by the strange loveliness both of
features
and expression, which distinguished Adelaide.
It had been his intention to quit Soundside for New
York, whither he had been summoned by his
lawyer
,
the day after his shooting excursion on the
beach. An interview with Glenham, the morning
of that day, caused him to change his intention.
How fares our cousin Hamlet? cried
Glenham
,
as he caught sight of Fleetwood in the act of
throwing open the folding windows of his
apartment
.
I humbly thank you, well, was the reply.
What a superb morning! Are you for the city?
By no means. Here's metal more attractive.
A new discovery, eh? What is it, Glenham?
Have you forgotten the fair equestrianlittle
Velvet Cap? Fickle, unimpressible, invulnerable
champion that you are! Don Giovanni himself
would have been more constant.
I have not forgotten her, said Fleetwood
joining
his companion on the piazza. I met her last
night in my dreams. Would that I might always
sleep if I could have such dreams! But I have a
letter from Dryman telling me I must be in the
city to-day. I will be back here soonand who
knows but I may stumble once more upon the fair
unknown?
I intend calling and paying my respects this
morning.
You! But, Glenham, what claim have
you
to
call? She doesn't know
you!
The deuce she doesn't! Didn't I frighten her
horse with my gun? I must call and make an
apology.
But Miss SunflowerI beg her pardon,
Holyoke
expressly
told us that none but the relatives
of the pupils were allowed to visit them.
Is it possible, my dear fellow, that you are so
exceedingly verdant as to mind such a prohibition,
where a pretty girl is concerned?
If you go, I will stay and go too, said
Fleetwood
.
Bravo, Fred! returned Glenham. I begin to
think that you are really in for it. But I shall cut
you out. There is no chance for you whatever,
my dear boy. I have got to pass a whole month
longer at Blackberry Hilla whole monthwith
nothing to do, if I choose, but make love. I look
upon the appearance of the incognita, under these
circumstances, as little less than providential.
She is not a woman to be insulted, said
Fleetwood
with sudden emotion, for there was
something
in the tone of assurance of his companion,
which jarred most ungraciously upon his feelings.
I wonder who she is, and who her papa is, and
whether he is respectable, that is, lives upon the
interest of his money, said Glenham, not noticing
his companion's remark. But come; he
continued
the
Holyoke Seminary is at least three miles
distantlet us mount our horses and set forth.
This being a Saturday, we shall be likely to find
that there is an intermission of the school.
Fleetwood complied with the suggestion. But
he felt in no mood for talking, on the road. If any
remarks were made they came from Glenham, and
would hardly add by their repetition any
contributions
of value to our ethical literature.
Arriving at the gate of the Seminary, the young
men tied their horses and passed under an arch of
old, umbrageous elms towards the house.
Glenham
,
who naturally took precedence in impudence,
led the way. As they approached the piazza the
tones of a piano accompanied by a female voice
arrested their attention and their steps. A song
from Amilie, beginning To the vine-feast was
recognized at once by Fleetwood. He was
charmed
with the animation and enthusiasm thrown into
it by the singer. He half wished that she might
be Adelaide. A step farther, and he found that his
wish was granted.
On hearing footsteps she rose to quit the
apartment
.
Seeing her about to escape, Glenham,
without
more ado, threw open the front door, entered
the room, and confronted her with a profound bow.
Adelaide did not recognize the gentleman, and
quietly remarking that she would order the servant
to send Miss Holyoke to him, she continued her
steps towards the door.
The gentleman who saved your life, Mr.
Fleetwood
!
said Glenham, pointing towards his
companion
,
who at this moment entered, and who, half
abashed at the audacious example he had
unreflectingly
followed, bowed respectfully and said:
Being
about to leave this place for the city. I could
not relinquish the pleasure of satisfying myself in
person that you had received no injury from
yesterday's
accident.
And I, Miss Winfield, (Glenham had been
examining
the corners of a handkerchief she had left
on the piano,) I could not rest till I had apologised
for being the unfortunate cause of your horse's flight.
From this time forth I forswear shooting.
Really, gentlemensaid Adelaide; but the
door opened, as she began, and in swept Miss
Holyoke
.
From the expression of her face, on seeing the
visitors, Glenham perceived at once that an
extraordinary
propitiation was necessary. Never did
he display to more advantage his gift of impromptu
lying.
Ahem! I have called, Miss Holyoke, he
said, with a look of grave importanceI have
called at the request of two or three fashionable
families of my acquaintance in New York to learn
your terms of tuition, and inquire into the nature of
the studies pursued at your far-famed seminary.
The expression of acerbity and indignant inquiry
on the lady's face at once gave place to one of
gracious
affability.
Will you be seated, gentlemen, she said with a
condescending smile.
Mr. Fleetwood, madam, you already know,
I believe, said Glenham. I had the honor to
introduce
him to you on the beach. Mr. Fleetwood,
may I ask you to do a similar kind office for me?
Certainly, certainly, murmured Fleetwood,
dismayed
at his companion's assurance. This is
Mr. Glenham, madam; he belongs to one of our
oldest New York families, and his aunt's country
seat is on that hillBlackberry Hillwhich you
see at some four miles' distance.
I have often heard of Miss Glenham, said Miss
Holyoke, for whom as an old maid she felt no little
sympathy.
Had she not been too infirm, she would have
visited you herself on this errand, interrupted
Glenham
.
She begged me to present her respects, and
to say that she would be most happy to receive you
at Blackberry Hill.
She does me too much honor, simpered Miss
Holyoke; and then, seeing that Fleetwood was
undertaking
to engage Adelaide in conversation, she
exclaimed: Adelaide, you may go to your
studies
;
but a second consideration, not altogether
disinterested in its nature, occurred to Miss
Holyoke
.
She could not forbear reflecting that so
creditable
a specimen as Adelaide, of what she was
pleased to consider the fruits of her instruction,
would serve to impress Glenham favorably as to
the character and advantages of her school. You
may remain, Adelaide, upon the whole, added the
instructress. And then a little embarrassed as to
whether she should violate a rule or commit an
indecorum
she concluded by introducing Miss
Winfield
to both the young gentlemen.
With unfeigned reluctance, Adelaide remained.
Shy as she was of forming acquaintances among
females, it was natural that for the same cause she
should be far more reserved towards individuals of
the other sex. There was something, however, in
the circumstances under which Fleetwood
approached
her, and in his grace and respectfulness
of manner, which rendered her more than usually
incautious as soon as she became interested in
conversation
.
Wishing to measure the extent of her
literary attainments, Fleetwood took occasion to
allude
to a new and elegant translation of Goethe's
Faust, which had just appeared. He asked
Adelaide
if she had seen it. She replied that she had
not, and added that the man who could produce an
adequate translation of Faust must have the genius
to write a poem equal to the original. Then you
read the original? asked Fleetwood, putting his
question in German, of which he had a smattering.
To his surprise Adelaide replied in the same tongue,
with so pure an accent, and so much fluency, that
he inadvertently exclaimed: Then you are
yourself
a German? Not so. replied Adelaide;
but I lived some years in a German family.
The conversation turned upon music; and
Adelaide
discoursed upon the subject in a vein of
originality
and enthusiasm, which convinced her hearer
that she had given it her profound and well directed
study. Of all the great masters Mozart was her
favorite. She regarded him as bearing the same
relation to Beethoven that Shakspeare did to
Milton
.
Bellini she considered the Tom Moore of
composers; Rossini the Byron.
Little had Fleetwood imagined that accompanied
with so much personal loveliness he should find so
much good sense, talent and vivacity. He was
charmed in spite of himself; and when Glenham
rose, and signified to him that it was time to depart,
for that they had been there half an hour, he was on
the point of exclaiming, then it is the shortest half
hour that I ever knew!
As soon as they were in their saddles, Glenham
began: Acknowledge, Fleetwood, that I am the
most generous man alive.
Say the most audacious, and you will not be far
from the truth, was the reply.
Is this all the gratitude I get for keeping that old
woman in a sweet humor, while you undertook to
commend yourself to the good graces of the young
one? But, no matter! My turn will come soon.
I lay my foundations broad and deep. I shall
attack
the enemy from an ambuscade. I have
already
made wonderful progress. Will you believe
it, Fleetwood? I am invited to make one of the
board of examiners at the next exhibition of the
school.
Did you find out anything about her? asked
Fleetwood.
About the
incognita?
No. Nothing very
satisfactory
.
Miss Holyoke twice evaded my question
as to who the girl was and where she came from.
I shouldn't wonder if she were an heiress from this
circumstance.
She is beautifulvery beautifuland
high-spirited
tooI could see that. Do you know, Glenham,
that I am half in love?
You don't say so! What will you give me for
not coming in your way?
Pshaw! I will let her know before to-morrow
that I am her admirer. Let me see! Could we
not get up a serenade?
Nothing easier. You have only to drive to
Norwalk, and engage the band that came down
yesterday
in the steamboat.
I will do it at once, exclaimed Fleetwood.
That is right, said his companion. And I
will take the credit of the thing, he added,
sotto voce
.
About one o'clock the next morning, a strain of
wind music under Adelaide's window disturbed the
deep and solemn stillness of the hour. For some
moments
her waking faculties seemed to struggle with
a sense of Elysian sweetness, in which her spirit
sought to be detained. An undetermined twilight
of the mind, between sleeping and waking,
succeeded
;
for a moment her soul was on tiptoe, as
it were, all faculties merged in that of hearing. At
length her eyes opened. She was awake. The
serenaders were playing Oft in the stilly night.
She arose, drew a shawl about her shoulders, and
looked from the window, which she had left partly
open on retiring. Half a dozen musicians were
grouped under a tree. Apart from them, on a patch
of moonlight that fell upon the flag-stones leading
to the front door, stood a figure, which she
recognised
at once as that of Fleetwood. He had a
guitar
in his hand, and seemed to catch sight of her as
she looked forth, for he threw off his cap, and
bowed
,
and as the music terminated at that instant he
lifted his guitar and sang:
In the silence of the night
In the hush of wave and tree,
Beneath the moon's pale light
I come, fair one, to thee.
Thy image will not fade
From the heart it hath imprest;
'Twill linger, Adelaide,
E'en though it be unblest.
For I see that thou art fair,
And I feel that thou art good;
And thy soul hath treasures rare,
Too rare for solitude.
Ah! while I breathe thy name,
Let not my song offend;
If you light the censer's flame,
The incense must ascend.
He ceased, and looked to receive some token that
his appeal was not unheeded. But a white curtain
was dropped where he before caught a glimpse of
Adelaide's figure. There was certainly no
encouragement
to a lover in this sign. The band
played a few more popular airs, and then the whole
party retired, Fleetwood more than ever enamored
because of the discouragement he had encountered.
And what became of Adelaide? Acutely alive
to the influences of music, and a critical judge, she
had listened to the serenade with emotions of
delight
,
such as she had never before experienced.
But it was not her taste for art alone that was
gratified
on this occasion. All the finer sensibilities of
her nature were touched. For some minutes after
the serenaders had departed she sat lost in a
reverie
.
Her eyes dilatedher breast heavedand
a proud smile sat throned upon her lipsas if
visions of transcendant beauty had been suddenly
revealed. Then, as if they had been as quickly
withdrawn, her countenance fell. She rose, and
looking upwards with an expression of unutterable
despair, buried her face in her hands, and gave vent
to her tears. The spell of young romance was
at an end. The reality that succeeded was too
dark and cold.
Modern science has proved that there are
persons
with a nervous organization so wonderfully
delicate, that they form correct impressions
instantaneously
in regard to the character of those with
whom they are brought in contact. A sort of
instinct like that which makes a dog slink away
from the person who is about to strike him, although
no outward premonitory sign of the act has been
given, seems to tell them whom to avoid and whom
to trust. Well may Adelaide have been startled,
therefore, when she awoke to a consciousness of
the direction in which the needle of her heart's
compass was now pointing.
Let me shun these dreams before it is too late,
she hoarsely whispered, while her frame
involuntarily
shuddered. They can never be realised by
one who is a . Merciful God, why was I
born? The endearing amenities of home are not
for me; the ties of consanguinity do not existand
love, should I ever feel it, can lead only to anguish
and life-long wretchedness!
And then, as if struck with contrition for these
repining thoughts, she poured out her soul in a
prayer to heaven for forgiveness. It was not till
the crimson of sunrise had mingled with the waning
light of the moon, that she sank into a calm and
dreamless sleep.
CHAPTER V.
Signor Lucentio,
Here is my hand, and here I firmly vow
Never to woo her more; but do forswear her,
As one unworthy all the former favors
That I have fondly flatter'd her withal.
Shakspeare
.
At
the breakfast table the next morning the event
of the serenade was a matter of general remark
among the pupils. Miss Holyoke had fortunately
slept through it all; and although a little scandalised
by the interest which the young ladies of her
establishment
seemed to take in the affair, she did not
attach to it that importance, which it would seem
to merit. No one for an instant imagined that the
compliment was intended for Adelaide. She alone
had heard her name breathed in the serenade.
Indeed
,
several of the elder girls looked very
mysterious
,
as if to say as plainly as they could by looks,
we could tell, if we would, for whom it was all
designed.
It would be unnecessary to relate with
minuteness
,
all the incidents which forced upon
Fleetwood's
mind the conviction that not only was the
state of Adelaide's feelings unfavorable to himself,
but that she regarded Glenham with a flattering
degree of partiality. Let it not be inferred from
this that Fleetwood had committed himself by a
formal offer of his hand. The remembrance of
those parental injunctions, to which we have alluded,
would alone have been sufficiently potent to deter
him from such inconsiderate haste; and no man of
sagacity need run the hazard of a verbal refusal
where he is dealing with a woman of candor and
refinement. There are a thousand delicate ways
by which she will signify to him that his attentions
are not agreeable.
The day after the serenade being the Sabbath,
Fleetwood attended the village church in the hope
of finding an opportunity of forwarding his
acquaintance
with Adelaide. After service was over he
joined her; and the road homeward being muddy
from a recent shower, he offered his arm by way
of guide. This she declined. Shortly afterwards
they were joined by Glenham, who also proffered
his arm, when much to his companion's surprise, it
was accepted. A little more knowledge of the
mysteries of the female heart would have caused
Fleetwood to put a different construction upon this
act, but as it was, he regarded it at the moment as a
decided token of preference. Other indications
equally significant followed. Add to these,
Glenham
invariably boasted of his rapid success; and,
at length, Fleetwood, unable to elicit a faint sign of
encouragement, resolved, after many a heart-pang, to
abandon the trial. Love requires some hope,
however
small, for its aliment; and he had as yet received
none. After remaining some ten days longer at
Soundside, during which Glenham had so far
mollified
Miss Holyoke that she interposed no obstacle
to their visits, Fleetwood called to take a final
farewell
of Adelaide.
On his way he encountered Glenham.
You seem in bad humor, Glenham? What is
the matter?
We have been barking up the wrong tree, Fred,
puppies that we have been.
Speak for yourself, my dear fellow. Explain.
Having reason to believe that our
incognita
was an heiress, I made her an offer of my hand this
morning, andcan you conceive it?the girl had
the assurance to refuse me most unhesitatingly.
Impossible! exclaimed Fleetwood, his eyes
sparkling with delight.
You needn't look so well pleased, my boy. You
will not have her even if you could when you hear
all.
In accounting for Glenham's conduct, it should be
borne in mind that Adelaide's singular personal
attractions
were of a character to make the most
frigid heart beat with emotion in her presence.
Glenham was as seriously in love as his sensual
nature
would permit, notwithstanding the pretence
that his belief that the girl was an heiress was the
main motive of his offer. Fleetwood, supposing that
he was sincere in this profession, naturally felt no
pity for his discomfiture; and exulted in the thought
that Adelaide might yet be won.
What do you mean by that? he asked in reply
to Glenham's last remark.
There is a stain upon her escutcheonthe bar
sinister muttered Glenham significantly.
What! Do you mean to say she is
Ay, it is a deplorable fact. Her father and
mother
were never married; and considering the
existing
prejudices of society, I think we had better cut
her acquaintance.
Poor girl! poor girl!
Poor girl! Nonsense! She ought to be
amenable
to the law for procuring lovers under a false
pretenceunder the pretence that she was a lady.
And so she is, and ever must be! exclaimed
Fleetwood with animation; a lady by nature's
own stamp, which no outward circumstance can
ever efface! Did we not thrust ourselves upon her
acquaintance in spite of all rebuffs? Has she ever
by a look or word encouraged our addresses?
Stop, stop, interposed Glenham; you forget,
my dear fellow, the day she refused your arm and
took mine.
That act may be construed in two different
ways, replied Fleetwood.
What! Do you pretend to say that she has not
all along encouraged me in preference to yourself?
I know not what to think, mused Fleetwood,
in whose mind some dim notions of the true state of
the case began to dawn. Poor Adelaide!
beautiful
,
accomplished, high-bredis she then an
outcast
from that society which she is so fitted to
adorn? Poor girl! I can now imagine why she
has repelled my advances; why she has avoided
extending the slightest encouragement to my
attentions
.
But now the gulf between us is impassable!
Of course, continued Glenham, no gentleman
would now think of making love to her with any
matrimonial intentions. But I shall keep up the
acquaintance
pour passer le temps
. It would be
impossible
,
of course, for me now to occupy the
relation
of a husband; but I may persuade her to place
herself under my protection nevertheless, one of
these days.
Fleetwood started as if a venomous reptile had
touched his flesh with its cold slime. He conceived
a sort of loathing for his companion, indicated rather
by looks than words.
Surely, Glenham, said he, you wouldn't be
such a craven villain as to approach the unfortunate
girl with any other thoughts than those of kindness
and respect?
Be more choice in the epithets you apply to
conduct, which you assume as possible on my part,
retorted Glenham.
I am glad to hear you speak of it as an
assumption
,
replied Fleetwood. Come, come; we will
not quarrel. You can now see that the girl had
good reason to refuse you; and your
self-complacency
need not suffer in the retrospect. As for
myself
I was on my way to take leave of hera final
one it is likely to be now. Let us not seek,
Glenham
,
to add to the misfortunes, which her very birth
imposed upon her. By heavens! since I cannot be
her lover, I will be her brother, if she will let me,
and I can occupy the position without harm to her
reputation.
A brother! sneered Glenham. Truly it is
quite refreshing to meet with such verdure in a
young man with ten thousand a-year.
Well, as I said before, we will not quarrel,
continued
Fleetwood, with an evident desire to get rid
of his companion. Have you any commands for
the city? I leave this afternoon in the Bridgeport
boat.
Farewell, don't be too fraternal, Fleetwood,
said Glenham, turning away with a smile, which his
companion did not altogether like.
Fleetwood walked on. The revelations he had
just received in regard to Adelaide awakened in
his mind a succession of conflicting thoughts. First
came an emotion of joy at the recollection of
Glenham's
dismissal. Then followed the misgiving,
that she may have loved while she refused him, and
that the cause of the refusal was merely her
unfortunate
position in a social point of view. And
lastly occurred the despairing consideration of the
insuperable bar, which this latter circumstance
placed to his own union with her. Could he be so
neglectful of parental prejudices and injunctions, as
to entertain for a moment the idea of wedding one,
who was a Pariah by birth? Should he, the last
of his race, although tracing back his lineage to
the best blood of England and France, should he
select for the mother of his children one, upon
whose genealogy charity would always have to
drop her veil? The impracticability of the thing
effaced the last vestige of hope from his heart.
In the midst of these ruminations he approached
3
a narrow grove of pines, which bordered on one
side the play-ground attached to Miss Holyoke's
Seminary for Young Ladies. The weather was
warm, and he paused under the shade of a tree to
rest himself. Suddenly a troop of girls, amid
shouts and laughter, came forth with bows and
arrows and dressed in archery costumes. One of
them carried a target attached to a pointed staff,
the end of which she thrust firmly in the ground.
And now began the trials of skill. As every
successive
arrow fell wide of the mark, a peal of
girlish laughter greeted the failure. The general
mirth was at its height, when Fleetwood saw a new
candidate approaching the scene of action. She
was dressed partially in white, a dark green
boddice
setting off to advantage the upper portion of
her figure. A quiver filled with arrows was slung
gracefully over her shoulders, and she carried a
bended bow with an arrow set in the string in her
hands. A straw hat afforded protection to her face
from the sun. She was followed by a lame dog,
which limped after her with difficulty. Fleetwood
at once recognized Adelaide in the new comer.
But however welcome her appearance might be
to him, it seemed to produce a very different effect
upon the young girls, who occupied the
playground
.
They at once checked their noisy
ebullitions
of mirth, withdrew from their sports, and
gathered about one of their number, who, as
Adelaide
approached, led her companions in an opposite
direction towards the house. It was not until
Adelaide had reached the archery ground, that she
seemed to be aware of its abandonment by her
schoolmates and of the cause of their departure.
And then she mechanically dropped the bow from
her hands, and slowly snapping the arrow, which
she held, into pieces, flung them upon the ground
at her feet. An expression of deep sorrow,
unmingled
with one taint of anger, came over her
face. An old apple-tree, scathed and leafless,
offered
its bent trunk for a support. She drooped
her forehead upon its rough bark, and lifting her
hand as if to keep back the tears that threatened
to gush forth, gave way to bitter reflections.
Unseen, but seeing, Fleetwood watched her every
movement, indescribably graceful and picturesque
as it was. His indignation had been aroused by
the unfeeling conduct of those who had shunned
her presence. His intensest sympathies were at
once awakened in her behalf. She was alone in
the wide worldperhaps, like himself, without a
relative. She was avoided by those who were
immeasurably her inferiors in every external and
internal grace. Why should he pause? Why
should he not fly to her side, and pour out the
natural promptings of his heart in her ear? Ah,
Fleetwood! It is not argumentit is not generosity
it is not philanthropy, that impels you. You
are in love, manand there is no imprudence, of
which you would not be guilty, rather than be shut
out from the haven of your hopes.
CHAPTER VI.
I fear it is a rash
And passionate resolve that thou hast made;
But how should I admonish me, myself
So great a winner by thy desperate play?
Taylor
.
Leaping
over the stone wall, which separated
him from the field wherein she stood, he
approached
,
and accosted her by name. Adelaide started,
and turned upon him a face, from which the traces
of tears had not yet disappeared. Cossack, the
wounded dog, whose history we have already
given, returned from barking after the departing
female troop, of whose unkindness towards his
mistress he seemed to be aware, and, with a
suppressed
growl placed himself by her side and
looked
threateningly at the stranger.
When I left my inn, said Fleetwood, it was
with the intention of bidding you farewell, Miss
Adelaide, and quitting this place for the city this
afternoon.
And have you changed your intention?
inquired
Adelaide, endeavoring to force a smile, and to
make firm the tremulous tones of her voice.
Yes; a spectacle I have just witnessed has
induced
me to change my plans.
Indeed! To what do you allude?
To the conduct of those of your own sex, who
abandoned this spot as you approached.
And how can it be that you are affected by
conduct of theirs?
I have been too hastyI have offended you?
Proceed.
Ah, Adelaide! Why should I disguise feelings,
which I know to be honorable and pure? I saw
that you were shunnedshunned by those who
were unworthy to be your handmaidensand I
knew the cause.
Well, then, my unhappy story is known to you.
So be it. I would be known to none, to whom it
is
not
known.
And what has been the effect of that
knowledge
of your situation upon me, Adelaide? It has
impelled me to offer you, as I do now, that
protection
,
which you so much requirethe protection
of a husband?
With a glance of utter amazement, Adelaide
regarded
the speaker for some moments in silence.
It seemed so like a dreamor the miraculous
fulfilment
of onethat, which she had heard fall from
his lips!
Yes, Adelaide, continued Fleetwood; I have
weighed this matter deliberately
He paused, while a series of cross questions
were put to him interiorly, by some impertinent
sprite, who happened to be passing, `though
invisible
to the material sight' at the time. That
sounds to me very much like a lie, said the sprite.
Is it? asked Fleetwood, who was scrupulous in
his regard for the truth. To be sure it is, said
the sprite emphatically; you know very well,
that not five minutes have elapsed since the
intention
,
which you now call deliberate, entered your
head. Be more careful, sir, in your assertions, or
I and other clever fellows, who now do you good
turns when you least think of it, will cut your
acquaintance
.
I believe you are right, sir,
returned
Fleetwood with humility. Must I retract?
To be sure you must. It will be awkward.
I don't care for that. Then here goes!
Pardon me, resumed Fleetwood, and Adelaide's
bosom heaved while he spoke
deliberately
was
not the word I should have used. I cannot have
weighed this matter deliberately, for it is but
within
a few minutes that I have formed the resolution,
which my words have conveyedbut I have
weighed it in the scales of unerring instinct, of
conscience, of earnest and well-grounded affection.
I love you, AdelaideI never knew how well till
I saw you subjected to an indignity from those,
whom no outward circumstance can ever make
your equals.
Adelaide had apparently made an effort to speak
during the brief pauses in these remarks, but though
her lips moved, agitation prevented their utterance
from being heard. At length, with a negative
motion
of the head, she said: This is language, to
which
I
should not listen and which
you
should not
utter.
And why not?
Ah, Sir, truth speaks in your tones and beams
in your looks. I feel that you are sincere, and I
thank you formay I call it?the
romantic
generosity
of your offer. But you are young. We are
both young. Yet I realize, perhaps, more justly
than you, the evils and mischiefs of my position.
Heaven forbid that I should make you a partaker
in themthat I should drag you down to the
ignominious
level, socially speaking, where I must ever
rest as contentedly as I may! Your prospects in
life would be blighted by an association with me
the child of shamewhose parentage is unknown,
and may be both guilty and base.
Ah, Adelaide, you are as God made you, and I
am contented with his marvellous handiwork. I
care not for the sins of your progenitors. Were
they greater than the heart of man can conceive,
still they would be expiated in the virtues of their
offspring.
You speak with enthusiasm, and that makes me
distrust your judgment. Think of the grief and
misery you would bring upon your parents and
friends by such an alliance. Indeed, Sirdo not
distress me by further importunities.
Hear me, Adelaide. I know not the being, in
whose veins runs blood kindred to my own. I have
neither father, mother, brother nor sister. I have
not a single relative, to my knowledge, on the face
of the earth.
Adelaide started and trembled, and her breath
came quick and heavy. A mountain of objections
was removed by this avowal.
But you have friends, who love, who esteem
you, she replied, after a pause. You have your
way to make in the worldhonors to wina
position
to attain. Alas! You would find me a
continual
impediment to your advancement. I have
been sinful in arguing with you thusin admitting
the possibility of an event, to which in the generous
enthusiasm of the moment you look forward, but
which in your calmer moments, you will regard as
I do, impracticable and wrong. Now, leave me.
It is unmaidenly in me to admit you to farther
discourse
on a subject like this.
Nay, we part not thus. Think you, Adelaide,
that in any of my moments, however calm, I could
be such a sordid calculator as to weigh the pitiful
prospect of getting on in the world (that is the
phrase, I believe) against the fulfilment of an
honorable
and well-founded attachment? But your
concern for my interests is superfluous. I am
independent
of the world and its opinions. I prize
the smile of my own conscience more than all its
honors, all its gifts. It can neither bestow nor take
away aught for which I careunless you are so
needlessly a coward, either on my account or your
own, as to fear its frown. Stay yet a moment;
and do not call my zeal imprudence. Ah, the heart
is as likely to be right as the head, in deciding upon
critical steps in a man's life. I am placed by a
large and secure income, far above the caprices of
fortune and the world's favor; and were I nothad
I nothing but my hands and my head, with which
to procure a supportI know not that my course
would be different. I am willing to confide our
case to the pastor of this little parish, Mr. Lilburne,
to whom I have letters from my lawyer, and who,
I am convinced, from the sentiments I have heard
fall from his lips, will approve of our union.
Adelaide started at this last word. She was
sorely tried. The color came to her face, and fled
as quickly. Her eyes were fixed upon the ground.
Her heart beat with violence. She could not speak.
Fleetwood took her hand. It lingered in his for a
moment, and was then gradually withdrawn.
And why should we not go hand in hand for
the remainder of our pilgrimage? he asked. Why
should we not supply to each other the place of
kindred and friendsdestitute as we both are of
those ties of consanguinity, for which the isolated
heart so yearns? Ah, Adelaide! How often have
I wished, that I had but a sistera sister a few
years younger than myselfabout your age. What
delight, I have thought, to receive her little
confidences
to
execute her little commissionsto
provide
instructors for her, and have her perfected in
every ennobling accomplishmentto instil none but
high and generous thoughts and opinionsto watch
over her health, physical and moraland to see in
the hearts of both, the growth of an affection
immortal
as the soul! Will you not be to me
something
even more than I ever expected in a sister?
And still no reply came from Adelaide's lips.
Indeed I cannot take a refusal, continued
Fleetwood
.
For my sake, for your own, I must insist
upon pressing my suit. Why should we not at
once unite our fates? Pardon me if I have not
grounds for saying that your present situation is
irksome and distressing. Isolated as I am in this
world, my own is hardly less enviable. The love
that might have been dissipated among kindred, is
concentrated all upon you. You shall supply the
place of parents, sisters, brothers. Nay, droop not
thus, my Adelaide. Look up; and say that you
will be my wife. What should oppose or delay
our marriage? Are you fond of travelling? We
will pass the autumn in a trip to Niagara and the
lakes, and next November shall find us in the South
of Europe. My delights, my studies, my tastes,
my charities shall be yours, and yours shall be
mine. What treasures will we store up for memory
to ponder over in our maturer years! Our first
impressions of all that is grand in nature and art,
shall be simultaneous. Hand in hand we will meet
dangers and adventures; and if we ever have
opportunities
of playing the good Samaritan on the
highway of life, it shall be with one impulse of
beneficence and ministering love. Speak, Adelaide;
shall it not be thus?
He took her hand. It was not now withdrawn.
He gazed in her face. It was pale; but what a
glance of earnest, heart-surrendering affection, of
triumphant and resistless love, told him that his
victory was secure! She remained speechless
with emotion; but at length her full heart found
relief in tears. Gradually she became strong again,
and taking her lover's arm, they strolled towards
the sombre aisles of an adjoining forest of pines,
and there confided to each other their hopes and
fears.
And have you no recollection of any one, who
claims the authority of a parent over you? asked
Fleetwood.
It must now be upwards of twelve years,
replied
3*
Adelaide, since any one, who I had reason
to suppose was interested in my lot, came
personally
to see and question me. I remember, when
quite a child, dwelling in a quiet little cottage by
the river-side; and I can recall the face of a
woman
,
who used to come occasionally in her carriage
and ask me if I was well treated, and if I was
contented with my home.
And have you reason to suppose that this
woman was your mother?
I have often asked myself the question; but
have never been able to arrive at any satisfactory
conclusion.
Do you not remember some tokens of
tenderness
and affection, which none but a mother would
have been likely to display?
She always treated me kindly, and yet I do not
remember looking for her arrival with much
eagerness
of expectation; nor, when she discontinued
her visits altogether, did I repine. And yet who
but a mother could have shown so much interest?
Perhaps she scrupulously avoided, for both our
sakes, awakening any deep affection on either
side.
My own Adelaide, under the peculiar
circumstances
of your situation, you are surely justified in
acting as if you were perfectly independent of
parental consultations. Your own principles,
impulses
and affections must be your guide. Trust
yourself to them, and I am sure you cannot go
wrong. Now listen to my plans. This is
Saturday
.
Precisely one week from to-day I will
return
,
and we will be married. Nay, do not tremble.
It is well that it should be thus. There shall be
no concealment, no delay. You shall on that day,
but not till then, announce to Miss Holyoke our
intentions. I will be accompanied by two female
friends and their husbands, who will lend
respectability
and authority to our union. They are
women
of generous impulses and strong good sense,
who, I am sure, will approve my choice. It may
be that the persons having authority over you will
be angry at the step, and cut off the support which
they have hitherto supplied. But you cannot
regard
that as any objection. If they have your
interests truly at heart, they will be gratified when
they learn the true state of the case. Now, say,
Adelaide, that you consent; say that it shall be as
I propose; and that next Saturday shall find you
my wife?
Adelaide looked frankly up in his face, and gave
him her hand. She was resolved not to be
outdone
in generosity.
Be it as you will, she said. I am yours
henceforthforever.
Bless you, Adelaide, for those words. And
now, farewell! I see, through the leaves, your
companions returning to the play-ground. I will
take leave of you here. Farewell!
He held both her hands in his while he spoke,
and they stood face to face. They entrusted to
their eyes the language of endearment their lips
could not utter. Then lifting her hands,
Fleetwood
allowed them to drop upon his shoulders,
while he clasped her in a first, hurried embrace,
and sealed upon her lips a pure and sacred token
of his affection. Adelaide's face and neck became
crimson, but she did not speak; and Fleetwood,
after one more deep and earnest farewell, leaped
over an adjoining wall, and was soon in the dusty
road.
Adelaide watched his departing figure till it was
lost to sight. Her tears fell profusely, but they
were tears of exultation and joy. Slowly and
thoughtfully she strolled by a circuitous route
homeward
.
Leaving Cossack to bask in the sunshine
on the front door-step, she sought the little
apartment
,
with which so many associations, sorrowful
and bright, were connected. She recalled the
night of the serenade, the melody to which she had
delightedly listened, and the desperate energy with
which she had shunned those dreams, the
realization
of which now seemed near at hand. How
different was her present mental mood, while
Hope, enchanted, smiled and waved her golden hair.
Reclining on the sofa, with the fingers of one hand
twined carelessly through the rich locks about her
temple, which rested on the palm, she listlessly
watched the shadows of the leaves of a
neighboring
tree dancing across her curtain, and gave
herself
up the while to joyous contemplations. What
a change had one little hour wrought in her
destiny! She was no longer isolated in the world,
shunned, sneered at, and subjected to indignities
even from the lips of menials. She was beloved
and by one to whom she could render up in return
the whole exhaustless wealth of affection, of which
her nature was capable. What were the scoffs of
the world henceforth to her? Oh, let them come,
thought she, that I may show him how little I
regard
them while blessed with his smiles! With
what ever vigilant fondness will I watch over his
happiness! How will I lend fleetness to the wings
of every moment, that he may sigh only when
deprived
of my ministrations! How will I study to
repay his generosity, his liberal and unquestioning
love! Indeed the happiness in store for me as his
wife seems too great, too bewildering for
realization
.
And yet there is no cloud upon the horizon;
for who that cared for my welfare could oppose
this alliance? Yes; I am now to be repaid for my
years of solitude, unloving and unloved; for the
absence of kindred and friends. And who would
not endure all that I have endured, and more, for
such a requital? Oh, goal of my hopes! Oh,
object of my unchanging and undying love! To
thy welfare I henceforth devote myself! Thou
hast been generous beyond what I believed man
could be, and thou shalt find me faithful, constant,
affectionate and zealous to please beyond what
woman has ever been!
Adelaide looked up, as if to invoke surrounding
spirits to bear witness to the internal vow; but at
that moment a sound in the court-yard made her
start. It was merely the noise of carriage wheels
grating over a newly gravelled walk that led to the
house; but she thought she had never heard aught
so harsh and dissonant. As they rolled on, they
seemed to crush the newly-sprung flowers of hope
in her heart. Who could the new comer be?
She looked from the window. She saw a
woman
,
who was a stranger to her, descend from the
vehicle. Her face seemed to Adelaide like a face
she had seen in some unhappy and dimly
remembered
dream. She shuddered while she gazed
and then awaited the result with a sort of vague
conviction that a crisis in her destiny was
approaching
.
CHAPTER VII.
And thy heart
Enlarged by its new sympathy with one,
Grew bountiful to all.
Talfourd
.
Fleetwood
did not defer his departure. A few
hours after taking leave of Adelaide, he was pacing
the deck of one of the steamboats that ply between
the city of New York and the many beautiful
villages that look out upon the waters of the Sound.
His thoughts were of the sudden and unexpected
step he had taken towards matrimony, and they of
course partook of that rose-colored hue, with which
love ever imbues surrounding objects. He half
regretted that he had not brought Adelaide with
him as his wife. Strangely tender visions of her
loveliness, her forlorn situation, her grace and
genius flitted through his mind, until he reproached
himself with having forsaken her even for the few
days during which it was his intention to be absent.
He never once put himself the question, am I
acting
a prudent part? So much did it seem to him
a matter of course, that loving her as he did, he
should seek to make her his own!
But though the absence of the beloved one might
occasion regret, never before had he thought life
so full of sweetness and of blissful import. The
meanest and most common-place object seemed all
at once invested with an interest, which it never
before possessed. They passed an islanda
narrow bar of sand with a few stray blades of grass
scattered along its centre, as if to set off the
baldness
of the remaining portions, while a stunted
poplar
marked the spot where stood a small hut nearly
dismantled by the tempests and the droughts of
successive seasons. A more desolate looking strip
of barren land could hardly be imagined; but here
a fisherman and his wife contrived to live and
thrive. Fleetwood had often wondered, in passing
this sand-bar, how any of God's intelligent creatures
could exist contentedly upon it. What monotony,
what vacuity, what poverty of occupation, physical
and mental, must they experience! A prison would
be preferable, for there one might have the
excitement
of planning an escape; but to remain summer
and winter, year in and year out, on that bleak,
blasted, solitary specimen of a miniature desert,
was more than he could suppose humanity capable
of! It seemed cruelty to compel the very
household
cat, that might be seen occasionally creeping
along the sands, to take up its abode there, so dull
and dismal did everything about it appear! Such
were the feelings with which Fleetwood was
accustomed
to regard this spot. But now how were
they changed! He gazed on it, and by some
miraculous alchemy it seemed to have been
transmuted
into a fairy isle, with luxuriant bowers and
ever-varying landscapes; and he thought, that even
there, with Adelaide, he would be well content.
The wind that sighed through the dismantled hut
would but cause him to press her closer to his
bosom; and the waves that tossed their spray over
the whole breadth of the isle would but make him
the more anxious to shield her with his protecting
love. The solitude would not be irksome, for they
would be all in all to each other; and under such
circumstances society would be intrusive. In short,
our hero almost persuaded himself that the dreary
little sand-bar would be a very proper and
delightful
place, whereon to pass the honey-moon. Yes;
it is the soul that sees; and makes a heaven of
hella hell of heaven.
Fleetwood had passed hardly a week in the city
since the attainment of his majority. After
finishing
his collegiate studies he had visited the different
states of the Union, stopping at every place that
attracted
him by its beauty, and studying the local
peculiarities of the people. But now, on reaching
New York he drove to one of the principal hotels,
and after engaging the best parlor and bed-room for
his accommodation, dressed and walked forth to call
on his lawyer, Mr. Dryman. On approaching the
door of that gentleman's house, shortly after
night-fall
,
he found from the letting-down of carriage-steps
and the lights from the windows, that preparations
for a party of some kind were going on. He
knocked
,
and leaving his card with the servant told him
to tell Mr. Dryman that he would call on him at his
office on the morrow; but he had not proceeded
many paces on his way home to his hotel, when the
same servant, panting with the exertion of running,
arrested his steps, and begged him to return.
Fleetwood did not feel the lack of company.
His thoughts of Adelaide were society enough for
him; but he felt too well disposed towards the world
and all the people in it, at that moment, to refuse
any one a reasonable request. He accordingly
retraced
his steps. Mr. Dryman met him at the door.
My dear Frederick, said Mr. Dryman, seizing
his right hand in both of his, this is truly an
unexpected
pleasure. How are you, my young friend?
I have been lamenting to Mrs. Dryman all day that
you were not in the city. Come in. You will be
quite an accession to her little dancing party. Some
pretty girls here! Take care, Fred. But you are
somewhat fastidious, if I remember aright.
And with these remarks, Mr. Dryman led him
by the arm into the gentlemen's withdrawing-room,
and from thence into the parlor, where the company
were assembled. He had never been introduced
to the lady of the house; for, notwithstanding the
familiar manner in which Dryman chose to accost
him, the truth was that the intercourse between the
lawyer and his youthful client had always been as
brief as a necessary attention to occasional business
would permit.
This is Mr. Fleetwood, my dear. I needn't say
a word more in his behalf, said Mr. Dryman, a
little flushed with the importance of his
announcement
,
pushing his way through a circle of young
gentlemen in white kid gloves, and ladies in light
satins.
Fleetwood could not but be conscious of that
irrepressible
flutter which takes place in an assembly
upon the announcement of a person, of whom all
have heard, and whom all are curious to see. The
fact was, that Fleetwood had very innocently
furnished
an unfailing topic of conversation to Mrs.
Dryman for a whole season. On the credit of her
husband's acquaintance with him she had been
invited
to many a house, where there were
marriageable
young ladies in the family, and where her
stories of his immense wealth, his elegant personal
appearance, and his attractive manners, coupled
with his remarkable indifference to the approbation
of that mysterious portion of the community known
as fashionable society, never failed to excite eager
and interested hearers. Her look of surprise and
exultation may be imagined when she found
herself
face to face with the hero, in whose praise she
she had gossiped so often to so much advantage.
Curtseying profoundly she looked around, as she
rose from her obeisance, with a significant air of
triumph upon the surrounding group of young
ladies
,
the shrillness of whose commingled voices had
subsided a little as Fleetwood entered.
We have been wondering for some time, Mr.
Fleetwood, why you could not find charms enough
in the city for at least a flying visit, said Mrs.
Dryman
.
I am not insensible to its charms, madam, was
the reply. If I were, I should be in imminent peril
of being cured of my obtuseness this evening.
Mrs. Dryman looked delighted. It was just the
reply that pleased her best.
You must dance, Mr. Fleetwood, she
continued
.
Let me present you to a partner. A
cotillion is about to be formed.
Do with me as you will, Madam. Though an
accidental recruit you shall not find me backward.
Do you see any one to whom you would like to
be introduced, Mr. Fleetwood?
I can reply to that question, Madam, without
taking a survey of the field. Introduce me to one
of two ladies in the roomthe prettiest or the
homeliest. It is a matter of indifference to me
which.
How very odd! But come, I will choose for
you; and the lady shall be Miss Emily Gordon,
whom you see standing yonder by the orange-tree,
beleaguered by ten beaux at once.
Do you mean that lady with the cloud-like
drapery
floating about her figurewith the fair, clear
complexion, and hair, the hue of which may be said
to be the disputed territory that lies on the borders
of red and auburn? Come now, I admit that she is
more than prettyshe is beautiful.
Without more words, Mrs. Dryman took her
visitor's arm, and conducting him across the
intervening
space, introduced him to Miss Gordon, and
then withdrew for a while to see if the preparations
for supper were all going on smoothly.
It must be an idle ceremony for me to ask you
to dance the next cotillion with me, Miss Gordon,
said Fleetwood. As a matter of course, you are
engaged.
Not so; for I have declined dancing again,
she replied. But do not let me detain you from
the amusement. The set is forming.
I thank you, I am well content to remain where
I am.
An animated conversation ensued. Fleetwood
could not but confess to himself that he had rarely
met with so agreeable and charming a person. She
was
piquante
without being ill-natured in her
remarks
;
and the knowledge which she displayed of
the world, of society, and the current theories of the
day for its reform, surprised and amused him. The
causes of the distress, the destitution and vice
prevalent
among the great mass of mankind, became
the theme of a mutually earnest discussion. Emily
was inclined to attribute their existence and increase
to defects in the outward organization of society;
and she believed that Fourier had hit upon the most
feasible plan for a reform.
Fourier's error, as it seems to me, replied
Fleetwood
,
is in beginning at the wrong endin
attempting
to reform the external before the internal
state, whereas it is the latter that must ever
supersede
and mould the former. What folly to talk of
making men and women herd together in one vast
caravansery, while envy, hatred and all
uncharitableness
are in their hearts! But his system of
association
,
he tells us, will harmonise the passions,
and produce that favorable state, which in my
opinion must precede and not follow that dwelling
together in unity, which he recommends. The
idea is fallacious, Miss Gordon. The world is an
arena for the soul's disciplineso reason and
revelation
teach us. It matters not what the external
form of life may be, so that the internal be pure,
and active and good. There is no truth more
self-evident
to my mind, than that sin brought into the
world all our wophysical as well as moralsocial
as well as individual. Who can deny that the sins
of the fathers are visited on their children? When
I have a twinge of the gout, it is not my own
indulgences
in Madeira-tippling that I am paying for,
but those of my great grandfather. And so we see
mental and moral, as well as physical taints
bequeathed
through successive generations. If my
ancestors were purer and better than my
neighbor's
,
where is the injustice if I am born a better
and purer and healthier man than he? The menial
who cleans my boots was born to drudgery and
wretchedness, while I was born to affluence and
ease. But is Heaven therefore unjust?
Undoubtedly
it is the duty of every good man to reduce as
much as possible the amount of distress and poverty
in the world. But the inequalities in human
condition
,
are not to be levelled by social systems of
man's invention. The fault (not to speak it
profanely
)
is interior and innate. You must go back
to the policy of the ancient Spartans, and put to
death every infant that is born into the world with
mental or bodily defects, if you would carry out
Fourier's plan effectually.
And are they then a necessary part of
civilization
the
wretchedness, the squalor, the precarious
subsistence, the absence of regular employment of
the lowest and most numerous laboring class?
Must men be driven to crime, and women to
dishonor
to sustain lifeand is there not something
wrong in the social organization, which compels
them to such alternatives?
You must remember, replied Fleetwood, that
we are indebted to the effervescence of the
work-houses
of Europe, for the pauperism and crime,
with which our large cities have been prematurely
infected. This fact is notorious. Who can tell
what would have been the state of our laboring
population, if, after the declaration of our
independence
,
the country had been left to its natural
growth, without any accessions from abroad? We
might not have boasted perhaps of our leagues of
railroad, our stupendous canals, and other public
works, but it is not unlikely that we could have
pointed with pride to an unsullied escutcheonto
contented labor receiving its adequate reward
throughout our bordersto a moral, intelligent,
patriotic and thrifty people. Our institutions, in
their effect upon the laboring classes, have not been
fairly tested, owing to these tremendous irruptions
from monarchichal Europe. It is impossible to say
what our republicanism might not have done for
the prevention of the social evils you deplore, for
we have had engrafted upon us, even in our infancy,
the vices and miseries of the old world.
But surely the system of Fourier, in finding
congenial employment for all, is calculated to do
away with much existing misery and destitution?
I do not deny that his system is a very good
one for those who can live under it. I should
esteem it a most cheering sign of the progress of
the race to see whole communities forming
themselves
into phalanxes and living together like
amiable
children of one family; but to suppose people
capable of doing this, is to suppose that they have
attained a state of angelic goodness. The evils
they have inherited and the evils they have taken
unto themselves of their own accord must be pretty
thoroughly rooted out before they can enter
harmoniously
upon such a plan of life. While human
nature is as it is, the scheme is chimerical. But
there comes Mrs. Dryman to interrupt us! The
theme is a vast one we have broachedtoo grave
for an evening partyand too unwieldy for an
amateur like myself to handle.
As Fleetwood concluded his remark, Mrs.
Dryman
approached, having hold of the arm of a young
man of rather
distingu
appearance, whom he had
not before noticed. She separated from her
attendant
as she drew near, and announced that
supper
was ready. Fleetwood turned to give his arm
to Miss Gordon, but found that he had been
anticipated
by the stranger.
You shall be my conductor, and we will lead
the way, said Mrs. Dryman, suiting the action to
the world. Do you know, continued she, as she
approached the supper-room with Fleetwood, that
you have given mortal offence to Count La Salle
by your very acceptable attentions, as they
appeared
,
to Miss Gordon?
And who is Count La Salle?
A young Frenchman, who comes here with
letters from our minister in Paris, and other
respectable
sources. He is desperately enamored of Miss
Gordon, and until this evening I supposed that his
attentions were not altogether indifferent to her.
He has been watching you for the last ten minutes
with not the most amiable glances, and the poor
man must have bitten his nails to the quick during
that time.
I am sorry I should have given him cause for
discomposure, said Fleetwood.
They entered the supper-room, and after the
customary havoc among stewed oysters, ices and
champagne, Fleetwood resumed the conversation
by the inquiry, And who is Miss Gordon?
Mrs. Dryman looked at him, as if she thought he
was quizzing her by the interrogatory, so
impossible
did it seem that any young man about town
should be ignorant of one so much courted and
caressed.
Indeed you must make allowances for my
rustic
education, said Fleetwood, deprecatingly.
Consider that I have rarely passed more than a
week at a time in the city.
Why, she is the reigning belle, exclaimed Mrs.
Dryman. No party is considered complete where
Emily Gordon is not present. And then she is so
accomplished, that she is as great a favorite with
philosophers as with fops.
Indeed!
Oh, yes, I assure you it is true. In the
principal
European capitals she was quite as much of a
belle, during the last two winters, as she is here.
She speaks French and Italian as if those languages
were her mother tongue; and then she sings like
a prima donna.
Mrs. Dryman's account was not exaggerated.
And Emily Gordon had preserved her youth and
freshness of manner with marvellous success. No
one, unless informed, would have imagined that she
was hackneyed in the ways of society. She did
not seem to have lost any of her bloom at midnight
routs, nor to have made callous any of the
susceptibilities
of her heart in the school of fashion.
Fleetwood
found himself once more in communication
with this dangerous beauty before the breaking-up
of the party. There was something about her
featuressomething vague and undefinedthat
reminded him of Adelaide. Now he thought it
was in her eyesthe next moment in her smile
and then in the tones of her voice. And did she
cause him to forget, even for an instant, her, the
beautiful and lovely one, whom he had that day
wooed and won? Not at all. But, by a system
of tactics, so subtle that he was unconscious of
them, she managed to keep him for the rest of the
evening by her side. When, as the company were
departing, he threw her shawl over her shoulders,
he caught the eyes of Count La Salle fixed upon
him with a glance of defiance.
That fellow is disposed to be impertinent,
thought Fleetwood; it will not do to let him
imagine
that I have shown the white feather.
A few minutes afterward he was retracing his
steps homeward to his hotel. It was a clear
starlight
.
The air was soft and mild. It seemed to
him a week since his head last pressed the pillow
such a series of emotions and thoughts had been
crowded into a few hours. Dear Adelaide!
soliloquized Fleetwood, as he took a last look at
the stars before entering his hotel, as I have eyes
to see and ears to comprehend, you are
incomparably
her superior. Light of my life, good
night!
CHAPTER VIII.
It was the hoot of the owl from the turret of her hopes.
S.
Lover
.
The
carriage, which in the noise made by its
approach along the gravel-walk, had aroused
Adelaide
from her day-dreams, had but a single
occupant
,
and she was a female. Adelaide sat in
breathless expectationwhy she could not tell.
The arrival of a carriage was a daily, oftentimes
an hourly, occurrence. Why, then, should an
apprehension
be awakened now? She began to get
the better of her momentary agitation, when a
knock at the door brought it all back.
Come in, she said, with an involuntary sigh.
A servant entered, and saying, your mother
wants you, Miss, down in the front parlor,
immediately
withdrew.
How could words of such import be uttered so
carelessly! Adelaide stood transfixed for a
moment
,
unable to take in their full significance. And
then, half gasping for breath, she murmured to
herself
:
My mothershe said my mother wanted
me! Then I have a mother! Ah! why has she
not discovered herself before? For good reasons,
doubtlessreasons having regard to my own
welfare
.
A mother! Whom can she be like? What
are her featuresher tonesthe color of her hair
and eyes?
Adelaide leaned upon the scroll of the sofa, and
pictured to herself the personal appearance of her
whom she so longed and yet feared to meet. She
imagined a face yet bearing the impress of
youthful
beauty, where the lines had been worn by grief
and penitence rather than by timeeyes tender and
earnest in their glances, beamed with mournful but
affectionate lustrethe hair was like her own, of a
light auburnthe figure, though it had lost the
fullness
it once possessed, was erect and graceful, and
the whole aspect was dignified and humble.
Ah! she shall find in me a daughter, indeed!
thought Adelaide, touched by the expression of
those features, which her own fancy had conjured
up.
With a beating heart she entered the parlor. A
female was standing before the mirror arranging
two bunches of frizzly curls, which were puffed out
on either side of her forehead. She turned as the
door was opened. Alas! thought Adelaide,
and that is my mother! How different was she
from the ideal which had presented itself to
Adelaide's
mind! She saw a thick-set, coarse-looking
woman, upon whose features few traces of youth
and innocence could be discovered. Though not
absolutely ill-looking, there was nothing of that
charm in her countenance which refinement of
4
character and breeding gives to the expression.
Her complexion was slightly florid; and the double
chin usually set down as a characteristic of
landladies
was hers in perfection. Her dress was
costly and ambitious; and she wore a profusion
of jewelry. Adelaide's first feeling was one of
repugnance
.
Bless me, child! Is this Adelaide? Come
and kiss me, my dear, exclaimed this woman,
fixing
the clasp of one of the rings in her ear while
she spoke. Dear me, how you have grown!
Adelaide tremblingly made her way towards
her, and bending as much to hide her tears and
her disappointment as to comply with her mother's
invitation, took her hand and kissed it.
And are you my mother? she asked, looking
in her face.
Why, to be sure, child! Do you suppose I
would have supported you else ever since you
were born? Who but a mother would have been
at the pains and expense of educating you as I
have done?
Most true! sighed Adelaide. But why,
mother, have you suffered me to remain in
ignorance
of you so long?
I had my reasons, childyou may be sure of
that, was the reply. But come, I have settled
accounts with your school-mistress, and I want you
now to accompany me to the city.
To the city, motherand when?
Nowthis very hourit will not take you long
to pack up your thingswill it, child?
But, mother
Well, child?
Is it necessary that our departure should be
immediate? May I not join you in the citynext
week, for instance?
Adelaide thought of her promise to Fleetwood
of his injunctions upon her to communicate a
knowledge
of their intentions to no one till the day fixed
for their marriage had arrived. And then the guilt
of deceiving her motherof withholding
information
so important from one entitled to receive it
forced itself powerfully upon her mind.
Why, child, I thought you would he delighted
at the idea of going to the city, said Mrs.
Winfield
and
now you ask leave to remain here
another week.
Yes, till next Saturday, motherand remain
you, also.
And why till next Saturday, child? There is
some mystery in this. Explain.
It was a marked trait in Adelaide's character to
be frank and unreserved. Perhaps it arose from a
natural courage, for it is the cowardly only who
fall into the habit of deception. Stratagem and
guile are the resorts of the feeble, never of the
strong. And therefore it is that the crimes of
poisoning and falsehood are more prevalent among
women than among their lords. The man, who is
bold and strong enough to knock you down with
his fists, will not assassinate you in the dark.
Adelaide saw no refuge from deception but in
communicating to her mother the real cause of her
not wishing to depart till the coming week. This
she did with a touching candor not easy to be
resisted
.
Mrs. Winfield was evidently unprepared for any
such disclosure. She was interested and surprised
by the recital. After a momentary pause, she
replied
:
I have no knowledge whatever, my dear,
of this young man, to whom you tell me you are
engaged. He may be all that he has represented:
but it is well to be cautious in these affairs. Why,
it was only the other day that a beautiful young
girl in the city ran away with a fellow, whom she
supposed to be a great catch, when it turned out
that he had a wife and six children all living.
I will answer with my life for Fleetwood's
truth, mother!
And what girl wouldn't do as much for her
lover? retorted Mrs. Winfield. No, my dear.
We will not be precipitate. If the young man is
worth havingif he is truly attachedhe will not
let such a prize as you are slip through his fingers,
because of the marriage being put off a week, or a
month, or even a year.
But, mother, you will suffer me to be true to
my appointmentto remain here till he comes, that
I may tell him why we should defer our union
that I may give you an opportunity to acknowledge
his worth?
Nonsense, my dear; I have made up my mind
to take you to the city at once. If the young
fellow
is worth having, I tell you, he will follow soon
enough on your track. Why can't he marry you
in the city as well as here?
It is not that, my motherit is, that I would
see him according to my solemn promisethat I
would assure him personally of my fidelityand
leave him to conciliate you as he may, and as he
undoubtedly will. Now do not urge me further,
my mother, to disobey his parting injunction.
And pray, Miss, to whom is your obedience
due? To him or to me? Come, now, be a good
girl, and go and get ready to return to New
York.
Indeed, madam, I cannot go, replied Adelaide,
with firmness. Yesterday, I might have felt
bound to obey you. To-day my obedience is due
elsewhere.
Upon my word, Miss, you are disposed to carry
it with a high hand, returned Mrs. Winfield.
But remember, you are not yet eighteen, and I
can enforce my authority.
Ah! do not attempt it, my mother, said
Adelaide
,
much agitated, clasping her hands
imploringly
.
Let not our first interview, after long years of
separation, be one that must be painful to both.
Tarry here with me till Fleetwood returns. Should
I then oppose your wishes, it will be time enough
to talk of enforcing your authority. There are so
many accidents that may occur, so many occasions
for misapprehension in the event of my departure,
that indeed you must suffer me to remain.
Indeed I shall do no such thing, exclaimed
Mrs. Winfield, her face reddening. Have I spent
so much money on you ever since you were born,
now to be thwarted in a trifling matter like this?
At this instant the door opened, and Mr. Glenham
entered the room. He started, as if surprised, on
seeing the occupants, and cast a penetrating glance
on the elder of the two, who returned a look of
intelligence
,
and rose as if to speak.
Excuse me, Miss WinfieldI supposed I had
left my gloves upon the piano, but they do not seem
to be there, said he, evidently at a loss for some
excuse for his intrusion.
And do you not recognize me, Mr. Glenham?
said Mrs. Winfield, advancing.
Augusta! He checked himself, and altered
his mode of address upon receiving a significant
glance from the person he so accosted.
Mrs.
Winfield
, I would say, he added. And is it
possible
can
it be that there is any relationship
between
Yes; this is my daughter, Mr. Glenhammy
daughter, Adelaide.
Glenham was unaffectedly surprised at this
communication
;
and Adelaide was hardly less so at
perceiving that Mr. Glenham and her mother were
acquainted.
Mrs. Winfield seemed to be lost in thought for a
moment. Then, as if an idea had suddenly struck
her, she said: My dear Adelaide, you may leave
the room for a few minutes. I will send for you
when I am ready to receive you again.
Adelaide did not require a second intimation.
She quitted the apartment, and re-entering her own
little room, bent her head upon the pillow and
fervently
prayed that she might not hate her mother.
The thought of Fleetwood's disappointment and
chagrin on finding that she had left the village,
crossed her mind, and she resolved to remain in
spite of all opposition. Then came the fear of
compulsion, and she was half inclined to fly and
hide herself from her mother's reach till Fleetwood
should return. The impracticability of this step
was, however, but too apparent; and with her
arms folded upon her breast she paced the floor in
impatient expectation of some message from the
woman, who had been so abruptly revealed to her
in the light of a parent. Could Adelaide have
listened to the conversation, which took place
between
the parties she had left in the parlor, she
would have had additional cause for marvel and
anxiety.
And little Adelaide is your daughter, eh?
Who would have imagined it? exclaimed
Glenham
,
as the maiden left the room in obedience to
her mother's request.
Yes, Glenham; and I wish to ask your advice
upon a matter which I fear is going to give me
some trouble. You are a lawyer, I believe?
To be sure I am, although I never had the
honor of receiving a fee. I am quite curious to
know the sensation. Can I render you any
professional
assistance?
Be serious, and attend. Do you know the
young man to whom Adelaide has engaged
herself
?
Whom do you mean? exclaimed Glenham,
opening his eyes with astonishment.
Ah! then it has been kept a secret! said Mrs.
Winfield. I think she said his name was
Fleetwood
.
Fleetwood! Oh! I see it all! muttered
Glenham
,
rising from his seat, and with clenched hands
and pallid lips pacing the room. I see it all!
Fool, dupe that I have been. How could I be so
blind?
And what ails you, my dear fellow? said the
female, shrugging her shoulders.
They must have been affianced this very day
this very hour, exclaimed Glenham, without
noticing
the interrogation. He must have passed you
on the road. I caught a glimpse of you in your
carriage, and you are indebted to that circumstance
for my presence here. I wondered what could
bring you to this sequestered spot. I see it all
now. But are you positively sure that the
engagement
has taken place?
I have Adelaide's assurance to that effect. Is
not that enough?
Yes, more than enough. I would not have
believed that Fleetwood would have taken such a
step after what he knew of the girl!
And what was that?
But half of the real truth. He knew that her
parentage was questionable, but he did not know
I understandno offencefor I see you mean
none. What sort of a person is this Fleetwood?
Proud as Luciferand there lies the mystery
of his conduct. How could he have engaged
himself
to Adelaide?
His pride was mastered by a stronger passion.
You say he is proud. I do not like that. He
would object, I suppose, to his wife's ever having
any intercourse with mewith her mother?
You may be sure of that, Augusta. He would
never permit you to meet. But then he is rich,
and he would not begrudge you money if that
could make up for the loss of your child's society.
Money! I have enough of that. I am afraid
I shall not like this man. Adelaide is resolved to
marry him. What shall I do?
Take her to the city.
She refuses to go. Her marriage is fixed for
next Saturday.
Indeed! Well, that is characteristic of
Fleetwood
.
He is prompt to act when he has once
made up his mind.
The girl is evidently fixed in her determination
to remain here till her lover comes,
notwithstanding
all my remonstrances against it. What shall
we do to get her to the city?
All that will be necessary, I think, will be to
persuade her that you have the legal power to
enforce your authority over her. I see a way of
doing this. You must make it appear that I am in
favor of your yielding to her wishes. I will
remonstrate
earnestly against your taking her to the
city. She will be the more disposed to listen to
my advice on hearing me countenance her views.
But when you drive me to a plain answer to the
question, whether you can legally enforce your
commands, my reply will be so shaped that she
shall think it advisable to yield and accompany you
where you wish.
But should she not even then yield to my
command
?
What shall be my resource?
Physical compulsion.
And will the law allow it?
After you have proved first that she is your
daughter, and then that she is not of an age when
she is privileged to be her own mistress.
That would cause delay.
Undoubtedly. But I think it will be enough
for me to assure her that you have the legal power
of compulsion, and for you to threaten its
employment
unless she will go with you at once. Rather
than submit to an indignity, when she finds that
resistance is useless, she will consent to accompany
you peaceably.
We will see if you are right.
But tell me, Augusta, what are your future
plans in regard to this girl?
If she marries, she shall marry a man who is
not ashamed to take her old mother by the hand.
If she remains single, I mean to make an actress
of her. She has a fine person and a good voice.
I think she would succeed on the stage.
Admirably! exclaimed Glenham, his features
brightening with obvious satisfaction. The girl
has talents and would unquestionably make a hit.
On the stage she might attain a more
advantageous
position than any matrimonial alliance could
give her. Besides, if she married Fleetwood, after
the effervescence of passion began to subside, he
would reflect with dismay and regret upon the step
he had taken in uniting himself with your family.
He would begin by ill treating you, and end by ill
treating his wife.
Then he shall not have my daughter. I am
resolved
on that. And now let us see if we can
induce Adelaide to return with me quietly to the
city.
She rang the bell, and directed the servant to
inform
Miss Adelaide, that her mother wished to see
her in the parlor immediately.
CHAPTER IX.
Good night! ah! no; the hour is ill
Which severs those it should unite;
Let us remain together still,
Then it will be
good
night.
Shelley.
The
second morning after the party at Mr.
Dryman's
,
Fleetwood sat in the parlor of his hotel, over
a cup of coffee and an omelette, scanning the
newspapers
,
which had been brought in withhis breakfast.
As he glanced carelessly along the columns for
some paragraph of interest, his attention was
slightly
awakened by one promising to give some account
of recent movements in the fashionable world.
After listlessly perusing a few lines, he found that
it contained a sketch of the party of the night
before
.
He read on, and remarked his name
conspicuous
among those of others, who were present. The
following was the passage in which it occurred:
The entrance of Mr. Fleetwood of Fleetwood,
was the signal for a general levelling of quizzing
glasses on the part of the ladies. This young
man, by the death of both his parents without
other issue, was left at an early age the inheritor
of a large and princely estate, including the noble
place on the banks of the Hudson, well known by
the family name. He is good-looking, but said to
be eccentric and peculiar in his habits and notions
of life. He was no proof, however, against the
charms of Miss Emily G, who, in spite of
the frowns and evident anger of Count La Salle,
received her new admirer with unequivocal marks
of favor. Was it merely to encourage another
moth to singe its wings in the candle-flame? One
would think that the young lady had numbered
victims enough. Both in Europe and in this
country, she has received offers without number
from the most eligible men in society. Fleet
wood is certainly a formidable competitorbut
he had better look out.
Pshaw! muttered Fleetwood throwing aside
the newspaper with disdain, and sipping his coffee,
as if to take out the taste of the paragraph. What
license these `pickers-up of unconsidered trifles'
for the public maw, assume with a man's name and
character! Should this impertinent tittle-tattle fall
under Adelaide's eye, I am sure she will prize it at
its worth.
Re-assured by this conviction, Fleetwood
attacked
the omelette, until there was little left of its fair
proportions. He suddenly paused, and set down
his knife and fork.
And next Saturday, soliloquized he, I shall
be a married man! Have I been hasty in taking
this step? Have I been inconsiderate? Ah, no
Adelaide is purity itselfand did I need an
excuse
for our immediate union, surely the
circumstance
of her present position would be enough.
But is it pity, that has any weight in urging me to
this consummation? Tell me, my heartis it pity?
No, no! Is not Adelaide my equalperhaps my
superior in every respect, save those of birth and
fortune? It is love, and love only, that impels me.
Yes, Adelaide, thou art the first and shalt be the
last, for whose sake that passion has been
awakened
in my soul. Nor time nor accident shall dim its
ever full and radiant flame.
It is something of a bathos to descend from a
rhapsody like this, to bread and butter; but, as a
candid chronicler, I must confess that Fleetwood
having uttered it, did take up a piece of toast and
finish his breakfast like a man with a good appetite.
He had hardly done this, when a servant threw
open the door, and announced Mr. Gordon.
Show him up, said Fleetwood.
The individual who entered was a fine specimen
of a well preserved gentleman about town. His
features, though a little sunken about the cheeks,
were still handsome. His hair was slightly grizzled
about the ears; and a keen pair of gray eyes lent
animation to his face. His figure was erect and
tall. He was dressed in unexceptionable taste, and
there was an air of elegance about him, which gave
the assurance that there was no circle of
gentlemen
,
in which he would not have been perfectly at
his ease. He entered the room with a free and
cordial bearing, and bowing slightly, said:
Hearing that a son of my old friend, Frederick
Fleetwood, was in town, and at this house, I could
not miss the opportunity of calling to take him by
the hand.
You are welcome, Sir, returned Fleetwood,
advancing to receive his greeting. I always
rejoice
to meet any man who knew my father.
I was indebted to my daughter, rejoined Mr.
Gordon, for my first knowledge of your presence
in the city. You may remember meeting her at
the party on Saturday evening.
The event was one not likely to be soon
forgotten
,
returned Fleetwood. Will you not be
seated?
I can stop only a moment nowhaving a dozen
engagements in Wall street. But you will dine
with us to-daywill you not? Our hour is five.
You will find the number of my house on this card.
Fleetwood could not give a good reason for
declining
the invitationand so he accepted it
promptly
;
and Mr. Gordon, after a parting shake of the
hand with the `son of his old friend,' took his leave.
After a day spent over papers and parchments
at his lawyer's, Fleetwood knocked at the door of
Mr. Gordon's sumptuous up-town abode, with its
patrician, free-stone front and lofty windows. A
servant in livery ushered him into the parlor; and,
on looking round, Fleetwood found himself alone.
He stood in the room fronting upon the street, and
as he glanced in the opposite direction, he was
surprised
at the apparent extent and magnificence of
the communicating apartments. Between the two
spacious parlors, which occupied each end of the
house, was an oval saloon, the walls of which were
covered with fluted silk of a light crimson hue,
spangled with stars of considerable size. Passing
into this apartment he was again amazed by the
seeming
distance
of the enclosed space before him.
Through the second elegantly decorated parlor
were seen open windows reaching to the floor, and
leading into what appeared a wilderness of exotic
trees, shrubs and flowers of the rarest beauty and
most exquisite fragrance, among which Canova's
Hebe stood over a fountain pouring water into a
marble basin, embossed with figures in bas-relief.
Struck with admiration, Fleetwood passed onit
seemed so like enchantment to be transported at
once from the dust of a crowded street into a bower
of such extent and freshness of verdure! As he
drew near, he saw that the effect of size and
distance
was produced by an ingenious arrangement
of mirrors; and he could not but accord his
admiration
anew to the art and skill, which had
contrived
so agreeable and forcible an illusion. After
lingering among the flowers, of which he was
passionately
fond, for a few moments, he retraced his
steps. And now an effect which had excited his
suprise on his first entrance, again arrested his
attention
.
The weather without was overcast; but
throughout these voluptuous apartments a soft
amber
glow, slightly suffused with crimson, was shed.
It was as if the fierce light of the noonday sun had
been softened and subdued by thick saffron curtains;
and it produced that genial sensation of content,
which the `blest power of sunshine' always produces
upon persons impressible to atmospherical
influences
.
After some examination, Fleetwood discovered
that the efflux must come through certain portions
of the ornamented ceiling, which were formed of
amber-stained glass, and which probably received
the light from a sky-window in the roof of the house.
He could not but admire both the novelty and
success
of the contrivance. The exquisite taste of the
furniture also claimed his attentionthere was such
adaptation in every article! So precisely fitted
was it by its color and size for the place it occupied!
An exquisite sense of the beautiful in art, thought
Fleetwood, must surely be possessed by the person
who presided over these arrangements! He moved
towards the parlor which he had first entered. A
harp and piano-stool stood in one corner, and on the
floor near them was a glove. He picked it up. It
was small, and white as a snow-drift on the top of
an iceberg. A faint but delicious fragrance seemed
to exhale from the delicate kid. Fleetwood felt as
if he were wandering in the gardens of Epicurus.
A noiseless turn of the door-handleand enter Miss
Gordon!
She wore a light muslin robe, which floated over
another of a faint straw color, so cut and arranged
as to show off her figure to the best possible
advantage
.
Her hair, plainly parted and wound in a knot
on the top of her head, offered no impediment to the
display of its classic contour. Her complexion,
always
delicate and transparent, seemed luminous
like a `lily in bloom,' in the peculiar light shed
through the apartment. Consummate grace was
in all her movements.
Good evening, Mr. Fleetwood, she said, as she
entered the room. What a pleasant surprise it
was to find that your father and mine were friends!
The surprise was as agreeable to me as it could
be to any one else, replied Fleetwood, bowing.
But do you not remember ever hearing your
father mention the acquaintance? continued Miss
Gordon, as she attempted to join the little clasp,
which fastened her glove at the wrist.
Allow me, said Fleetwood, performing the
office
for her, during which he could not fail to see
that the hand he held was as small and symmetrical
as a sculptor could have wished. And then
summoning
his powers of recollection, Fleetwood
endeavored
to recall a circumstance, which would
enable him to answer her inquiry in the affirmative.
After ruminating for a moment, he replied:
I have an indistinct remembrance of hearing
him mention the name more than oncebut it was
in connection with anotherwhat it was, I forget
ah! Challoner.
Emily's countenance fell, but she instantly rallied,
and said: There was good excuse for your
forgetting
us, since you knew us only by report. I
hope that your memory will be more tenacious now.
I trust I may not have occasion to say, in the
words of the song. `Teach, O, teach me to forget!'
replied Fleetwood.
The entrance of Mr. Gordon with a lady on his
arm, here interrupted the conversation. The lady
was introduced as Mrs. Gordon, his sister-in-law.
She was of the order termed stylish in
appearance
;
but the freshness of youth was gone from her
features, and she served as an excellent foil to
Emily's
radiant charms.
Mr. Gordon was a widower; and Emily was the
eldest of a family of six children. With admirable
discretion, however, the remaining five were
banished
to the country during the greater part of the
year, until entitled by age to take their places in
society.
After a few conversational common-places,
during
which Mr. Gordon found an opportunity of
informing
his young guest that to Emily belonged the
sole credit of all the interior arrangements of the
house, dinner was announced. Mr. Gordon handed
down his sister-in-law. Fleetwood gave his arm to
Emily and followed them into the dining-room.
They sat down to a circular table, and after soup,
salmon and green peas, followed all the choicest
dishes, which French ingenuity could prepare.
Champagne and burgundy sparkled in their glasses;
and the excitement of an animated conversation
sparkled in their eyes. Mr. Gordon well knew
how to keep the shuttlecocks of small talk in motion.
He had seen much of the world, and of the best
society in it; and his fund of anecdote was as rich
as it was exhaustless. He threw down a sterling
piece of information, or a solid and interesting fact
new to his hearers, with the same nonchalance and
air of liberality with which he uttered a light jest or
indulged in a polite repartee. Fleetwood could not
but confess to himself that he had never passed a
couple of hours more agreeably at the dinner table.
As the ladies rose to take their departure, Mr.
Gordon
proposed that Emily should give them a parting
song. There was a piano-forte in the room; and
she readily complied with the request.
Farewell! but whenever you welcome the hour
was the song selectedand she imparted to it all
that warmth and earnestness of expression, of which
it is so peculiarly susceptible. Fleetwood joined
with great sincerity in the applause, which Mr.
Gordon
set the example of by drumming with the handle
of his knife upon the table and crying bravo!
The ladies made their escape to the sound.
And now, my dear boy, let us try a fresh bottle
of this Lafitte. It is as mild and smooth as milk,
and far more harmless, said Mr. Gordon, as the
servant brought in fresh glasses and a dusty bottle
just uncorked.
Fleetwood began to think he had drunk enough,
but, before he could reply, his glass was full. The
wine was certainly delicious, and destitute of that
alcoholic pungency which he disliked. It seemed
as if one might drink it like water, and with as
much impunity as to its effects. Mr. Gordon's
eyes beamed with satisfaction, as he saw the glass
of his guest empty a second and a third time.
Cigars were placed on the table. Each took
one and lighted it. The Lafitte again flowed.
What do you mean to do with yourself for the
rest of the season, Fleetwood? asked Mr. Gordon,
carelessly brushing off, with his little finger, the
fresh ashes of the fragrant Havana.
That will depend, in a measure, sir, upon the
wishes of my wife, replied Fleetwood.
Eh? Your wife? Is it possible? What!
Do you mean to marry?
To be sure I do, and at once. Next Saturday
finds me a married man.
The devil it does! exclaimed Mr. Gordon,
bringing down his glass so heavily that the
Burgundy
spilt upon the table. And who is the
lady? he added, drawing his breath with difficulty
for a moment.
Her name is AdelaideAdelaide Winfield!
Gordon involuntarily struck his clenched fist
upon the table, and with so much vehemence that
his guest looked up amazed; but Gordon's face, if
it had borne any other expression, was in the
twinkling of an eye brightened with a smile, so
that he met Fleetwood's gaze without blenching.
The clenched fist lay upon the table, but there was
no sign that it had been thrust down with any
other emotion than that of sympathy and
congratulation
.
I was thinking, said Gordon, and he paused a
moment to take a few puffs of his cigarI was
thinking what a career you might run in society
during the next two years if you chose to remain
unmarried. Don't marry next week, my dear boy,
nor next year. Go to Paristo ViennaMunich,
London, Florence, Romestudy life a little, and
woman in particularthe lady of your love can
wait till you returnyou will have opportunities
that few young men have enjoyed for mingling in
the best society of Europe. I can give you letters
that will place you at once on velvet in the most
desirable circles. What, Fleetwood, it is
abominable
,
that with your wealth and advantages, and at
your age, you should dream of sinking into a
humdrum
husband! Wait a while, man; and marriage
will do very well by and by, when you want a
new sensation, or when you are prepared to enter
on the serious business of life.
There are circumstances, Mr. Gordon
peculiar
ones, I may addwhich render my
determination
unalterable. I marry on Saturday; and,
notwithstanding
your arguments, I shall consider
myself
the most fortunate of men when Adelaide
Winfield
is my wife.
WinfieldWinfieldpray to what family of
Winfields does she belong? asked Gordon, fixing
upon his guest a careless but penetrating glance.
Hang her family! What do I care for that?
I marry
her
, and not her family, replied
Fleetwood
.
Probably one of the Winfields of Baltimore,
said Mr. Gordon, musingly. An excellent family
unexceptionable in every respect!
So habitual was Fleetwood's reverence for truth,
that he could not even bear to see a false
impression
formed by another, which he had it in his
power to remove. This trait in his character was
brought out in still bolder relief by the slight effect
of the wine upon his naturally frank and
communicative
temper. He accordingly replied:
To the best of my knowledge, Mr. Gordon, the
girl is illegitimate. At any rate, she has been
brought up in ignorance of her parents, and has
not a single friend, except myself, of any influence
or position in society.
And you would marry such a girl?
Why, my dear sir, do you not see that under
those circumstances there is all the more reason
why I should make her my wife?
I must confess, that never occurred to me,
replied
Mr. Gordon, drily, and looking intently at his
guest, as if to get more light in regard to his true
character before proceeding further.
She is a noble creature, sir, said Fleetwood,
warming in her praise. Rank and fortune might
have given her more attractions than ought justly
to fall to the lot of one womanbut they could not
have increased her charms in my eyes.
Is she beautiful?
How can you ask that question of a lover?
She is beautiful asO, I cannot describe herbut
do you know I have several times traced a kind
of resemblancea sort of floating, fleeting,
indefinable
resemblance, between her and your
daughter
?
Indeed! exclaimed Mr. Gordon, biting his lips
to prevent their quivering from being remarked.
And then rising from his seat, he continued: Let
us join the ladies in the saloonyour unemptied
glass is a hint that you will drink no more.
Such Burgundy would make Father Matthew
himself violate his cold water pledges, replied
Fleetwood. But I have reached my ultimatum,
and second your motion to adjourn.
They found Emily and her aunt in the
conservatory
.
At a gesture from her father, unseen by
Fleetwood, the former left their young guest with
the elder lady for a few moments, during which
Emily was carrying on an earnest conversation, in
a low tone of voice, with her father. When she
rejoined Fleetwood, she made an evident effort to
entertain him, but there was a constraint in her
manner, a pensiveness in her voice, which he had
never before observed. The conservatory was
lighted up by colored lamps; and although the
space it occupied was but small, there were
labyrinthine
walks through it so ingeniously contrived,
that it was difficult for a person introduced for the
first time to arrive at any just conclusion as to its
extent. Mrs. Gordon and her brother-in-law had
disappeared. Fleetwood remained to examine the
plants with Emily. Linked arm in arm they
strolled
through the marble walks. Rich odors floated
about them from the commingled flowers, some in
bloom and some just bursting from the bud. The
plashing of the fountain that imparted freshness to
the air, was the sole noise that disturbed the
prevailing
silence. Fleetwood tried several times in
vain to engage his fair companion in conversation.
The most suggestive topics failed to draw forth
more than a monosyllabic reply. She was
evidently
sad and preoccupied. At length, after full
two minutes of silence, during which they continued
to pace the flowery labyrinth, Emily stopped
suddenly
,
and putting her handkerchief to her eyes,
burst into violent weeping.
I fear that something disturbs you, Miss
Gordon
,
said Fleetwood, tenderly.
She put down her handkerchief, and looked him
in the face. Her cheeks were wet with tears, and
her eyes shone with unwonted lustre.
Fly at once from this house, if you would
preserve
your happinessyour honor, she said, in a
deep but low and earnest whisper. Go at once
to her whom your heart has chosenmarry
without
delaybelieve nothing against her that you
hear, nothing that you seefly, and secure the
happiness of both before it is too late.
Fleetwood was astounded at language like this
from one whom he had hitherto regarded as a
pattern of discretion and good sense. He could
put but one construction upon her conduct; and
although that construction was one favorable to
himself, he was perhaps justified in adopting it,
without subjecting himself to the imputation of
vanity or self-conceit. Emily had evidently just
heard of his intended marriage. She had formed
hopes herself, notwithstanding their slight
acquaintance
,
which were thus dashed to the ground. The
disappointment working upon a romantic
temperament
had produced the ebullition of feeling she
had just displayed. Such were the interpretations
of her language, which now flashed across
Fleetwood's
mind.
Compose yourself, my dear Miss Gordon, he
said, hardly knowing whether to reply in a tone of
badinage or seriousness. I grant there is danger
in your society, but
Ah! do not, as you value your happiness,
think lightly of my warnings, interrupted Emily;
must I be more plain? Yes, I may not again be
in the mood to tell you allthere may be
inducements
to silence, which I cannot, dare not resist.
You think I am in love with youyou never were
more mistaken in your life.
Fleetwood coughed slightly, blushed, and felt like
a fool. He could not deny the accusation.
Emily continued: But do as I have bid you
fly and consummate your marriage with her you
have chosen. You still look incredulous and
amazed
.
Know then that
At this moment, the sound of Mr. Gordon's voice
was heard so near that both the interlocutors were
startled.
Emily, my dear, said he, appearing from
behind
a japonica tree of magnificent proportions,
your aunt and I, are desirous of hearing you try
the new song to the accompaniment of your harp.
I am sure Mr. Fleetwood will not object.
Fleetwood drew back to make way for Mr.
Gordon's
approach. The latter took his daughter's
hand. At the same time a suppressed cry of pain
escaped from her lips. It was so slight, however,
that Fleetwood hardly regarded it at the moment.
Emily turned one last, beseeching glance upon
him, and then, with a constrained smile, permitted
her father to lead her to the harp. Bending over
the instrument, she paused for some moments with
her hands upon the strings, while a deep silence
pervaded the room. Fleetwood was too much lost
in wonder to speak, and Mr. Gordon seemed to be
struck dumb by some deep emotion, which, with
all his command of his muscles, he hardly
succeeded
in disguising. At length, he exclaimed: Come,
my dear, why don't you play?
Starting from an evident fit of abstraction, and
running her hands over the strings, Emily
commenced
a strain, full of such appealing melancholy,
that her father exclaimed petulantly: We didn't
ask for a funeral hymn, my deargive us
something
animated and gay.
She obeyed; and how sportively the notes
seemed
to leap out from beneath her fingers! A new
creation of emotions was called into existence, as
if by a spell in the mind of the listener. As she
ceased, Fleetwood rose, and approaching her side,
earnestly expressed his gratitude for what he had
heard. He saw that she had been severely tasked
by the effort; and, with a repetition of thanks for
the rich strains, bade her good evening.
Will you go so soon, Frederick? said Mr
Gordon.
Indeed you must excuse me, replied Fleet
wood. Good night, Mr. Gordon! Ladies, good
night!
Mr. Gordon accompanied him to the street door.
The rain was falling in torrents. You must stay
with us to-night, said Mr. Gordon. A servant
can go to your hotel for such clothes as you may
wish in the morning.
I will accept your invitation, replied
Fleetwood
.
I do not fancy a shower-bath except when
my skin is divested of broadcloth.
It threatens to be quite a furious storm, said
Mr. Gordon, closing the door. You are wise in
remaining.
CHAPTER X.
I have't;it is engendered:Hell and night
Must bring this monstrous birth to the world's light.
Shakspeare
.
Adelaide
entered the room, where Glenham and
Mrs. Winfield were awaiting her returnshe
entered
with a firm step and a countenance, to which
the grave and fixed determination she had taken
added new dignity.
My daughter, said Mrs. Winfield, this
gentleman
has been trying to persuade me to yield to
your wishes. At the same time as a lawyer he
cannot but allow, that I have the right to compel
you to accompany me.
Let me entreat you, Mrs. Winfield,
interrupted
Glenham, not to dream for a moment of such
an alternative as compulsion. Your daughter has
strong and excellent motivesmotives, which you
cannot but respectfor persisting in her resolution.
Why not remain with her here till the return of Mr.
Fleetwood?and then I am sure that every thing
will be amicably arranged.
I told you, Sir, replied Mrs. Winfield, that I
wished to consult you as a lawyerand you
already
go over to the other side. Pray tell me
definitely whether I can legally enforce my claims
upon this young lady's obedience?
We can do many things legally, which we
could not do justly and humanely, replied
Glenham
.
You evade my question, Sir. Can I, if
disposed
to call in the aid of the law force Adelaide to
quit this place immediately for my home in New
York? I beg that you will answer me briefly, yes
or no.
It is quite unnecessary, said Adelaide, as she
stood with folded arms in the centre of the room,
regarding Mrs. Winfield and Glenhamit is quite
unnecessary for the gentleman to answer. My
mind is made up. I shall not in any event quit this
place. Not even the threat of violence can shake
my resolution. But why need we embitter the
moments of our first interview, my mother, by this
altercation? Listen to reason, I pray you. I will
write Fleetwood this very afternoon, begging him
to return here at once, or to consent to await my
arrival in New York. This is Saturday. He will
receive my letter to-morrow morning, and by
Monday I shall have his reply. You can surely
tarry here till then.
I shall do no such thing, you obstinate,
ungrateful
Glenham cut short Mrs. Winfield's angry
exclamations
by drawing her aside towards one of the
glazed recesses of the apartment, and accosting her
in a whisper. His communication had the effect
of appeasing her indignation at once; for the
choleric flush that had overspread her face
disappeared
,
and she said aloud: Well, Sir, you have
prevailedAdelaide shall do as she proposes, and
I will wait here till Monday, although much against
my will.
Adelaide was touched by her tone of compliance,
however tardy, and taking her hand she pressed it
to her lips, and said: I fear you think me
head-strong
,
self-willed and undutifulbut O, try me on
any point but this, and see if I do not answer your
expectations.
There, there, you are a dear child, said Mrs.
5
Winfield, hurriedly; now go and write your
letter, and see that it is sent forthwith.
It is too late to send it by the Bridgeport
route, said Glenham, looking at his watch. You
must let me leave it at Norwalk. It will be in the
way of my afternoon's ride.
You are very kind, replied Adelaide. I will
place the letter in your hands in five minutes; and
she glided out of the apartment.
The infernal scheme, which had entered
Glenham's
brain, will readily be conjectured; but
Adelaide
knew too little of this world's wickedness to
distrust for a moment the sincerity of his
proposition
.
Opening the little portfeuille, where for years
her stock of note paper had lain untouched, she sat
down to write. She described, in a few concise
sentences, the position in which she was placed,
and called upon Fleetwood for counsel and
direction
,
promising to abide by his wishes at all hazards.
She alluded in no unfilial terms to her mother; but
expressed a conviction that all would be well. She
closed by saying that she should expect a reply by
the following Monday. The letter was in
Glenham's
hands within the time she had promised.
No man, who is not accustomed from high and
stable principles to repel the first promptings of
evil in his heart, can tell into what depth of guilt
he may be hurried by circumstances. Glenham
was selfish and sensual in his impulses; and the
low, appealing voice of conscience was rarely
heard amid the din of passions, which he was not
apt to question and chastise. Notwithstanding he
had declared that he would not marry Adelaide,
knowing as he then did her questionable position
in society, still he felt as if Fleetwood had done
him a personal wrong in engaging himself to her
so suddenly and unexpectedly. He even persuaded
himself that Adelaide had been guilty of duplicity,
inasmuch as she had hitherto studiously avoided
extending any encouragement to Fleetwood, to
whom she now considered that a higher allegiance
was due than that which she owed even to a
mother.
Glenham hurried home, and entering his
apartment
locked the door, and drew forth the letter,
which Adelaide had so guilelessly entrusted to his
care. With an eager hand he broke the seal, and
perused the contents.
His
ever affectionately and devotedly!
muttered
Glenham, quoting the last line of the note.
That shall never be if I can help it: Hishis
must everything be
his?
He has wealth,
accomplishments
,
personal attractions, perfect freedom
and independence, and now he would fill the
measure of his felicity by this union! It is his
money that has won the girl's heart. I am sure
she would otherwise prefer mehas she not all
along shown her preference? Fleetwooddn
himwith what contemptuous anger he regarded
me when I spoke of extending to the girl a
protection
that was not the protection of a husband!
Dn himhe thinks there shall be no more cakes
and ale in the world because he is virtuous. Hold
awhileand I may show him yet that the girl, to
whom he has condescended to offer marriage, is
not too good for an humbler and less reputable
companion to me. And sheshe shall be punished
for presuming to refuse my hand. True, I regarded
the offer at the time as one which might be kept or
broken, according as it might turn out, as she
might be rich or poorof a high or low family
but she had no reason to doubt my sincerityand
the jade refused me with all the condescension of
a princess, phrasing her sentence of rejection in the
daintiest language. She refused me. But I am
wasting time in denunciation, when I should be
plotting action.
The habitually placid expression of his face
distorted
by malignant passions, Glenham paced the
floor with his mind bent upon contriving the means
for thwarting the plans of the lovers.
The mother is on my side, soliloquised he; but
then Adelaide is evidently resolved to place her
duty to her selected husband far above that to her
newly-found parent. Compulsion cannot be
employed
.
It will but destroy the little influence
which her mother may have over her. Stratagem
is our proper weapon. Cunning can lead her
unresistingly
into the net, to which force could never
drag her. Let me see. The motherah, the
mother! What will Fleetwood say when he finds
what a nice family he is going to marry into?
And yet such is his independencemoral and
pecuniarythat I am convinced the objection will
not weigh with him, so he is but sure that Adelaide
is pure and uncontaminated. It is that confidence
which must be undermined, broken down beyond
the possibility of question. And how shall that be
done? But this is a matter for after consideration.
How shall we get Adelaide into the city? There
lies our present difficulty. Once in her mother's
house, she can be easily managed. But she must
go there of her own accord, cheerfully and
unsuspectingly
.
How can she be induced to do that?
Pshaw! Could anything be more simple?
Glenham looked among his papers for a letter in
Fleetwood's hand-writing. He at length found
one, which related to the purchase of some
fishing-tackle
;
he carefully examined the chirography,
and then drawing forth a blank sheet of paper, set
himself to the task of carrying out the project,
which had dimly dawned upon his mind the
moment
Adelaide offered to write Fleetwood, and to
be guided by his reply.
The following Monday, at the hour expected,
Adelaide received from the hands of the carrier,
who usually attended the village post-office daily
for Miss Holyoke and her scholars, a letter, which
she eagerly and joyfully opened. It was as
follows
:
My dear Adelaide
:
You were decidedly right in resisting your
mother's importunities to leave Soundside until you
had heard from me. I shall not forget such a proof
of your attachment and fidelity. My business here
is of that importance that I cannot possibly quit the
city till Friday afternoon. Otherwise I would
most gladly fly to you at once. Under these
circumstances
,
and since your mother is so
exceedingly
anxious to have you accompany her, I do not
see but that we had better yield to her wishes.
Our marriage can as well take place here as at
Soundside; and I see no good reason why it should
be deferred beyond the period we originally fixed.
Present my respects to your mother, and tell her
that for her daughter's sake she shall be dear.
Should you see Glenham, remember me to him
kindly. I owe him much. Poor fellow! he has
cause to envy me your affection; but I know that
he is incapable of any such passion. Apply to him
unreservedly, should you have occasion for friendly
and discreet advice. Let me know you mother's
address, that I may call as soon as you reach the
city. I am compelled to write in haste, as I only
received your letter a few minutes since, and mine
will miss the mail if I delay even to tell you with
how much sincerity and love,
I am ever yours, dear Adelaide,
Frederick Fleetwood
.
This letter was ingeniously contrived to give
satisfaction. No such idea as distrust of its
genuineness
could possibly suggest itself to Adelaide's
mind. It was plain, affectionate, and to the point;
and the closing excuse for brevity was all-sufficient.
Adelaide handed it to her mother, and said, in a
cheerful tone There, mother, read itI am
ready to accompany you to the city at any
moment
you please.
Then hasten, and prepare for your departure at
once, said Mrs. Winfield, taking the letter, and
casting upon it a far less attentive glance than
Adelaide had expected.
With a suppressed sigh, Adelaide quitted the
room. Entering her own little apartment with a
servant, she speedily packed up her wardrobe and
library. The trunks were strapped, and carried
into the entry. Adelaide stood alone in the midst
of the little territory, which she had presided over
for so many years, and which she was now about
to resign probably for ever. Uncertainty as to her
fate, and the solicitude of preparation, had hitherto
procrastinated the thought of leave-taking. And
now the reality had come with an abruptness that
was almost heart-crushing. She looked from the
window, and the old elm before it, which had been
to her so like a friend since childhood, seemed to
stretch out its arms imploringly to detain her. The
rustle of its leaves sounded like the language of
entreaty. The knots and bossy rings upon its
trunk appeared to her like so many eyes, instinct
with an almost human expression of tenderness.
And then the little roomthe scene of her studies,
her tears, her resolves, her prayers, her blameless
joys, her premature griefs! Mournful but dear
recollections! Even the dimity curtain that flapped
against the window-pane seemed to protest
petulantly
against her departure. The familiar outline
of the surrounding landscape never appeared so
picturesque and lovely as at this moment. The
smooth waters of the Sound gleamed like a road
of silver in the distance, while the hills lifted their
piles of verdure high in the sunshine, as if proud of
their affluent drapery.
Cossack, the venerable dog, whose life she had
once saved, was sleeping on the front door-step in
happy unconsciousness of the bereavement which
awaited him. Taking one of the few remaining
gold pieces from her purse, Adelaide called an old
servant of the family, named Norah, and placed it
in her hands, requesting that she would take good
care of the animal.
That I will, for your own sweet sake, and not
for the money, replied Norah, whimpering at the
thought of losing her young mistress.
Well, Norah, take the gold-piece then for a
keepsakemay it bring you good luck.
Bad luck to me when I part with it, Miss, said
Norah, receiving the gift.
But Adelaide had other friends to take leave of,
and fearing that her mother would grow impatient,
she hastened to discharge her obligations. Miss
Holyoke was engaged in the school-room with her
pupils. Adelaide entered, and with a grace
peculiarly
her own took leave of her companions.
There were some who, in spite of the injurious
whispers which had been circulated in regard to
her, could not but be won by the gentleness and
goodness which she had ever displayed towards
them. These followed her to the door, and shed
tears at the thought of her departure. Miss
Holyoke
unbent so far as to kiss the cheek of her pupil,
and shake her hand at parting. The intercourse
between her and Adelaide had generally been
friendly, if not affectionate; but still there were
considerations of policy, which modified the regret
of the instructress at her pupil's departure.
Adelaide found the carriage at the door, and
Mrs. Winfield seated in it awaiting her arrival.
As she was about ascending the steps, old Cossack
came limping round the corner, barking as if aware
that her departure was to be a prolonged one.
Adelaide stooped and patted him on the headgwhile
old Norah came forth and threw a lasso about his
neck to keep him from following the vehicle.
Entering the carriage, Adelaide took the seat
opposite to her mother, and leaning back in one
corner, put her handkerchief to her eyes to hide
her tears.
The carriage rolled on in the direction of the
steamboat that was to convey the party to New
York.
CHAPTER XI.
How shall I woo her? I will gaze
In sad and silent trance
On those blue eyes whose witching rays
Speak love in every glance:
And I will tell her, eyes more bright,
Though bright her own may beam,
Will shed their witching spell to-night
Upon me, in my dream.
Anon
.
When
Fleetwood re-entered the parlor at Mr.
Gordon's, he found that during his brief absence
the ladies had disappeared.
Amuse yourself with a book, Frederick, while
I recall the fugitives, said Mr. Gordon, quitting
the room.
But Fleetwood found that the company of his
own perplexed meditations was quite sufficient.
Let us leave him to them, while we follow Mr.
Gordon in quest of his daughter.
He abruptly entered her sleeping-room, and
standing
with his back leaning against the closed door,
and his arms folded, he regarded Emily for some
moments in silence. She was sitting in a large,
old-fashioned easy-chair, with her clasped hands
resting carelessly in her lap, and her eyes fixed
thoughtfully upon the floor. On seeing her father,
she started from her posture, and rising, turned on
him a half apprehensive and guilty glance.
Have you not dutifully obeyed my injunctions?
he said, in a bitter and measured voice, lingering
upon every word as if to wring from it all the
severity of which it was capable. What, girl!
would you have betrayed methwarted me
foiled meyour own father?
No, sir; indeed I intended to say nothing that
5*
should throw a suspicionthat should raise a doubt
as to your
Have a care, girl! Luckily your inuendoes
were misinterpreted. I heard them all, and
watched
their effectthe self-satisfied youth construed
them as the wild and broken manifestations of a
sentimental fancy for himselfhe supposed you
were in love with himbut it was not through any
fault of yours that his eyes were not opened, and
my plans defeated.
O, my father, exclaimed Emily, wringing her
hands imploringly, abandon this unholy scheme!
If adversity threatens us, let it come! Do not try
to avert it by unrighteous means, by injustice, by
deception. While we have free souls, what
though
Have done with this tiresome canting. What
is it that I demand of you? That you so exercise
the fascinations you possess that this young Croesus,
who is now below, shall make you his wife.
Is Mr. Fleetwood then still below? asked
Emily, in a despairing tone. I thought he had
quitted the house.
He returned to escape the stormhe remains
here to-nightandmark youI expect you to
go down, and make yourself more agreeable than
you have seen fit to do as yet.
My father, did you not tell me that he was
engaged
that
he was under a promise to marry this
very week?
And what if he is? How very scrupulous you
have grown all at once! Why, girl, I have seen
you so play the Syren before now as to make men
faithless to their wedded wivesas to make lovers
forsake their affianced mistresses, whom they
fancied they adored till they saw you. Have you
forgotten the bloody duelthe suicidewhich are
among the trophies of your heartless coquetry?
My father, this is cruelit is
It is trueand you know it.
Ah, then let me not add to the catalogue of my
offences. Let me not break the heart of an
innocent
girl by driving the lover, to whom she has
confided all her hopes, to perfidy!
Bah! Why will you talk so, when you know
I despise cant? Girl's hearts are not so easily
brokenas you are well aware. Listen to me.
There are two all controlling reasons why this
match should be prevented. One is, that
Fleetwood
must marry you and no one elseand the
other is, that of all women in the world he must
not marry Adelathe girl to whom he is
engaged
.
And why should she be proscribed more than
others?
For reasons, on which your prosperity and
mine and that of all my family may depend.
Indeed! I thought she was a nameless,
obscure
girlhow can we be affected by her
marriage
?
It is no time for explanation now. Let me be
obeyed, unless you would see me ruined.
Ah! do not urge me to this step. Do not drive
me to that, at which my conscience, my heart
revolts
!
Your heart! How long is it, Miss, since you
had such a toy? But I know the cause of your
refractoriness. You would wed that beggarly
Count, La Salleyou would wed himand not
for lovebut for his title.
Emily hung her head as if a
part
at least of the
accusation were true.
Look you, daughter, continued Mr. Gordon,
detecting at once the effect of his remark; were
you a foola green girlit might be cruel in me
to urge you as I do upon this point. But you are
a woman of the worldfrom a child you have
been a sort of pet in the lap of societyyou have
been bred to luxury, and must ever feel the need
of ityou have loved and been lovedyou are at
an age when the reasoning faculties should be
predominant
.
Do I ask you to make a repulsive
match? On the contrary, would not nine hundred
and ninety-nine women out of a thousand, ay, and
men too, say that Fleetwood was infinitely the
Count's superior in intellectual and personal
advantages
,
as well as in those which the world
prizes so highly? You shake your head.
Damnation
,
girl, do you pretend to compare the two?
Why, La Salle is unworthy to lick the dust from
the other's shoes. Ah! but I forgotthe Count
has in one thing the advantageFleetwood doesn't
play on the fiddlethe one has the manners and
attainments of a gentlemanthe other those of a
dancing-master.
Why will you compel me to injure a being
who has never done me harm? asked Emily.
Her very existence does you harmdoes all
of us harm, exclaimed Mr. Gordon, with violence.
Look you, girl, am I a man to be subjected to the
indignities, the humiliations, the crushing,
heart-wearing
annoyances of want, after having been
accustomed from my very birth to affluence and
the ready gratification of all my tastes? Should I,
think you, receive with patience the sneering
condolence
of men who have for years looked up to
me with envy? Should I listen with equanimity
to their heartless commentaries upon my ruin?
Or, do you imagine, that should the time come, as
come it will if you thwart me in my plans, when
my grocer will refuse to trust me for a barrel of
flour until my last quarter's bill is paiddo you
imagine, that under such a mortification, I would
consent to live?
Ah, my father, surely, surely there is no danger
of any such event. We can reduce our
establishment
many thousands a-year, and still live
comfortably
,
respectably.
Reduce our establishment! Why, girl, I have
lived for the last twelve months solely on the credit
of my splendid establishment. Take it away, and
absolute ruin would stare me in the face. A whole
legion of creditors would beleaguer me. Listen.
The stupendous expenses which I have been at for
the last ten years, have not been indulged in
without
seriously impairing my fortune. On my last
return from Europe, I found that I had been in the
habit of spending more than double the amount of
my income. Instead of husbanding my resources,
selling off all my costly superfluities, and moving
into the country for a while, until I had made up
my losses, I foolishly launched into speculation in
the hope of retrieving in a few days the
extravagances
of spendthrift years. I have been
unsuccessful
in all my movements in Wall-street. A few
misdirected operations on a large scale in stocks
have been sufficient to rob me of a fortune.
Everything
that is supposed to be my own is mortgaged
for its full value. My means of raising money are
exhausted. The little sum in cash which is left to
my credit in the bank is ebbing daily. What am I
to do when it is quite gone? Bred as a
gentleman
,
with no profession, no pursuit, to what can I
turn my hand, whereby to wring from the hard
world a pittance for the support of myself and
family? I look around, and see but one means of
escape from degradation and ruin. It is in your
marriage with Fleetwood. I made you cultivate
that odious Mrs. Dryman with the view of meeting
him. You have succeeded; and circumstances
have favored us far more than we could have
hoped. I know the exact extent of Fleetwood's
pecuniary resources. They are immense. He is
a gentleman by birth and character, and any girl
might be proud of him as a husband. She, to
whom he has rashly engaged himself, isa
disreputable
person. There are ways of proving this
to his satisfactionand it will be done. How then
can you have any compunction, on her account,
about securing Fleetwood for yourself?
Do you mean to say, asked Emily, that in
any event, and independently of aught that I may
do, you shall break off this match of Fleetwood's?
Unquestionably. We have but to let him see
with his own eyes, and hear with his own ears,
and there is no fear but that he will repudiate the
girl, and with good and sufficient cause.
Emily was deeply concerned at the revelations
her father had made. She had no reason to doubt
them, for he had never deceived her. Accustomed
to plenty, and never knowing what it was to have
a demand for money refused, she recoiled with
dismay
from the prospect of actual poverty. And
then there were duties which she owed to others.
Her father's family was large and expensive. The
mother had died about two years before, leaving
six children, of whom Emily was the eldest. The
remaining five were considerably younger; and,
from motives of economy, Mr. Gordon had placed
them all at boarding-schools. What would become
of them in the event of such ruin and disaster as
threatened them, unless she came to the rescue?
Visions of orphan asylums, of milliner's apprentices,
and boys sent out to cruel task-masters to learn a
trade, flitted across her imagination, until, after
pacing the floor a few moments in an excited state
of mind, she placed her hand in her father's, and
exclaimed: I'll do it!
That's a brave girlthat's my own daughter,
said Mr. Gordon, rapturously. Forgive me,
Emily
,
if I have been harshand forget the cutting
things I may have said.
You had reason in saying them, my father.
Had I dreamed that your necessities were of so
serious a nature, you would not have found me so
obstinate. I had scruples, it is true, but what you
say of the impossibility of Fleetwood's marrying
when he knows the truth in regard to her to whom
he is affianced, has set my mind at ease. But do
you not exaggerate the power of my charms to
captivate this young man?
Not at all. If you do but set about it with a
will, you can easily accomplish your object. But
you must forget all about the Count, my dear.
That I will try to do, my fatheralthough, I
must say, that I think you were a little too hard
upon him.
Perhaps sobut you will confess that
Fleetwood
is certainly the more eligible match of the
two?
Yes, said Emily, with a sighthe more
eligible.
Mr. Gordon was right in calling his daughter a
woman of the world. But she occasionally
indulged
in day-dreams of what she might be could the
better part of her nature once gain the ascendant
and keep it. They had faded now.
But we are wasting time, said Mr. Gordon.
We must not leave Fleetwood any longer alone.
Emily cast a hasty glance at the mirror on her
toilet-tablere-arranged a stray curland, with
the glow of an anticipated conquest mantling her
cheeks, passed out of the room in advance of her
father. She descended the stairs slowly and
thoughtfully, as if to collect her thoughts in
reference
to the kind of tactics which she ought to adopt
towards Fleetwood. He was already under a
misapprehension in regard to the state of her
affections
.
Should she encourage it, and win his pity
under the pretence of a misplaced passion, or should
she, by an apparent invincibleness and a cold
indifference
to his fascinations, pique his vanity and
awaken the appetite of pursuit? She was still
undetermined
as to the course which it would be
most expedient for her to choose, when she entered
the parlor.
Fleetwood was pacing the saloon. His thoughts
were of Adelaide: he was trying to fix before his
mind's eye a perfect representation of her features.
But the expression varied like the shifting lights
upon a tree, whose leaves are blown by the wind.
Emily was near enough to touch him before he was
aware of her presence.
Your thoughts must be pleasant ones, said she,
while he started on regarding herI trust I have
not put them to flight.
Had they been sad ones, most assuredly you
would have done so, replied Fleetwood.
Ah, would that I might believe I had even that
power over you! sighed Emily.
Will you take a seat, or will you walk?
I will walk.
What could Fleetwood do but offer his arm?
And is she
very
beautifulshe to whom
who and Emily turned away her head as if to
hide her agitation. Then appearing to rally her
spirits, she exclaimed: Of course, she is beautiful
and she loves you devotedlypassionately?
Fleetwood felt her arm tremble in his. What
reason had he to doubt the reality of her apparent
emotionsto doubt that he had suddenly become
to her an object of the tenderest attachment?
But did he waver for an instant in his loyalty
towards
Adelaide? Not for an instant. And yet
a dangerous pity for Emily, who under such
circumstances
had conceived for him so utterly
hopeless
a passion, began to pull at his heart-strings.
The storm, which had been increasing in severity,
was now accompanied by tremendous peals of
thunder. Emily had inherited a nervous
susceptibility
to the sound. It never failed to awaken a
sort of frantic alarm, under the influence of which
she entirely lost her self-control. And now, at the
first peal, she clung with unaffected terror to
Fleetwood's arm. She had composure enough,
however, to say:
I am not myself when it thunderspray, call
my father quicklyquickly!
Fleetwood led her to a sofa, and went to pull the
bell. A minute elapsed, and no one came. He
was moving towards the entry to call Mr. Gordon
when another thunder-crash more violent than the
one which had preceded it, seemed to shake the
whole house.
Do not leave medo not leave me! shrieked
Emily, darting towards him, and almost fainting
in his arms.
He lifted her to bear her towards the sofa. Her
breast heaved against his own.
There is no affectation here, thought he, as he
felt the quick and violent throbbing of her heart,
and saw the color forsake her cheeks.
He sat by her sidehe held her handher head
rested upon his shoulderand his left arm circled
her waist. Her curls brushed his cheek.
The door was openedopened noiselesslyand
when, after a brief interval of silence, Fleetwood
looked up, he saw Count La Salle standing before
them.
With folded arms, his eyes flaming with jealousy,
and his lips quivering, La Salle stood and regarded
them. Fleetwood did not attempt to move Emily
from her position. At length her eyes opened, and
the first object they rested upon was La Salle.
She rose instantly to her feet, and assumed a look
of proud and dignified composure.
I see I have entered inopportunely, said the
Count. I am
de trop
I wish you joy,
Mademoiselle
,
of your new conquest. What pretty things
hearts are to play with! Won't you have
another
?
Had I ever given you any right, sir, to use
this language, returned Emily, it would still be
insolent; but having none, you are doubly
unmannerly
.
O, I did not expect to take you off your guard,
said the Countnot at all! A woman, who has
made up her mind to play the game, of which you
seem to be fond, must of course have tact and
self-possession
.
But why not give a hint to your
footman
not to admit visitors on such occasions as the
present? These
contretemps
must be provoking to
so consummate a diplomatist as yourself in affairs
of the heart. But I beg pardon. I am detaining
you from more agreeable pastimes.
Emily bowed, and replied: I shall be pleased
to see you prove that you are truly aware of that
fact.
It is a loving and a fair reply, Mademoiselle,
and one which I had reason to expect from the
character of our past intercourse.
There has been nothing in that, sir, which you
are not at liberty to proclaim to the whole world.
You have said it, Mademoiselle: and you are
impatient at my stay. I humbly take my leave.
You can take nothing, with which I would
more willingly part, retorted Emily, borrowing a
line from Hamlet.
I thank you for your amiable attempts to
exasperate
me, Mademoiselle, replied the Count, his
accents tremulous with rage. But I shall
compensate
myself for this treatment by deedsnot by
words. As for you, sir, continued he, turning to
Fleetwood, you have been a party to itan
innocent
one, perhaps, and yet a responsible one.
You may put what construction you please,
sir, upon anything I have done or may do, replied
Fleetwood, coldly.
I thank you, sir, for the privilege, returned La
Salle. As the man says in the play, the time
may come when I can cry
quittance!
Till then,
sir, farewell! And farewell to you, Mademoiselle.
La Salle strode out of the room without any
farther exhibition of his jealousy and spleen.
There was a cessation in the storm without.
His conduct is inexplicable, said Emily. I
assure you I have avoided that man and his
attentions
as much as possible.
Not knowing the relations that might exist
between
you, I could not venture to say much, said
Fleetwood.
There are no relations save those of ordinary
acquaintanceship, replied Miss Gordon.
Since we are no longer likely to be interrupted
by the thunder, perhaps you will let me hear the
sound of your harp-strings again? said
Fleetwood
,
taking her hand and leading her towards
the instrument.
What shall be the theme? inquired she.
Pardon meI forgotthere is but one theme
suitable to your frame of mind. And she heaved
a deep sigh.
Nay, Miss Gordon, my sympathies are not so
very exclusive as you seem to suppose. Sing to
suit yourself.
After a long and melancholy but exquisitely
melodiously
prelude, Emily sang those lines of Viola's,
She never told her love, so exquisitely wedded
to music by one of the masters of the English
school. Nothing could be more touching and
earnest than the expression she gave to the
passage
.
It seemed the out-gushing of a breaking
heart. Fleetwood was sensitively alive to the
influence
of sweet sounds; and his ears drank in the
last vibrations of her voice and harp with eager
attentionwith subdued feelings of commiseration
almost tenderness. Emily, after she had finished
the strain, buried her face a moment in her hands;
and then, looking up, with an apparent effort to be
gay, she said: I will sing you something less
gravelessin earnest. The last two words she
uttered in a whisper, as if to herself, but they were
not unheard by Fleetwood. Dashing her hand
over the strings, she carolled in a clear, triumphant
tone Ariel's enchanting strain, Where the bee
sucks, there lurk I.
Fleetwood was charmedany lover of music
would have beenby her singing.
Good night, Mr. Fleetwood, she said, rising
suddenly at the conclusion of the melody. It is
growing latethe servant will wait upon you to
your apartmentor, if my father has not retired, I
will send him to you. Good night!
Her utterance was slightly choked, as she
hurriedly
said these words.
Good night, Miss Emily; and may your dreams
be as pleasant as Ariel's own.
Emily was moving towards the door. She
turned
as if to reply to Fleetwood's kind wish, and then
as if she dared not trust her voice, she abruptly
quitted the room. Shortly afterwards Mr. Gordon
entered, and conducted his young guest to the
apartment he was to occupy for the night.
The style in which this sleeping-room was fitted
up, accorded with the magnificence of the rest of
the house. The walls were hung with crimson
silk. The carpet was one of the softest and
thickest
ever woven by a Turkish loom. The bed was
small, low and simply constructed, but gilt so as to
resemble massive gold. Two immense mirrors,
reaching from the ceiling to the floor, and imbedded
in the wall, occupied the principal part of the space
on either side of the richly carved marble
fire-piece
.
Fleetwood held a candle in his hand, and as he
advanced towards one of these mirrors, he started
and trembled at the reflection of an image, the
lineaments of which were stamped indelibly upon
his memory. Was it a false creation proceeding
from the heat-oppressed brain? For a moment
he stood spell-bound. He then turned his head
slowly to see whence the reflection came. It was
from a painting on the walla painting of a young
and beautiful femalehow like it was to Adelaide!
Whose portrait is that? he earnestly asked.
Mr. Gordon hesitated, and bit his lip with
suppressed
vexation. But Fleetwood's eyes were
fixed upon the painting, and he did not notice his
host's confusion.
That is a fancy-piece, said Mr. Gordon,
quickly
recovering his self-possession. The artist was
painting Emily, but failing in the likeness, he
converted
it into what you see.
Strange! murmured Fleetwoodit is so like
Adelaide Winfield, that I should suppose she had
sat for it.
Ah, a lover's eyes sometimes detects
resemblances
which no one else can discover, said Mr.
Gordon, assuming an indifferent tone. May you
be haunted, Frederick, by no visions less fair!
Good night!
Good night, sir! This room looks like the
very sanctuary of sleeptired nature's sweet
restorer, balmy sleep! One can hardly tread the
carpet without a sensation of drowsiness. Good
night!
Once more Fleetwood was alone. He stood for
some minutes with the candle uplifted over his
head, gazing at the portrait, which had excited his
surprise and curiosity.
A singular coincidence! murmured he, at
length placing the candle upon the mantel; and
then, sinking into a chair, which invitingly spread
its arms before him, he mused upon the occurrences
of the day. Poor Emily! How she struggles
to hide the misplaced and wholly hopeless affection
which cannot be disguised! I will avoid her
henceforth
.
Could I ever have loved her, had I not seen
Adelaide? Let me compare the two. The one
debarred from all society, possesses yet a native
dignity and grace far more winning than any that
education could give. She only knows the world
from books. With few to love and very few to
praise, she has the
besoin d'aimer
to a degree that
is all the more intense because it has never found
objects on which to lavish its wealth. Look on
the other picturehere is Emily, who for years
has been a pet of societyhas had admirers, lovers,
perhaps, without numberstill she seems to
preserve
her freshness of feelingalthough
occasionally
the traits of the hackneyed woman of the world
break forth. She is an enigmaand must be
studied profoundly to be known. On the contrary,
you can read Adelaide's character at the first
interview
.
Her ingenuousness is the most perfect that
I ever witnessed in a human being. She is the
only woman I ever met, whom I could not believe
to be capable of a stratagem. Feminine in all her
attributes, she has yet acquired from intercourse
with masculine minds in books a certain intellectual
vigor, which it is hard to reconcile with her
uniform
gentleness. Compare the two in point of
personal attractions, and Adelaide's superiority
must be unquestioned. In accomplishments too
she excels. Both are musicalbut Emily's voice
reminds me of concert-rooms and prima donnas,
while Adelaide's suggests dreams of angelic
harmonies
.
Yes, Adelaide, thou art in every way the
worthier of my choiceay, worthier,
notwithstanding
thou art nameless, friendless and unclaimed
worthier even wert thou scorned by all the world,
save my own idolizing heart!
Fleetwood took one last look at the portrait;
and then, perceiving by a glance at his watch that
the hour was late, he laid himself down to sleep
nor did he long have to woo the influence of that
power which knits up the ravelled sleeve of care.
A soft but profound slumber soon sealed up his
senses.
All at once he started from his bed with his eyes
wide open, and a vague consciousness of the
presence
of some one in the room. He looked about
him, exclaiming at the same moment, Who's
there? The weather had changed since he had
been asleep. The storm had passed away, and the
moon rode brightly in the skies, pouring a flood of
lustre into the room through the openings in the
saffron curtains, which fell in rich folds before the
windows.
Fleetwood started to his feet. He could have
sworn he saw a shadow move across the wall
opposite to the windows. He turned in the
direction
of the light. He distinctly saw the curtain
move, and heard it rustle. Repeating his
exclamation
of Who's there? he rushed to the embrasure.
The window was closedso it was not possible
that the wind could have created the motion.
There was no one behind the curtainsno vestige,
no sound of a visitor. Nor could he discover any
mode of egress. There were inside
window-shutters
.
He unfolded them. The wall seemed solid
behind themand there was no sign of any
contrivance
by which they could be made to give
way.
Pshaw! said Fleetwood, returning to his
couch. It must have been a delusionI was
dreaming.
CHAPTER XII.
I am in,
And must go on: and since I have put off
From the shore of innocence, guilt be now my pilot!
Massinger
.
After
parting with his daughter on the stairs,
previous
to her entering the saloon where Fleetwood
was in waiting, Mr. Gordon anxiously revolved in
his mind the circumstances which had that day
come to his knowledge.
So! muttered he, as he pushed his fingers
through his hair, and lifted it from his hot forehead
my young man has chosen for a mate that very
girl, whose existence for the last ten years has
given
me so many uneasy momentsand, who
threatens
to stand soon, like the inexorable angel of fate,
between me and renewed affluence. Hell itself
must have brought about this conjunction. How
shall it be averted? Emily's fascinations will not
be enough to break his allegiance. He is of a
constant
and generous temper. Nor will it be enough
to persuade him that Adelaide is doubly the child
of shame. No circumstance of birth will alter his
feelings of attachment. But could he be made to
believe her individually unworthy!for instance
could he be made to imagine that some hereditary
wantonness lingered in her bloodthat would be
devilish!no, no, noit were a plot worthy of
fiends!
Mr. Gordon walked hastily across the entry, as
if to escape the suggestion which had presented
itself
to his mind. What he at first shuddered at, he
at length embraced.
It is the most sure and effective mode, said he,
resuming his soliloquyindeed it is the only one,
which I at present see for detaching him from the
pursuit. But how is it to be managed? Ay, that
indeed! We must first discover how the land lies.
I must see Augusta at once, and learn what I can
about the girl. If the mother is bent on this match,
the obstacles in the way of its prevention will be
formidable. But perhaps she is ignorant of it as
yetfor it is very evident that Fleetwood knows
nothing about herhis prospective mother-in-law.
We must move promptly if at all in this affair. I
will seek Augusta this very hour. Ha! that was
a rousing peal! Poor Emily must be in hysterics
by this time. How the rain pours! No matter.
The game is an important one to meand must be
won. The luck has held good thus far,why
should it not continue to the end?
Throwing his Mackintosh over his shoulders,
and seizing his hat and umbrella, Gordon issued
from the front door into the wet and gloomy street.
The water poured in turbid torrents along the
gutters
on either side. The roar of the wind and the
dashing of the rain drowned every other sound.
The gas lights shed but a dim lustre through the
thick drops that were flowing down the glass
sides, that protected them from extinction.
Gordon hurried along the sidewalk of the stately
street, in which he dwelt, until, reaching the main
thoroughfare of the city, he traversed it for nearly
6
half a mile, and then turned the corner into a cross
street, where the houses were mostly of a mean
and squalid appearance. Onwards he hurried,
until
he stopped before one, which though surrounded
by inferior habitations, was in itself neat and
commodious
in its external appearance. Without
pausing to question himself as to the purpose of his
mission, he rang the bell vehemently. While he
yet stood on the steps, a carriage was heard rattling
over the pavements; and, the moment afterwards,
it drew up before the house. The coachman
descended
from his seat, and opened the door of the
vehicle. A female thrust out her head, and cried:
coachman, give the bell a thundering pull!
Gordon recognised the figure and voice of the
speaker. It was she, whom he had come to seek.
So leaving it to the coachman to summon the
servants
to the door, he approached the carriage to
make himself known to the inmate and offer the
protection of his umbrella.
Why, Gordon, you don't say this is you? said
Mrs. Winfield as the light of the coach-lamp
struggling
through the surrounding mist was reflected
on his features.
Hush! I did not perceive that you had a
companion
,
said Gordon drawing back so as not to be
observed.
Do not be concerned, whispered Mrs.
Winfield
:
she does not know you, though you may
know herit is Adelaide.
Saints and fiends! Is it possible? exclaimed
Gordon in a low, husky tone. But this is
strange!
The door of the house was at length opened by
a black female servant. Gordon handed Mrs.
Winfield
up the steps into the entry; and, returning to
the coach, accosted Adelaide as she was
descending
and offered her his arm.
It is a fearful storm, young ladylet me assist
you into the house, said Gordon, an involuntary
emotion of tenderness coming over him.
Adelaide accepted the proffered supportand
the next moment Gordon stood in the entry with
the two females. He looked from one to the other
with undisguised interest and astonishment. The
door was closedand the carriage was soon heard
rattling away.
They followed Mrs. Winfield up stairs to a
parlor
neatly furnished, and lights being brought,
Adelaide
gazed inquiringly around, and then sank
fatigued
into a chair.
You are weary, my dear, said Mrs. Winfield,
patting her on the forehead. Nay, you must not
feel disappointed because your lover did not meet
you at the boat to escort you. It was hardly fair
to expect him in such a storm.
Irene, said Mrs. Winfield, addressing the
black, show Miss Adelaide to the sleeping-room
over head. My dear child, you need repose. Do
not doubt but your lover will be here to see you the
first thing in the morning. Rest content.
Your advice is good, returned Adelaide; I
feel strangely wearied and depressed.
She approached as if with the intent of kissing
her mother's cheek, but as she drew near she
seemed
to recoil, and then with an effort she lifted her
hand to her lips, bade her good night, made a slight
courtesy to Mr. Gordon, and, addressing Irene
kindly, bade her lead on to bed.
And now, tell me, Augusta, what does all this
mean? exclaimed Gordon, rising hastily and
taking
a seat by Mrs. Winfield, as the door closed
upon Adelaide and her attendant.
It's a long story, Gordon, and I have not made
up my mind whether or no I shall tell you. While
I am considering the matter let me know what has
brought
you
here?
I have learned by the merest accident that
Adelaide is engaged to be married.
Ay. You have not been misinformed.
You know it yourself, then?
To be sure I do! Proceed.
Fleetwood, the young man, to whom she has
affianced herself, has been my guest this very day
he is now at my house, and will pass the night
thereI had the intelligence of his engagement
from his own lips.
That is strange indeed! strange, strange
indeed
!
exclaimed Mrs. Winfield. How have we
managed, Gordon, without any concert, to get both
the lovers into our hands? I do not understand
that.
It was partly accident and partly design,
replied
Gordon. I did not know when I invited
Fleetwood to dine with me to-day that he had any
intention of marrying, or that he knew such a being
as AdelaideI was damnably startled, as you may
suppose, when he communicated the fact.
Well; and now that you know it, what would
you do?
Prevent the union for both our sakes.
I can see how it will affect your interests, but
not so readily how it will reach mine.
Do you wish to part at once with all control
over Adelaideto have her wedded to a man, who
will forbid your ever seeing her again, when she is
once his wife?
And is Fleetwood such a man?
Most undoubtedly. He comes of a haughty
family, and, if he marries Adelaide, he will only do
so upon condition that she drops all intercourse
with her motherwith you. She will place her
duty to her husband far above that which she owes
to you, whom she has known hardly a week.
From what I have seen of the girl I think you
have judged her rightly, Gordon. Not to keep you
longer in suspense, I have already made up my
mind that she shall not marry Fleetwood were he
ten times as rich as he is.
I rejoice to hear it. You consult your own
dignity and happiness in rejecting this alliance. Adelaide must either not marry at all, or she must
be sent abroad, and marry a foreigner.
I have my own plans for the girl, Gordon.
She would succeed admirably on the stage, and I
have told her so.
We will not discuss that question now, said
Gordon impatiently. What we must consider is,
how shall we break off this matchfor I suppose
you are aware that the marriage day is fixed.
O, I know all about it. Will you believe me
the little hussy refused to yield to my entreaties,
my commands to accompany me to the city. It
was only by stratagem that we got her here.
Indeed! How was that?
You must know that there is another party,
who has taken an interest in the affair. You
remember
young Glenhamthe unmarried one, I
mean?
I have a bowing acquaintance with him, as a
member of the same club.
He is himself as anxious as we can be to
prevent
this marriageeither from love for the girl or
hatred of Fleetwood, I don't know which. At any
rate he suggested and carried out the contrivance,
by which we have been able to induce Adelaide to
come with me peaceably to this place.
And what was Master Glenham's notable
project
?
He persuaded the girl to address a letter to her
lover asking his consent to accompany me. After
that, it was an easy matter to frame such a reply as
suited our purposes.
Ah! I perceivethe way it was done was by
forgery.
Exactly.
But has Adelaide suspected nothing?
I have yet seen no serious signs of distrust.
The only surprise she has evinced was on board
the steamboat, when, after reading and re-reading
the letter and examining every fold, she exclaimed,
`I wonder why he did not seal it with that little
watch-key he carries, containing a stone engraved
with his initialsbut perhaps he was in so much of
a hurry that he took the seal, which was most
convenient
and
yet what could have been more
convenient
than that?' These were her very words.
It will be an easy matter, returned Gordon,
to procure the watch-key should we have
occasion
to send her any more letters. But where is
Glenham? He may be made useful.
He will be in the city early to-morrow.
Send him to me the moment he arrives. You
agree with me in the determination to prevent this
marriage?
To be sure I do! If it cannot be prevented
by fair means, it must be by foul.
My sentiments precisely! and Master
Glenham's
too, if I may judge from the trouble he has
already taken.
I readily detect
your
motives, Gordon, for
defeating
the plans of the lovers. You are afraid
that Fleetwood may be rich enough to buy a
certain
Hush! hush! said Gordon, anxiously placing
his hand before the lips of the speakeryou
misapprehend
indeed
you are mistakencannot you
make a shrewder guess?have you forgotten that
I have a daughter about Fleetwood's age, or
perhaps
a year or two older, whom I would see
married
?
And who more eligible than he?
True! that may be an additional reason why
you would break up this threatened alliance, said
Mrs. Winfield. But at the same time, I know
well enough, that you are afraid I may be bought
that I may
I protest against your entertaining any such
suspicion, exclaimed Gordon, looking around, as
if fearful there might be listeners. Do not
suppose
me so ungratefulso unjust
Well, wellit matters not, said Mrs.
Winfield
,
we are agreed upon the point, which
immediately
claims our attentionFleetwood must be
made to give up the idea of marrying Adelaide
how is that to be done?
We have three days yet, returned Gordon,
in which to contrive somethinghe will not
probably
leave the city till Friday. If Glenham is
really jealous I am willing to trust to his invention
to plot the means of effecting our objectthere is
nothing which so sharpens the inventive faculties
as jealousy.
You are right. We will therefore come to no
decision until we have consulted with Glenham.
Now then, I will take my leave, said Gordon,
risingyou need repose after your journeygood
night, Augusta!
Good night to you, GordonI shall see you
again, soon, I suppose?
Gordon moved towards the doorthen paused
irresolutely, as if he had something to say, to which
he did not well know how to give expression.
I had but a moment's glance at Adelaide, said
he at lengthbut I could see that she has grown
up into a beautiful and well-bred womanshe will
be securethat is, she will meet with nothing to
excite her distrustunder your roof? She knows
nothing yet, I presume, except that you are her
mother?
You would know if my biography is familiar
to her?do not be alarmedI will be discreet
she shall meet with nothing to awaken her distrust,
if I can help it.
Everything depends on you, my dear. So,
once more, good night!
Gordon hastened homeward. The thunder
shower had ceased by the time he reached the door
of his house; and the moon broke forth from a
circle
of purple clouds, displacing the thick gloom
which had enshrouded the city.
Let me consideris there anything more for
me to do to-night? mused he as he stood upon his
door-steps. Aythere is the seal, which
Adelaide
missedhow shall I procure it? I have it
Fleetwood shall occupy the crimson sleeping-room
the spring door behind the window-shutter will
admit meI can easily detach the watch-key from
the chain. Should he miss it in the morning he
will naturally suppose that he has dropped it on the
carpetay, that will dobut is not this business
villainous?no matterthe first step has been
taken
,
and it would be dastardly now to retreat.
Gordon turned to ring the bell, when the door
opened, and La Salle made his appearance.
Good evening, Count! Are you in haste?
said Gordon.
I
am
in haste, replied La Salle. I wish you
good evening, sir.
Something has ruffled him, thought Gordon, as
he entered and closed the doorcan it be that
Emily has made love before his eyes to Fleetwood?
That must be it! Ay, she has played her part
well. If so, we may yet find it for our advantage
to make La Salle one of the
dramatis person
of
this little plot. I have a dim, floating idea that he
can be made usefulbut how?
CHAPTER XIII.
He shooktwas but an instant
For speedily the pride
Ran crimson to his heart,
Till all chances he defied.
It threw boldness on his forehead;
Gave firmness to his breath.
Barry Cornwall
.
The
Friday following the events we have just
recounted, Fleetwood having completed his
business
with Mr. Dryman, sat down to address notes
to the two friends, whom he had selected to
accompany
him with their wives to Soundside, to
witness
the ceremony of his marriage the next day.
He had already spoken to them in regard to his
wishes, and they had readily accepted his
invitation
.
His present object was to apprise them of
the hour fixed for the departure of the steamboat.
The weather was bright and warm. The fountain
in the Park was leaping and flashing in the
sunlight
,
and the foliage of the adjacent trees waved
cheerily in the fresh, clear atmosphere.
Fleetwood had hardly set pen to paper, when he
was disturbed by the entrance of a servant, who
brought in Mr. Glenham's card with the
announcement
that the gentleman was waiting in the
corridor
.
Show him in! said Fleetwood eagerly; for
he thought his visitor might bring news of
Adelaide
.
6*
The acquaintance between these two young men
had begun at college; and though it had never
ripened to anything like intimacy, it was yet of
that character, which is apt to make associates of
persons, whenever accident or convenience brings
them together, where they are almost necessarily
thrown into each other's society. Fleetwood had
always regarded Glenham as a good-natured sort
of person, rather selfish, perhaps, but harmless
one of those characters
Who want, while through blank life they dream along,
Sense
to be right, and
passion
to be wrong.
He little supposed that under a sluggish exterior,
were concealed impulses of the most reckless and
ungovernable nature. His first disgust at Glenham
was in his last interview with him, when the latter
spoke disparagingly of Adelaide. But Fleetwood
was one who wrote the injuries he received on
sandthe benefits, on brass; and as Glenham now
entered he rose and extended his hand with an air
of cordial welcome.
You are welcome from Soundside, Glenham.
What news do you bring? said he, drawing him
into the room and placing a chair for his
accommodation
.
The expression of Glenham's face was gloomy,
and even stern; and he returned Fleetwood's
salute
simply by a pressure of the hand.
Why, what is the matter, man? You look as
serious as an undertaker. What has happened?
Is Adelaide unwell? Fleetwood spoke earnestly;
and his looks betrayed that he felt even more
concern
than his words expressed.
Glenham leaned forward; and, taking
Fleetwood's
hand in both of his, he pressed it, and
heaved
a deep sigh.
Wellout with it, Glenhamin Heaven's name
what has happened? asked Fleetwood, striving to
curb his emotion.
Ah, Fleetwood, summon all your philosophy to
your aid; for you will need it, said Glenham at
length accompanying the remark with another
long-drawn
sigh.
Good heavens! I understandI seeAdelaide
is dead! exclaimed Fleetwood, while the color
forsook his cheeks, and his knees smote each other.
No, no, it is not death, Fleetwoodit is
something
worsesomething worse.
In mercy's name, what do you mean? Do not
keep me in this state of suspense. You will drive
me to frenzy. What have you to communicate?
I have learned, my dear friend, that the mother
of the unfortunate girl, in whom we have both
become
so much interested, is an infamous person
that her very name is a by-word among the
dissolute
and
that it is enough to disgrace either man
or woman to be seen entering her house.
Can it be? Alas! alas!
Fleetwood covered his face with his hands, and
groaned inwardly.
Glenham walked to the window and looked out
upon the fountain, on the principle of letting one
arrow take full effect before he sent another, which
should go straight to the heart.
Shame and infamy! Can Ican I wed this
girl, thought Fleetwood, under these dreadful
circumstances? The stain of illegitimacy was
nothing compared to this! My lovemy single,
ardent and still increasing loveeasily cleared
that
barrier. But thisgracious powers! can I
consent
to become the son-in-law of apah! the word
sticks in my throatI cannot breathe it even to
my own soul! What would my father, with his
lofty and chivalrous notions of what a woman
should bewhat would my high-born mother, who
alone of all women, exemplified those notions in
her characterwhat would they have said, seeing
me in this conjuncture? Stay! It is not what
they might have said, blinded by the mists of
earth-born
prejudice, which should guide mebut what
they would say nowilluminated spirits
receiving
from God himself an influx of wisdom and love
of light and life. Would they say, desert this
poor girl, now that you find her parentage infamous
desert her, though she be an angelthough she
be the elected one of thy heart, for whom its first,
best tribute of affection has been poured out
desert
her, not for any misdeeds of her own, but
because
from her very birth she is the child of
misfortune
would
their advice be of this complexion?
Would they not rather saytake her, and save
her from the pernicious influence and example of
an unworthy parentsave her from the jeers of
the world and the insults of brutal mensave her
while she is yet innocent and young!if her moral
nature be tainted with hereditary evils, thy love,
thy care, thy generous devotion shall eradicate
thembut good angels seem to have already
spared
thee that taskfor, as you have eyes to see,
and a mind to apprehend, is she not good and fair?
Such would be the language of those parents
now
yes; I could almost believe that they had, by
some spiritual telegraph, hardly more wonderful
and incomprehensible than that which we call
magnetic
,
communicated their will to my soul. I obey
and cheerfully! Dear Adelaide, your cause has
triumphedinvisible advocates have pleaded for
youand yet not more eloquently than my own
heart!
Fleetwood rose suddenly, and paced the room
with firm and regular strides. The generous
resolution
,
at which he had arrived, had lit up his
whole face with an expression of radiant benignity
and intrepid self-reliance. He looked every inch
the herothe hero in that moment of greatest
conquest
the
conquest over the suggestions of
selfishness
and fear of the world's displeasure.
Glenham could not conceal his surprise, as he
turned and regarded his companion after the
interval
of silence which both had observed.
An agreeable family to marry intois it not?
said he, supposing, as a matter of course, that
Fleetwood
had arrived at a conclusion favorable to his
wishes.
My purpose remains unaltered, said
Fleetwood
.
What you have told me in regard to
Adelaide's parentage is painful enough, as you may
suppose, but it does not affect my confidence in her
own purity and worth. I am fixed in my
resolution
to marry her to-morrow.
But Fleetwoodahem! Are you not a little
too precipitate in this affair? Would it not be well
for you to examine a little more closely into the
history and character of this young person?
I am willing to stake my lifeor what is more,
the happiness of my lifeon her truth.
But think of the world's sarcasms.
It would be cowardly in me to regard them so
far as to break my plighted faith to one whom I
believed worthy to be my wife.
Wellas a married man it won't do for you to
visit your mother-in-law yourselfbut you must
not be surprised if some of your bachelor friends
should ask you for letters of introduction.
You grow impertinent, sir. I can dispense
with your farther presence.
Glenham saw that he had gone too far.
I ask your pardon, Fleetwood, said he, with
apparent earnestness; but if I have seemed to
taunt you, it was to induce you to break off this
match without communicating to you all the reasons
which render it impossible for you to consummate
it. But I see that I must tell you allin doing so
I cannot fail to agitateto distress youbut you
will forgive me when you become satisfied of the
truth.
Against whom are your intimations levelled?
Against Adelaide.
Then I refuse to hear them. Leave me! O,
this is a worthy office for a
man
to attempt to
blast the prospects of an unprotected and
unfortunate
girl!
My friendship shall steel me against your
rebukes
.
It is my duty to proclaim to you the truth.
The girl is unworthy of youshe has not only
inherited
dishonor, but won it for herselfshe is
Insolent liar! shouted Fleetwood; and with
one bound he sprang upon Glenham, and seizing
him by the neck forced him upon his knees.
Unsay
,
he continued, gaspinglyunsay that
dastardly
slander, or, on the spot, I will tear out your filthy
tongue by the roots! And as he spoke he nearly
choked Glenham in his ungovernable wrath.
You will repent thisindeed you will,
ejaculated
the latter, struggling in his iron grasp.
Leave me, coward! exclaimed Fleetwood,
dashing him from him so that he fell upon the
floor.
Glenham rose and re-arranged his dress, which
had been somewhat ruffled under the severe
treatment
to which he had been subjected. His face
was of an ashy pallor, and his lips quivered with
the fury he was tasking all his powers to suppress.
He paced the room three or four times, and then
approaching Fleetwood, who stood with folded
arms regarding his movements, he said:
I shall expect reparation for these indignities
in due time. You deserve no farther mercy at my
hands, and did I desire the most consummate
vengeance
,
I need do no more than urge on this
disgraceful
alliance, upon which you seem bent. But
even under the smart of most unwarrantable injury
I will not withhold intelligence which I should feel
bound to communicate were you my deadliest foe.
Your visit to Soundside will be wholly unnecessary.
Adelaide Winfield is not there. She is now in this
cityin her mother's houseand if you wish to
convince yourself of her unworthiness, I can give
you an opportunity of doing so beyond the shadow
of a doubt. By the testimony of your own eyes,
your own ears, you shall satisfy yourself that she
is
Beware! shouted Fleetwood, his fingers
working
as if he were half inclined to try their sinews
again upon the speaker's throatand then, as the
possibility of the truth of the revelation flashed
across his mind, he sank with relaxed limbs into a
chair, and fixed a searching gaze upon Glenham.
You say you can give me visible proof of the
truth of what you aver, he beganhow can you
do it, and when?
How
I can do it, I will not describe. It is
enough for me to assure you that I
will
do it to
your perfect satisfaction. As for the
when
I can
do itit shall be this evening, at eight o'clock.
Fool! I see it allyou would detain me here
till it is too late for me to leave for Soundside so
as to be punctual to my appointment. It is all a
wretched conspiracy!
At what time are you obliged to leave in the
steamboat this afternoon?
At three o'clock.
It is now half past twelve. Meet me here at
half past one, and, before two, you shall see what
shall convince you of my truthmy zeal in your
behalfand your own ungrateful rashness.
Could you do
that
, you would make me the
most abject as well as the most miserable of men,
so that you would be sure of ample reparation for
the outrages you have encountered. If you are
lyingas I believe you arethe sooner you fly
from my path the better for your safety. I will be
here at the hour you have named. Be prompt to
a momentto the fraction of a secondor I shall
spurn your proposition to accompany you. Now
leave mefor you have made me inconceivably
wretched.
This is but a joke to the dose that is to come,
muttered Glenham. Oh, my dear friend, but you
shall pay dearly for this day's frolic! And then
speaking aloud, he said: In less than an hour I
will returnyou will be hereI will take such
steps that you shall be under no doubt either as to
my motives or the truth of my communication.
Once more, sir, I say I will a wait your coming,
returned Fleetwood, impatiently.
Without more words, Glenham took his
departure
,
and Fleetwood, his eyes fixed upon his
unfinished
letters, reflected upon the scene which had
just transpired, and the startling communications
which had been made.
Nothing but ocular proof of the most
unequivocal
character shall make me doubt her, he
soliloquised
.
Mere circumstantial evidence shall not
be enough. It must be open as dayaudible and
visible! But should she be innocent, as she
undoubtedly
is, with what face can I meet her after
listening for a moment to Glenham's monstrous
insinuations! But he says she is herein the city;
and he offers to prove it to my satisfaction this very
hour. Surely he would not hazard such an
assertion
except upon sufficient grounds. No, no! He
has met some one in the street who resembles her
Emily Gordon, perhapsand his busy
imagination
has built up this story of shame and guilt.
May heaven in its mercy strike me lifeless should
it prove true!
CHAPTER XIV.
Was it not a web worthy of fiends?
Washington Allston
.
A bright
and beautiful morning succeeded the
stormy night of Adelaide's arrival in the city. The
atmosphere had been purified by the thunder, and
the streets by the profuse rain. But no sunshine,
however radiant, could render interesting the
prospect
upon which Adelaide looked out, when, after
a profound and protracted slumber, she threw open
the blinds which were attached to the windows of
her sleeping-room. Dilapidated sheds, dirty areas,
and decayed fences were the principal features in
the picture. How different from the view which
would have greeted her in her own little room at
Soundside! She thought of the friendly elm, which
with its strong arms extended as if for protection,
kept watch and ward beside her till she almost
persuaded herself it had a sort of affection for her
presence, and would wave its leafy boughs more
joyously as she approached. She now missed the
spectacle of its glistening verdure freshened by the
thunder shower of the past night.
Anxiously throughout the day did Adelaide
expect
Fleetwood's coming, or some message from him
expressive of the cause of his delay. It was not
till evening that her apprehensions were quieted.
A letter was then placed in her hands, and on
looking
at the seal a smile of satisfaction came over her
face on seeing that the impression she had formerly
missed was there. The writer said that business
of a sudden and imperious nature had taken him
out of the city. Had his own interests merely been
involved, no inducements could have made him
forego the pleasure of being the first to greet
Adelaide
on her arrival; but unfortunately there were
persons who looked to him for countenance and
support, and he could not disappoint their
reasonable
expectations. He would return to the city
probably before Saturdayat any rate nothing
should detain him beyond that dayand he saw
nothing to defer their nuptials beyond the period
originally fixed.
The tone of the letter was affectionateand
Adelaide attributed to haste the defects of style
which she could not but notice. A few passages
from the diary she was in the habit of keeping will
not be inappropriate here:
Tuesday
.At length I am in the city. We
arrived here last night in the midst of a thunder
shower. I am in my mother's house. Oh! dare
I entrust to these pages, with their locked clasp,
the thoughts which that word awakens! Why
should I prefer the solitude of my room to
companionship
with one who is bound to me by the
tenderest of ties? Why should I recoil from her
embraces? Why should I shrink from her very
touch? Is it not because I have lived so long
within
myselfbecause I have so narrowed by disuse
the circle of my sympathies? Alas, I fear this is
not the only cause. She is distasteful to me. I
shun her as I never shunned living thing beforeI,
who have often lifted a wounded snake in my hands
from the dusty road, and placed it where it might
recover and be secure from harm!
And yet she has not shown herself ungentle.
She lives all alone in this well-furnished house, and
keeps two colored servants to wait upon her. She
receives few visitors, and does not go at all into
society
.
A gentleman named Gordon met us here
last night on our arrival. He seemed to be an old
friend of my mother's. His manners and
appearance
were such that my heart warmed towards
him strangely at first. And then a sense of
distrust
came over meI knew not whyit must
have been from the wavering of his glance while
he regarded me.
I was wretched enough last night at not
meeting
Fleetwood. Why was he not at the
landing-place
to receive us? Or, why was he not at least
in waiting for our arrival here? Could the storm
have prevented him? That was hardly a
sufficient
excuse. He must have been unwell.
Nothing
but illness could have detained him on such an
occasion. And why does he not make his
appearance
or send some message to me this morning?
It is strange indeed. I have been pacing my room
these two hours; and my imagination has
conjured
up a thousand different reasons for his absence.
This suspense is dreadful. I have taken up my pen
as much to escape from the anxious thoughts that
pursue me as to add another page to my well-filled
diary.
At the breakfast table this morning my mother,
strangely and abruptly enough, asked me how I
would like to be an actress. Is it possible that she
contemplates my entering upon such a pursuit?
Does she expect to prevent my union with
Fleetwood
?
Poor woman! She will find that she is
powerless to induce me to reject him. No human
authority shall avail to make me violate my
plighted
word. I am prepared to grapple with the
sternest obstaclesand yet, why should there be
any? How could a mother object to her
daughter's
marriage to such a man as Fleetwood?
I have no predilections in favor of the stage.
I have been taught to regard it as a school of
depravity
.
And yet I see no reason why it should
not be made a great moral engine. How can an
important moral truth be impressed so forcibly
upon
the conviction as by a picture of life itselfof
the workings of the passionsand the consequences
to which they lead? But the accompaniments of
the stagethe abuses to which they tendare, it
is said, pernicious and demoralizing. Perhaps so.
I have never entered a theatre in my life. But I
will not believe that a man like Shakespeare would
have upheld an institution, which he believed
essentially
injurious to his fellow-men:and who
had such opportunities and such capacities as he
had of judging of its effects? Luther
recommended
the acting of comedies even in schools. `In
comedies,' he says, `particularly in those of the
Roman writers, the duties of the various situations
of life are held out to view, and as it were
reflected
from a mirror. The office of parents and the
conduct of children are faithfully delineated; and
what to young men may be advantageous, the vices
and characters of profligate women are exhibited
in their true colors. Excellent lessons are given
to them how they should conduct themselves
towards
virtuous women in courtship. Strong
exhortations
to matrimony are brought forward,
without which state no government can subsist:
celibacy is the plageu of any nation.' Well said,
Luther!
It is notorious that St. Paul did not think it
unbecoming
to quote a line from Menander, the Greek
play writer, in his Epistle to the Corinthians, when
writing on a subject as awful as the resurrection
of the dead. The same apostle cites more than
once expressions from the dramatic poets; and
although
theatres were numerous in the times of our
Saviour they seem to have provoked no censure
from him and his disciples. Archbishop Tillotson,
speaking of plays, says `they may be so framed,
and governed by such rules, as not only to be
innocently
diverting, but instructing and useful, to put
some follies and vices out of countenance, which
cannot be so decently reproved, nor so effectually
exposed and corrected any other way.'
It has been a favorite custom with the
members
of certain sects among us, not only to denounce
the stage, but to decry dancing as an immoral
pastime
.
Ah! to the pure all things are pure. The
mind viciously disposed can extract poison from the
purest and holiest amenities of life. That which is
a salutary and refreshing food to some souls may
be deleterious to others according to their state of
reception. So where the physical system is
concerned
the
ripe and luscious fruit, which refreshes
one, may injure anotherbut must we therefore cut
down our fruit trees? Must dancing be abolished
because to some it may not be attended with the
same cheering and blameless influences, which it
brings to others? And thou
`Thou, my sweet Shakespeare,thou, whose touch awakes
The inmost heart of virtuous Sympathy;
Thou, oh! divinest poet, at whose voice
Sad Pity weeps, or guilty Terror drops
The blood-stain'd dagger from his palsied hand'
Shall we be told that
thou
art pander to the
crimi
nal?
It is night-fall; and yet Fleetwood has not
comehe has not sent even a messagea token
Can it be thathark! There is a ringing at the
door bell! Can it be he? The door opens
closesthere is the sound of a footfall on the stairs
alas! it is not hisit is the black
waiting-woman
,
Irenewhat can she want?
At last a letter from Fleetwood! And the
little
seal I missed from his last letter is here! I
have read it. Business has called him from the
citybusiness, in which the interests of others are
involved. It is well. I have no cause to
complain
.
Shall I ever forget one of those expressions he
made to me during our walk on that eventful day,
when he first surprised me by the avowal of his
affection
?
`I have none but you,' he said, `to love
me and to love!' Ah, Fleetwood, I may say the
same in regard to yourselffor although I have
found a mother, I feel that I should be more
desolate
than ever, but for that more precious and
all-compensating
tie, which binds my fate to yours.
Is it not strange that we should both have lived up
to the very period of our betrothal so separated
from kindred and from friends? I sometimes
almost
feel a pang of regret that I am not still on an
equality with Fleetwood in this poverty of kindred
connectionsI sometimes almost wish that I were
motherless still! This is ungratefulit is impious
I must conquer such thoughts.
Thursday
. A day has passed since I last took
up my pen to record what has transpired in my
own little world of thoughts and emotions. I have
had no new message from Fleetwood. Ah! if he
knew with what veneration I cherished the
slightest
token from his hand he would surely write. I
have driven out with my mother several times in a
close carriage with the blinds down. Why should
she be thus careful to conceal herself from the
public
gaze? Or is it I she wishes to keep hidden?
There is some mystery about this. She objects
even to my walking in Broadway, although the
weather is most inviting at present. But this
restraint
must soon end. Fleetwood will be here by
Saturday, and thenI hear my mother's step upon
the stairs.
Adelaide clasped her book, and laid down her
pen, as Mrs. Winfield entered.
I have brought you good news, delightful news,
said this woman in a coarse, loud voice.
Has Fleetwood returned? exclaimed Adelaide
starting up.
Not that I know ofit has nothing to do with
him, replied Mrs. Winfield.
Then it cannot be
good
news, sighed Adelaide,
sinking back into her chair.
Oh, but it
is
good newsif you have any heart,
I am sure you will think sowhat will you say
when I tell you that your brother has returned
that he is at this very moment in the city!
My brother!
Yes; but I suppose you didn't know that you
had one. Oh, but he is a fine young man, and so
improved has he been by foreign travel that I
hardly
knew him.
But why did you not tell me before, that I had
a brother?
I reserved that intelligence for a pleasant
surprise
,
my deartill I could tell you that he was in
the citythat he was waiting to see youwaiting
to embrace his own, flesh-and-blood sister, whom
he has not seen sincesince she was a mere infant.
Is it possible? A brother! When shall I see
him? Let us meet at once. Is he here?
Not yet. I chanced to encounter him as he was
ascending the steps of the Astor House, followed
by a porter carrying his luggage. How
enchanted
the dear fellow was to see me! And when I
told him of youof his sisterand how you had
grown into a beautiful young woman, I thought he
would have gone out of his wits with joy. As he
has business with the Custom House, he will not be
here till this evening. Then you shall meet. Dear
Ernest! How rejoiced I am that he has come back
at last!
Then his name is Ernest? said Adelaide,
looking
up with a smile that made her face radiant with
cheerfulness and hope. From what you say, I
think I shall love brother Ernest.
That you will, my dear. Do you know he has
been so long absent from his native country, that
he speaks English with a slight foreign accent?
I shall laugh at brother Ernest if I detect any
thing of the kind. I hope he is not too much
wedded
to European habits and modes of life.
Ah, my dear, I can only say that he wears a
moustache.
Then I will see if my sisterly authority cannot
make him shave it off. I would have him look like
an American, and be proud of the name of one.
At this moment, Irene entered and told Mrs.
Winfield
that an errand-boy was below with a note, to
which he wanted an answer.
Adelaide being left alone added this passage to
her diary:
Another surprise! My mother tells me that I
have a brotheran own brotherthat his name is
Ernestthat he is now in the city after passing
many years in Europe, and that he will be here
to-night
to seeto embrace his sister! I am sure I
shall love him dearly. I find myself continually
repeating the words
brother Ernest
then I wonder
if he looks like meI imagine what the color of
his hair can beand picture in fancy his face and
figure. How I hope that he and Fleetwood will be
friends! If they love me they cannot be otherwise.
Yes, they mustthey
shall
be friends. And Ernest
has come just in time to witness my nuptials! He
will be present. He will give me away. I am
strangely happy. It is Fleetwood I may thank. I
hardly dare look into my own heart when I think
how wholly I have rendered up to him its wealth
And yet is
it
therefore bankrupt in love? Oh, no!
Bountiful faculty, which increases the more it
imparts
which
like the magnet, loses by hoarding,
but enriches itself by giving!
The clock struck two. The sound seemed to
dispel the gay illusions, in which Adelaide had been
indulging. A sensation like that she experienced
when she first heard the carriage-wheels grating
over the gravelled walk at Soundside, at the period
of Mrs. Winfield's arrival, came over her heart.
She paused as if in expectation of somethingshe
knew not what. Then smiling and shaking her
head she muttered, how very fanciful I have
grown!
Your brother is below, Miss, and waiting to
see you, said Irene, abruptly thrusting in her ebony
head and withdrawing it as speedily.
My brother! Joy! Joy! exclaimed Adelaide,
bounding from the apartment, regardless of every
thing but the thought of being clasped for the first
time to a brother's breast. We did not expect
him for some hoursbut he was impatient to meet
meno wonder he was impatient.
7
CHAPTER XV.
Look there! If words will not convince thee, look!
And let the assurance of unquestioned deeds
Prove she's unworthy.
Anon
.
In
a state of gloomy and bewildered expectation,
Fleetwood sat regarding the hands of his watch,
resolved
,
that if Glenham failed in his appointment by
the fraction of a minute, he would refuse to
accompany
him. How earnestly did he hope that such
might be the result! The five minutes preceding
the hour fixed, seemed to him like days of torture.
Every sound of a footstep in the corridor made his
heart beat, and his breath come thick and heavy.
He felt like a culprit, who has sold his soul to the
arch fiend, and who is awaiting the moment when
the purchaser is to come to claim his own.
But two minutes remained of the allotted time.
He will not comethe coward will not come!
exclaimed Fleetwood, starting from his seat, and
pressing his forehead with the palms of his clasped
hands. Oh, what a fool I have been to attach the
least importance to his wretched calumny! He
would have been here long before this if he means
to return at all. He has done all that he could do
to make me miserableand he has succeeded for
a timebut his act of childish vengeance is now
ended. He has done his worst. Vengeance! May
he not have been really deceived? May he not
have been laboring under a gross but sincere
mistake
and
may he not have been actuated by pure
and honest motives in apprising me of what he
believed
to be true? Poor Glenham! I should not
wonder if such turned out to be the real state of the
case. And now having become assured of his error
he stays away, fearing, after my recent violence,
that we may have a more serious quarrel in
consequence
of his blundering officiousness. I have done
him injustice. Poor fellow! I should not have been
so rude. I will ask his pardon. I will make ample
reparation for my ruffianly conduct towards him.
It was too bad! It was
Fleetwood glanced again anxiously at his watch.
But ten seconds remain, he muttered, almost
gasping for breath, such was the emotion of
solicitude
under which he labored. Eight seconds
sixhe has broken his appointment, and his story
must be false as hell!
At that instant he heard steps approaching. A
solitary knockand then, without pausing for an
invitation, Glenham threw open the door, and
entered
.
I believe I am punctual to my appointment, he
said, coolly placing his hat upon the table, and
throwing his gloves into it.
Ay, you are punctual, groaned Fleetwood,
standing motionless as if petrified by the unwelcome
appearance.
Glenham took a seat, and carelessly tapped his
boot with his cane.
After a pause, full of anguish to one at least,
Fleetwood stamped his foot, and exclaimed: Come,
Sir, I am ready for you. Lead on. I await your
damnable proofs.
You are in a hurry, then, to be satisfied? All
in good time. I have a carriage in waiting at the
door. The drive will not be a long one.
They proceeded together down stairs, and out of
the hotel to the sidewalk. A coachman stood
holding
open the door of his carriage. He immediately
let down the steps as he caught sight of Glenham.
Will you enter first? said Glenham, politely
touching his hat
His brain on fire, Fleetwood precipitated himself
carelessly into the vehicle. Glenham gave some
minute directions to the coachman, and followed.
The steps were folded upthe door closedand,
the next minute, they were rattling up Broadway.
I would exact a promise from you, said
Glenham
,
after they had driven nearly a quarter of a
mile in silence.
Name it.
Promise me, that should you see Adelaide you
will keep silence, and not attempt to discover
yourself
for at least five minutes.
Why do you wish me to do that?
Because if you make yourself known
prematurely
,
you will defeat the very object we have in
view. You must wait as patiently as you can until
the worst is revealed.
There is reason in what you say. I will fairly
test your charges. O, wo to you, if I find this is a
plot of yours to wrong her!
A plot! Well: perhaps it was foolish in me to
enlighten your blissful ignorance. I begin to wish
that I had not interfered. What do I propose?
Simply that you shall see and judge for yourself.
I do not deal in vague suspicions, or circumstantial
trifles. I say, come and satisfy yourself with your
own eyes and your own ears whether or no I have
spoken truly.
Fleetwood shuddered at the air and tone of
conviction
,
with which these words were uttered. O,
strike me to the earth if there is any truth in what
you have asserted! he exclaimed. Buffet me
trample on mecrush meyou will find I shall not
resist. Heap indignity on indignityit could not
rouse me from the horrid stupor into which I should
be thrown.
My objects are friendly, returned Glenham. I
would save you from a rash, disgraceful marriage.
The discovery will be painful to you, I am aware.
But surely, it had better come before marriage than
after.
I will not credit the testimony of my own
senses! exclaimed Fleetwood.
In that case we had better turn back, said
Glenham coollyfor I acknowledge I have no
better witnesses than your own eyes and ears.
Oh, go ongo on! groaned Fleetwood, and
bring this infernal errand to a conclusion as soon as
possible.
We are at the house, said Glenham, as the
driver suddenly drew up his horses.
We are not there yet! I hope we are not there
yet! ejaculated Fleetwood, who felt sick at heart
as he witnessed his companion's confident manner.
The young men entered the house. Fleetwood,
pale and trembling, could hardly drag himself along.
He felt for the first time in his life like a coward.
Was it strange that he should have entertained a
certain mistrusta dread of what
might
beunder
the circumstances? He had undoubtedly been
impulsive
and precipitate in thus surrendering into
Adelaide's keeping his heart's best hopes, before he
had weighed all the circumstances of her position
before he had satisfied himself fully of the truth
of her story. A consciousness of his error could
not but come to him now, although he tried to evade
it. He was appalled when he found how suddenly
the passion, which had been fed by hope, had
sprung up consummate at its birthwhen he
saw the abyss of disappointment and wretchedness
into which he would be plunged, should the
horrible
charges against Adelaide be confirmed. He
did not know that his nature was capable of
emotions
so intense as those he now experienced. He
did not dream that he had so staked his happiness
on a chance.
Glenham led his companion into a room, from
which the light was almost wholly excluded.
What is the meaning of all this? asked
Fleetwood
,
choking with agitation.
Be patient, and you will see, was the reply;
and remember your promise not to utter a word
until the test is ended.
Proceed! said Fleetwood, who felt as if the
hazard of a die was about to decide whether the gates
of Paradise were to be closed upon him forever.
Glenham stepped softly towards the leaves of a
sliding door, which opened upon a room where the
light came unobstructed through windows that
looked
out upon the street. The aperture though slight
was sufficiently large for a person to stand
unobserved
in the darkened apartment and distinguish
objects clearly and easily in the other.
Drawing his companion towards this aperture,
Glenham asked in a whisper, Do you recognize
that man?
I dohe is Count La Sallebut he is alone,
replied Fleetwood.
He will not be alone longwait awhile, said
Glenham.
There was a pauseunbroken save by the sound
of footsteps, which came from the room, where La
Salle was pacing the floor. Glenham had always
regarded this man as one of the handsomest he had
over seen. His figure was perfect in all its
proportions
.
His head and shoulders might have served
a sculptor as a model for an Antinous; and his
countenance when in repose was full of all
masculine
grace. But now Glenham thought it hideous.
An expression of fiendish exultation seemed to
distort
its lines and curves, and to convert what was
beauty into downright ugliness.
This is hell, muttered Fleetwood, seizing
Glenham
by the armTorturer! how long
Hush! La Salle seems disposed to soliloquise,
said GlenhamWhat he has to say concerns you,
I will swear.
I did not come here to be an eaves-dropper,
returned Fleetwood, flinging from him the arm he
had grasped.
You promised to be silent, said Glenham
reproachfully
.
Listen, and observe. If I told you
a man was plotting against your life would you
refuse
to satisfy your doubts by watching and
over-hearing
him? Is not your honor dearer than your
life?
Glenham had closed the sliding doors while he
uttered these remarks. He now re-opened them.
At the same moment, La Salle was heard speaking
as if to himself. Looking at his watch, he
exclaimed
:
Two o'clock! How long does the little witch
mean to keep me waiting? Beautifying herself, I
suppose! That is needless. Poor Fleetwood! He
little dreams of the compensation I am taking for
the caresses he lavished on Emily Gordon. Tit for
tat is fair play. Ha, ha! Who was it said, revenge
is sweet? He had reason. But I fancy I am the
gainer by this exchange. Emily will do; but
Adelaide
Adelaide
At this moment the door-handle was turned.
Fleetwood drew in his breath, and the moment of
suspense seemed an eternity of torture.
Yes; it was Adelaide, who entered! Never had
she looked so beautiful. A smile almost as joyous
as that which made her face radiant when she first
placed her hand in Fleetwood's as the pledge of her
fidelity, was on her lips. With a step of triumph
and delight, she entered the room with both arms
extended, as if inviting an embrace. La Salle
caught her to his bosom, and stopped her mouth
with kisses.
Hush! whispered Glenham, as he saw
Fleetwood
gasp under the pressure of the acutest agony
that can wring the human soul. Remember your
promise to be silent.
But a mist came over Fleetwood's eyeshis
heart seemed as if thrown from its centre by a
convulsion
he
threw out his hands for support, but
they touched nothing but the smooth surface of the
walland then, with a suppressed groan, he fell to
the floor.
I thought so, said Glenham, quietly closing the
leaves of the sliding door. He threw open the
shutters. A flood of light poured into the room.
He approached Fleetwood, and lifted him to a
sitting
posture. As he did so the blood poured from
his victim's mouth, and stained the delicate linen of
his shirt.
He has burst a blood-vessel! said Glenham,
alarmed at the serious effects of that internal
struggle
,
which he had imposed on Fleetwood. Placing
him on a sofa, he rang the bell.
Tell your mistress to come here at once, he
said, addressing the black waiting-woman of the
house.
Mrs. Winfield was soon on the spot. At first
she imagined that Fleetwood had been stabbed.
On learning the truth, a momentary pang of
compunction
seemed to visit her seared and indurated
heart.
Poor fellow! poor fellow! she exclaimed. And
so good looking as he is! Had I imagined it would
have hit him so hard I never would have engaged
in this ugly business. Irene, run this instant for
Doctor Mott. There! Raise him gently. We
must carry him up stairs, and lay him on a bed.
Poor, dear young man! And this beautiful white
vesthow stained it is with blood! Come! he
shall have good care taken of him any how. I
didn't look for anything as serious as this. If I had,
I would sooner have been burnt at the stake than
suffered such goings-on in my house. This way,
Mr. Glenham!
Still insensible, Fleetwood was carried to an
adjacent
room, and placed upon a bed. The best
surgical
attendance was speedily procured, and before
the lapse of half-an-hour, animation was restored.
Two days afterwards he was pronounced
sufficiently
out of danger to be removed to the house of
Mr. Gordon, where the apartment he had occupied
a few days before was assigned to him. Passively
and tacitly he assented to all the propositions for
his own personal accommodation made by those by
whom he found himself surrounded. He put no
inquiries and uttered no complaints, but seemed like
a person, whose mind is brooding in silent apathy
over one haunting thought. The only emotion he
manifested, was when on entering his room at Mr.
Gordon's, he glanced anxiously at the wall. But
the painting which had formerly excited his
attention
,
had been judiciously removed; and, with a
sigh, he turned away.
When he was sufficiently recovered to reflect
with comparative calmness on the occurrence to
which he owed his present state of prostration, he
discovered nothing in the
cause
and its
effect
to
suggest
a doubt as to the truth of all Glenham's
representations
.
Had he seen Adelaide fly to the
embrace
of any man but Count La Salle, perhaps a
misgiving as to the deceitfulness of appearances
might have arisenperhaps the thought might have
occurred, may not this be the result of
management
,
and may not Adelaide be under a delusion?
But the plot was contrived with diabolical
ingenuity
to crush the suspicions which might have
7*
suggested themselves under different circumstances.
The very man was selected, who alone of all others
could, by his apt introduction, confound reflection
at a blow, and carry conviction home with terrible
power. La Salle was a foreigner; and therefore
it was unlikely that he could in any way be related
to Adelaide by the ties of consanguinity. He had
threatened Fleetwood with vengeance, to which he
was impelled by one of the most active and
malignant
of the heart's passions, jealousy. Unfounded
as that jealousy might be, he still believed that he
had cause for it. And then the soliloquy he
uttered
while pacing the room, was but too effectual in
preparing Fleetwood for the meeting, which
followed
.
Were not the proofs all-powerful under the
circumstances? Eagerly would Fleetwood have
grasped at the slightest apology for a doubt, but he
could find none. The last ray of hope had been
shut out from his heart. It was not because he had
been robbed of a beautiful prizebecause he had
lost her, to whom he had surrendered all the
hoarded
affections of his soulthat he felt so keenly his
betrayal.
Had she dieddied young and innocenthe
knew that, after the first burst of grief was over,
he might have recovered his happiness and even
his cheerfulness, in the anticipation that their
parting
was but for a season. But what he lamented
in bitterness of spirit, was the loss of those dreams
of feminine goodness and honor, which he had
cherished, and which
dreams
though they might
have beenwere still the sunshine of his waking
hoursthat chivalric sentiment of respect for the
sexthat faith in human dignity and worththose
convictions of the existence of a love surmounting
time and deaththe loss of these was one, which
the world could never more supply.
CHAPTER XVI.
Oh! she was innocent;
And to be innocent is nature's wisdom!
O surer than suspicion's hundred eyes
Is that fine sense, which to the pure in heart
By mere oppugnancy of their own goodness
Reveals the approach of evil.
Wordsworth
.
The
closing of the folding-doors was the signal
to La Salle, that the object of the plot had been
accomplished. His manner towards Adelaide
instantly
changed.
Why, brother, you have almost taken away my
breath, said she. Is it the fashion abroad to
salute one's sister so rudely?
But then consider, said he, how long it is
since I saw you. You must recollecttwelve
years agowhen we partednoI forgotyou
were at school. School changes a girl sadlyyou
don't remember me, then?
La Salle spoke like a man who is thinking of
something else than the topic on which he is trying
to talk. He looked in Adelaide's face, but she
could see that his attention was not fixed on her,
however his glance might be. He was listening to
what was going on in the adjoining room, and
pondering
on the circumstances of the little drama, in
which he had become an actor.
Why, what are you thinking of, brother Ernest?
Does any thing disturb you? asked Adelaide.
Disturb me? Oh, yesII was thinking of an
oversight of mine, by which I shall lose a
considerable
amount of money. But what of that, so
long as I have found a sister?
Oh, leave me instantly if your interests require
it, said Adelaidedo not stay a moment on my
accountthough I shall be sorry enough to lose
you so soon.
But I will return speedily, Adelia, and then
Adelia! That is a pretty joke! You have
forgotten your own sister's name. Call me
Adelaide
,
if you please, Sir; and playfully putting her
arm through his, she clasped her hands, and looked
up in his face. By the way, brother Ernest, she
continued, how lucky it is that you have arrived
just in time to he present at my wedding. Perhaps
you do not know that I amto be married
to-morrow
.
La Salle started, and regarded her with a glance
full of compassion. He was sufficiently well versed
in human nature to recognize the perfect purity
and innocence of her character. This young man
was not a libertine. Jealousy had taken full
possession
of his soul, but it had some noble traits still,
which even the clouds of passion could not wholly
obscure.
And are you well assured, he asked, of the
loyalty of him, who has promised to marry you?
Ah, if you had only known him you would not
ask that question, she replied.
And are you quite sure he will be here
to-morrow
to fulfill his promise?
Not altogethera steamboat may blow up, or
get detaineda carriage may break downthere
are hundreds of contingencies that may prevent
the punctual and literal fulfilment of his promise.
He will be here if he can be, without detriment to
the interests of others. Of that I am quite certain.
Poor thing! Poor thing! thought La Salle;
what a blast must soon fall on her young hopes!
There were two or three trifling incidents which
puzzled him exceedingly, although he had been fully
prepared for much that had happened, by those who
had enlisted him in the conspiracy. The faint
exclamation
which had proceeded from Fleetwood's
lips on his witnessing from his place of supposed
concealment, the meeting between Adelaide and La
Salle, had not passed unnoticed by the latter.
Although
hardly audible, yet so expressive was it of
intense, heart-felt anguish, that La Salle, who had
set down Fleetwood as a mere flutterer, was amazed
at seeing him evince some token of feeling. He
had inferred, moreover, from the language of those
who had led him to be an actor in the scene which
had just passed, that Adelaide occupied a relation
towards her lover different from that which he was
now convinced she filled. The suspicion flashed
across his mind that he might have been deceived
that her own story was the true onethat
Fleetwood
Can he be such a double traitor, thought La
Salle, as to seriously make love to another after
he has solemnly pledged his faith to this poor girl?
But did I not see his arm about Emily's waisther
head resting upon his bosom? Either
she
must be
very liberal of her blandishments, or
he
must be
false to Adelaide. Time alone can unravel these
perplexities. I will wait patiently its
developments
.
La Salle's attachment towards Miss Gordon was
sincere and disinterested; and the moment when
he saw her in Fleetwood's arms, had been the
bitterest
of his whole life. In his jealousy there was
hardly any act so base that he would not have
stooped to it to be revenged on the man, who he
believed
had supplanted him in the affections of the
woman of his choice. Glenham, who was but a
tool in the hands of Mr. Gordon, had found La
Salle an equally pliable instrument in his own hands;
and, for the paltry triumph of robbing his enemy
under his very eyes of an imagined mistress, the
Count lent himself to the petty scheme, by which
Glenham hoped to bring about a lasting separation
between Fleetwood and Adelaide. But no sooner
had the plot been carried out under the
circumstances
which we have related, than La Salle felt
truly ashamed of himself for what he had done.
He began to conjecture whether he had not been
too precipitate, and to raise questions in his own
mind as to Glenham's motives in urging on the
affair
.
Blinded by jealousy, he had hitherto abstained
from inquiring into the object of the plot in which
he was involved; but now he determined to be
satisfied
.
The mischief that had been done might be
undone. Should it be really true that Fleetwood
had intended making Adelaide his wife, such an
explanation
should be given as would satisfy him that
they had all been the victims of Glenham's
duplicity
.
I must leave you now, said La Salle in a tone
of kindness, taking Adelaide's hand.
I will not detain you, brother Ernest, said she;
for you seem pre-occupied, and I am sure you
have left undone something, which you ought to
do.
Or done something, which I ought to have left
undone, said he with a melancholy smile.
Ah! if you think so, you must be
over-scrupulous
,
said Adelaide with charming eagerness in
defence
.
For I am sure you would do nothing
seriously
wrong, brother Ernest. One has merely to
look in your face to be sure of that.
Good bye, Adelaide! I shall return soon. There
is one thing, of which I am resolved my conscience
shall not accuse me; and that is, neglect of your
interests. You shall not lack a brother's protection.
Farewell!
He hurried from the room. In the street he
encountered
Glenham, who had just quitted his
victim's
bed-side.
Well, Sir, what was the result of your
chivalric
plot? asked the Count. I thought I heard
Fleetwood utter a cry of pain, and then fall to the
floor. What has become of him? Where is he
now?
Oh, you are quite mistaken, replied Glenham,
with ready volubility. It was I, who uttered the
cry of pain. Fleetwoodconfound him!trod
upon my little toe, the one with the cornand I
pushed him so that he fell. We had to close the
doors to prevent our laughing being heard.
But was he not startled at seeing the girl rush
to my embrace?
If he was, he took devilish good care to
conceal
his emotion. `Umph!' said heso the girl
fancies himI am glad of itthere is one
expensive
incumbrance taken off my handsjust in time,
too; for Emily would make a row about it, should
she find it out.' Such was the purport of what he
said.
The heartless villain! exclaimed La Salle.
He has persuaded that innocent girl that he
intends
marrying her to-morrow.
I suspect he has persuaded a good many
innocent
girls of the same thing, replied Glenham.
But of course he will not dare to break his word
with Emily Gordon.
Is he then really engaged to her?
Oh, undoubtedly. The marriage day is fixed.
Then I will call and congratulate the lady, said
La Salle, with compressed lips. As for the
gentleman
,
I will seize the first opportunity of letting
him know that I consider him a villain of the
deepest
die.
And why so?
The treachery he has practised towards
Adelaide
is enough to prove it. I will lay my life on it,
that she is pure and unsullied. He is an insolent
boaster if he says otherwise. I have not studied
women all my life to be deceived now. You may
look as incredulous as you please; but I am right
in my convictions. That he has won her affections,
I do not deny. In the full expectation of being
honorably united to him, she has yielded up the
first, passionate devotion of her young heart. He
will be her murderer if he plays her false. You
may laugh; but I have seen such instances before
now, and I am a judge of temperaments. I will
confront this man, and tell him what I think of his
conduct. His death would be a far less serious
blow to the woman he has deceived than his
infidelity
.
I will fight him. To save her feelings, I
will shoot him. Where is he to be found?
Glenham was perplexed and taken aback by the
earnestness with which the Count spoke, as well as
by the extraordinary determination expressed in
his concluding words.
Ahem! Fleetwood has gonethat is, he was
to leave the city immediately for his country-seat,
said Glenham hesitatingly. You will not be able
to see him to-day.
Then it shall be to-morrow, or the next day, or
as soon as he returns, said the Count. He shall
find that the poor girl, towards whom he has acted
so unfeelingly, is not without an avenger.
Do you mean to take her under your
protection
?
That is just what Fleetwood would like,
said Glenham, who began to tremble for the
success
of some of his own ulterior plans.
She shall be spared the sort of protection you
allude to, replied La Salle. But here we are in
Broadway. My rooms are at the Globe. Do you
walk up or down?
I will take leave of you here, said Glenham.
They parted. Glenham watched the Count till his
figure was lost in the crowd, and then retracing his
steps, he re-entered the house, from which he had
issued but a few minutes before, and found his way
to a room, where Mr. Gordon sat in solitary
meditation
.
How is the patient? asked Glenham.
Out of all danger, was the reply. He will
be well enough to be removed to-morrow or the
next day.
Do you think so? Well; what I have come
back to tell you is, that there are new and
unexpected
dangers ahead. La Salle, whom we have
believed we could manage so easily, is disposed to
give us trouble. He begins to suspect that there has
been foul play, and is resolved to satisfy his
misgivings
before lending himself further to our plot.
It will be hazardous to suffer him to have another
interview with Adelaide.
To be sure it will. That must be guarded
against. How shall it be done?
It will be equally dangerous to suffer him to
communicate with Fleetwood.
I can easily provide against that contingency.
Fleetwood will be obliged to keep his room for
some weeks yet, and as I intend having him
transferred
to my house, it will be an easy matter to keep
the Count out of the way, and at the same time,
exercise
a wholesome surveillance over my patient's
correspondence. And now the question is, how to
dispose of Adelaide?
CHAPTER XVII.
Say, in the visions of romantic youth,
What years of endless bliss are yet to flow!
But mortal pleasure, what art thou in truth?
The torrent's smoothness ere it dash below.
The
third morning after his removal to the house
of Mr. Gordon, Fleetwood had so far recovered his
strength, that permission was given him by his
physician to quit the chamber, where he had been
confined, and walk in the rooms below. Leaning
on the arm of his host he proceeded down stairs,
and entered the parlor, where he had first
encountered
Emily.
Where
are
you, Emily? Not here to welcome
our invalid guest! exclaimed Mr. Gordon.
Emily was sauntering in the conservatory,
sewing
upon some light muslin work. She threw
it down on hearing her father's voice; and as she
issued through the open window with its background
of leaves and flowers, she looked the embodiment
of grace and beauty. Hastening through the
intermediate
parlor and saloon, she approached
Fleetwood
,
holding out both her hands, while an
expression
of animation and delight gave a new charm to
her features.
I am glad to see you after your accident, Mr.
Fleetwood, she said in a grateful and musical,
because
a sincere tone of voice.
You are very kind, replied Fleetwood, smiling
faintly, while he gave her his disengaged hand.
Pray, my dear, said Mr. Gordon, looking at
his watch, and addressing his daughter, pray take
my place as a walking stick for our friend. I have
an engagement at this hour. I rely upon you,
Emily, to take care of him. She is a capital nurse,
I assure you, Fleetwood. Good bye!
And without giving his guest time to reply, Mr.
Gordon substituted his daughter's arm for his own
as a support, and withdrew from the apartment.
Fleetwood unconsciously frowned. Although
physically
convalescent he still felt sick at heart, and in
no mood for female society, especially Emily's.
He had been stunned by the terrible blow which
had fallen upon him, and had but partially recovered
from its depressing effects. He craved reposehe
implored peace. His solitude had been almost
uninterrupted
from the moment of his accident up to
the present time. He had not seen Emily at all,
and her father but once or twice. He appreciated
the disposition thus shown to humor him; and in
gratitude for what had been done he resolved not
to exhibit if possible his discontent.
In justification of Emily it should be made known,
that she was as yet wholly unacquainted with the
circumstances of Fleetwood's illness; although of
this fact he was unaware. All that she had been
told was, that he had slipped down and burst a
blood vessel; and her natural inference was, that
the accident was occasioned by too violent an effort
on his part to save himself, while in the act of
falling
.
I rejoice at our good fortune in having you
again for our guest, said Emily; at the same
time I cannot but regret the cause.
The cause? Ay, Miss Emily, the cause was
not an agreeable one, replied Fleetwood, coldly,
wounded at her incautious allusion to so delicate a
subject.
But you are quite over it, I trust? The effects
are not serious, apart from a temporary weakness?
Oh, of course not! said Fleetwood, bitterly.
It is foolish to feel any emotion of regret at such
occurrencesto show such a thing as a heart
capable
of being wounded by treachery and falsehood
where it looked for fidelity and love. Bah! Do
not laugh at me for my simplicity.
Laugh at you!
And Emily looked wonderingly in the face of her
guest, half afraid that his wits were in an unsettled
state.
I do not understand you quite, she said, after a
pause.
Can you ask me, said Fleetwood impatiently,
if the effects of such a disclosure, as that which
prostrated me body and soul, are likely to be
serious
?
Do you imagine I have no feeling? I know
not how you may be constituted, but for myself, I
can say that such an occurrence brings with it a
life-long gloom, which no subsequent events can
wholly dispel. But we will not allude to this
subject
again; for I see it is one where our sympathies
must be diverse.
Excuse me, replied Emily; but I fear there
has been some misapprehension on my part. All
that I have heard of your accident has been, that it
was purely physical. I knew not that there were
any painful associations connected with it: had I
done so, believe me I would never have revived
the topic. If I have erred, it has been through
ignorance
.
Let me show you the blossoms on my new
orange tree.
And is it then possible, asked Fleetwood, that
you are uninformed of the disclosure, which
which has made me wretched? Do you not know
that sheshe, to whomwhom, in short, I had
promised to make my wife
Rest yourself on this sofa, said Emily. You
are agitated. You shall select another opportunity
for this communication.
No, noI am very childish, murmured
Fleetwood
;
and suddenly assuming an air of
composure
,
he added: She has proved herself unworthy
of the addresses of an honorable man, Miss Emily.
The last time I saw her she was in the embrace of
your friend, La Salle.
Are you certain? Was there no deception?
Were you not dupedcheated by false
appearances
?
Beware! beware! It may be that both of
you have been the victims of a cunningly devised
plot.
My own eyes and ears could not have deceived
me. I first saw the Count, and fully satisfied myself
that there could be no mistake as to the identity.
He was alone, or thought himself alone, pacing the
room in the expectation of her coming. Some
ejaculations which fell from him, in the way of a
soliloquy, showed that the idea uppermost in his
mind was that of revenging himself on me for
robbing
him, so he imagined, of you.
Ah! I seeI see, interrupted Emily. It is
not then, as I suspected, a plotbut La Salle, in the
recklessness of his resentment, hasand II have
been the cause of all this ruin and distress! But,
go on, sir.
You may imagine what were my sensations
while waiting for the appearance of the female,
whom he was expecting. I would not endure
another such moment for a world's wealth. She
camehow could I mistake her? That fatal
beauty, which seemed so hallowed by the very
soul of innocence beaming from every lineament,
was now not less beautiful, not less dazzling, than
when I first yielded all too willingly to its spell.
She bounded forward into his arms, and allowed
him to cover her cheek with his licentious kisses.
You may well start. My heart stood still at the
sight, and refused to fultill its functions. Crushed
and horror-struck, I fell to the floor. You have
my story.
She flew to his arms! exclaimed Emily, in a
hoarse but audible whisper.
Ay, and in the very moment of her treachery,
a smile of such angelic purity was on her lips, that
it will haunt me to my dying day. I never could
have believed that guilt could so have disguised
itself
.
The caitiff! muttered Emily, pacing the floor
with rapid steps, while Fleetwood sank into an
arm-chair
.
The vindictive traitor! I thought he
might seek a manly, honorable revenge, but little
dreamed he would accomplish the ruin of one who
had not injured him, for the gratification of a paltry
spite against Fleetwood. Oh, that I were a man,
that I might punish such heartless villany!
You are indignant; and with reason, said
Fleetwood. Not even so black a passion as
jealousy should have driven him to so base an
act.
Fleetwood, I will be frank with you, said
Emily, suddenly changing her manner, and
standing
with folded arms before her guest. Pardon
me; but I have been playing a part.
What is your meaning, Miss Gordon? asked
Fleetwood, much surprised.
Emily looked cautiously around, as if fearful lest
there might be a listener near. She walked
towards
the conservatory, and having satisfied
herself
that her apprehensions were groundless, she
re-crossed the room rapidly to where Fleetwood
sat regarding her movements.
Yes, I have been playing a part, she said, in
a low, earnest and hurried tone. The confession
is an humbling one, but it shall be made. At the time
I first met you, that man, La Salle, and I were
secretly affianced. He was, or rather seemed to
be, madly in love with me, and my feelings, if less
ostentatiously, were not less deeply interested in
him
. I dreaded to communicate the fact of our
engagement to my father, because I knew he had
set his heart on my marrying a man of wealth;
and it could not be denied that La Salle was poor.
The night you met me at Mrs. Dryman's, my father
had insisted on my going there simply for the
purpose
of cultivating the acquaintance of a family at
whose house there was a chance of my encountering
you. We met. My father called on you shortly
afterwards, and you became our guest. In an
interview
we had that same day, he accused me of
entertaining a partiality for La Salle, and
indignantly
forbade my extending to him the slightest
encouragement. It was you whom he wished for
a son-in-law; and he threatened me with his
heaviest
displeasure if I did not instantly exert all my
powers to win your affections. You remember
our walk in the conservatory. Distrusting my own
firmness in resisting these parental importunities, I
begged you to fly at once, and marry the woman
of your choice. My father's approach prevented
my saying all that I wished. You neglected or
misconstrued my warnings. A subsequent
interview
with my fatherand my scruples were
overcome
but
by arguments the most touching and
irresistible that could be addressed to the heart of
a daughter. I will leave it to you to imagine what
they were. I was weak enough to consent to play
the hypocriteto pretend to be in love with you,
in order to awaken that pity which is said to be
akin to love. Foolish that I was, I did not reflect
that the heart of a man was rather to be won by
apparent indifference than by obvious partiality.
But in deceiving others we are often apt to deceive
ourselves.
And you did this, knowing all the while that I
was betrothed to another? asked Fleetwood, with
undisguised disdain.
But you must remember, I was assured that the
person you were about to marry was unworthy of
youthat the match was one which would be a
life-long source of misery to youthat in short, it
would be a deed of mercy to detach you from the
pursuit, by inducing you to transfer your affections,
even if I did not mean to requite them by the
return
of my own.
Too true! too true! sighed Fleetwood. The
event has proved, alas! that it
would
have been a
deed of mercy. This consideration was perhaps
some excuse for your conduct, so far as I was
concerned. But how could you so deceive La
Salle?
That part of my conduct I shall not venture to
extenuate. You must consider, however, that in
the first place I was under the influence of my
father, who threatened me with his lasting
displeasure
should I prove contumacious and resist his
authority. But I suspect that even that influence
would not have availed to induce me to discard La
Salle, but for the peculiar circumstances under
which he found us on the evening of the
thunderstorm
.
His insulting manner at once roused my
woman's pride. He chose to put a prejudicial
construction upon what he saw. Without stopping
to learn the truth, he indulged in a malicious and
offensive sarcasm. How could I condescend to
undeceive him after that?
I must admit that you did not lack
provocation
.
But how can I forgive myself, Fleetwood, for
attempting to mislead you? No sooner had La
Salle quitted the house, than I tried to persuade
you that I had never encouraged him to hope for a
return of his attachment. There, I blush to say, I
was guilty of deception. But the man's forward
vaunting of past favors stung me to the quick. I
was angry and indignant; and felt as if I could
have accepted the first man who proposed for my
hand, if it were only to exasperate and punish La
Salle. Little did I dream that he would have taken
such a dastardly revenge. Oh, Fleetwood, it is I,
after all, who have brought this misery upon you!
Do not say that, Miss Gordon. Is it not rather
you who have saved me from a much worse
infliction
,
that might have come at some future day?
Think you, I should have been happy with the
woman
who, with so much facility, could be shaken
in her loyalty? I feel no resentment towards La
Salle. I rather thank him for subjecting her to the
test. That she was found wanting was
my
misfortune
,
and not
his
fault. The world will expect
me to fight him, perhaps, when I recoverbut I
shall consult my own tastes and my own
convenience
exclusively about that.
You take a strange view of the matter, said
Emily. He has wounded me far less grievously
than he has you, and yet I feel as if I could take
the field against him with a hearty good will; for
I now detest him as heartily as I once loved him.
You have dealt candidly with me, Miss
Gordon
,
said Fleetwood, rising, and once more
accepting
the proffered support of her armyou have
dealt candidly with me, and I thank you. I can
find a thousand excuses for the little imposture you
practised; and your frank confession takes away
the ungraciousness which it might otherwise wear.
I acknowledge that I was dupedthat I was
conceited
enough to believe you were enamoured of
so humble a person as myselfbut I hope you will
not think the worse of me when I say that the
belief
gave me far more pain than pleasure. Why
should we not confide in each other? My mind
8
has been strangely diverted and relieved already
by this mutual explanation; and now knowing each
other's heart, we need not hesitate to communicate
our thoughts freely and unreservedly.
To me, replied Emily, such an interchange
will not fail to be some compensation for what I
have suffered and must continue to suffer.
Notwithstanding
La Salle's conduct at our last
interview
,
I must confess I entertained hopes that time
and circumstance would bring us once more
together
;
but since he has proved unworthy, those
hopes are annihilated. Let us trust to time, the
great physician, my friend, to teach us endurance,
if not cheerfulness, under our mutual wrongs.
They paced the room for a moment or two in
silence.
I could not have believed, said Fleetwood,
that my heart could so have misled me as it did
in regard to that childfor child she seems to be,
with that face of child-like innocence and beauty.
But so youngso inexperienced as she is
what resistance could she offer, said Emily, to
the arts of so consummate a man of the world as
La Salle?
Do you then find excuses for her?
Yes, many for her, but none for him. I cannot
speak my detestation of his baseness.
But the circumstances under which I proffered
her the protection of a husbandthe relations in
which we stood to each other, and to the world,
were of such a character thatalas! it is folly to
deplore the past. Let me hear music, Emily
music that shall bring a new and more welcome
train of thoughts.
A smile of pleased surprise passed over her lips.
It was the first time he had addressed her by the
familiar name of Emily.
Fleetwood experienced a relapse in his malady
the day after this interview, and was obliged to
keep his bed for a considerable time. Mr. Gordon
contrived that Emily should be his nurse and
constant
attendant. She beguiled the tedious hours of
his illness by reading, conversation and music.
Her harp was transported to his room, and, at his
request, she brought her embroidery work and
sewing, with which to occupy herself when wearied
with other employments, or when the invalid had
sunk into a momentary slumber. With her own
hands she poured out the fever draughts which the
physician had prescribed to be given to him at
regular intervals. With her own hands she
administered
food, and supplied fresh pillows for his
heated head.
The scheme was prospering beyond Gordon's
most sanguine hopes. A few hints to the physician,
who was, by the way, a very accommodating
person
,
and it seemed as if a successful termination
might be speedily brought about.
I should recommend your making a visit to
Europe, my young friend, said Dr. Brisk, one
morning, when he found himself alone with his
patient.
I have been thinking of the same thing, Doctor,
replied Fleetwood. When can you let me go?
I will leave in the very next steamer.
That will depart in a week; and I see no
reason
why you should not be well enough to embark
in her, said the doctor.
See that I have a good birth secured at once,
my dear doctor, returned Fleetwood. I can
speedily make my arrangements to quit this
country
.
I have no longer any ties to detain me here.
No ties?
None whatever! Should I die, `who will
there be to mourn for Logan? Not one!'
Do not be too sure of that. Either my
observations
have deceived me most unaccountably, or
there is one at least, who will lament your absence
and sigh for your return.
You must be under a mistake, doctor. To
whom do you refer?
To Emily Gordon.
Confess now, doctor, said Fleetwood, that
you are less sagacious than you believed yourself
to be. Emily's attachment is not a serious one.
She has told me as much with her own lips. She
was in love with La Salle, until he proved himself
recreant.
But in finding a worthier object, may not her
affections have been transferred with redoubled
strength?
Ah, my dear doctor, affections are like season
tickets to a theatre,
not transferable
.
My own experience contradicts that remark,
said the doctor. How long is it since Emily
gave you to understand that you were an object of
indifference to her?
It was on the day I first went down in the
parlor
after my removal to this house.
Exactly; but there may have been a change
since that time in her views. You make no
allowance
for the effect upon a woman's heart of tending
upon a young man in the capacity of a nurse.
Pity melts the soul to love; and in this case I am
sure that another element than friendship enters
into the watchfulness, with which I have seen her sit
by you while you slept, and start to anticipate your
wants when you awaked. Why, man, she has
actually
become pale and thin, though you may not
have remarked it, with the confinement of this sick
room and the care she has bestowed upon you.
She has indeed been an attentive nurse,
remarked
Fleetwood. It was selfish in me not to
perceive that she was injuring herself by her
unwearied attendance on her invalid guest.
Could you but have seen what I witnessed the
other day, said Dr. Brisk, you would not
entertain
much doubt as to the truth of my surmises in
regard to the state of her affections.
And what did you see?
It happened the night before last, said the
doctor. I had told Emily, that I should call
during
the evening to give you a composing draught.
Accident detained me till past midnight.
Fortunately
Mr. Gordon had given me a pass-key, so that
I entered the street-door without wakening the
family
.
Ascending the stairs on tip-toe, I opened the
door of your room so noiselessly that my entrance
hardly created the slightest sound or motion.
Emily
stood by your bed-side.
And had she sat up so late to watch by me?
exclaimed Fleetwood.
She seemed like one who had neither slept nor
coveted sleep for many hours, resumed the
Doctor
.
She held a lamp in her hand, the light of
which she shaded from your face, while she
regarded
you with a smile, which spoke nothing if not the
tenderest affection. She placed the lamp upon a
chair, and bending over you, listened intently to
your breathing as if to satisfy herself that you were
in a grateful slumber. And at length, removing
the hair gently from your pale forehead, she
stooped
and pressed her lips to it, and then, as if
frightened
at her temerity, turned suddenly and screamed
on beholding me.
Indeed! I never should have suspected that
she felt thus tenderly towards me, said
Fleetwood
.
Because pride makes her disguise her feelings,
replied the doctor. On seeing that I had
inadvertently
become possessed of her secret, she simply
remarked, `Doctor, I rely upon your discretion,
your honor,' and quitted the apartment.
And do you really think, doctor, that I would
do wisely to make her my wife?
It seems to me, that under existing
circumstances
,
you could not take a more judicious step,
said Dr. Brisk. Your health is likely to be
delicate
,
your spirits variable, for some months, perhaps
years, to come. In your travels you will feel the
want of an intelligent companion, and one, who,
like Emily, has showed herself no unskilful or
inattentive
nurse. So much for the selfish view of
the subject; there is another, that I am sure will
appeal with no less force to your heart. A visit to
Europe is quite as important at this time to Emily's
health as to your own. Indeed I should have
serious
fears for her life, should you leave her behind,
hopeless and desolate. Recent circumstances have
affected both of you in such a manner as should
waken the keenest sympathies of each. Why
not study to make amends, each to the other, for
the wrongs you have experienced?
Doctor! exclaimed Fleetwood angrily; when
I have a physical wound, I will ask your advice.
Those of the heart do not need your tending.
And then, remarking the bland and innocent
expression
upon the physician's face, he addedPardon
me if I was hastybut you touched me nearly. I
will give due consideration to what you have said.
I will reflect calmly and dispassionately upon the
course, which it is incumbent upon me to pursue.
In short, I will take Shakspere's advice, and
negotiate
for myself in these affairs. I thank you for
your counsel, believing it to be dictated by a
sincere
regard for my welfare.
I fear I have been too obstrusive, too
meddlesome
,
said Dr. Brisk; but you forget that you
encouraged me by asking my advice.
So I did, returned Fleetwood; and I beg
your forgiveness for having received it as I
sometimes
do your medicine, with wry faces.
The doctor took his leave, and Fleetwood paced
the room in an anxious and perturbed mood. That
same day he was informed by Mr. Gordon, that
La Salle had left the city with a young woman,
who, from the description, was evidently Adelaide.
The news created no surprise in Fleetwood's mind,
for, after what he had himself witnessed, no
additional
proof of her infidelity could strengthen his
convictions. Being left to himself he pondered
intently
on all that Dr. Brisk had said, and on the
circumstances in which he found himself involved.
Can it be, he asked, that Emily will be
content
with such a dull, dead heart as I should bring
her? What is it like but the wasted and blackened
frame-work, which is all that remains of some
brilliant
fireworks, that flashed gloriously for a moment
upon the night, and then went out in utter
darkness
?
But I will judge for myself whether the
Doctor is right in his surmises. I will test for
myself
the state of her feelings towards me; and if it
should appear that her happiness is really dependant
in any measure on my movements, why, then
then I will leave it to the impulse of the moment
to do what is most becomingto guide me aright.
Fleetwood rose the next morning, feeling far
better in health and spirits than he had done since
the day of his prostration. It was one of those
delicious mornings in June, when the very sense of
existence is a joy, so graciously smile the heavens
so invitingly blooms the earthsuch luxury is it
to breathe the fresh, fragrant and elastic air! He
attired himself with more than ordinary elegance,
as if nature had set him an example, which he was
bound to imitate. Entering the suite of luxurious
apartments below, he paced them with a tread
more buoyant than he had been accustomed to
practice. The windows that led into the
conservatory
were open, and the eastern sunshine streamed
in among the verdure, while the soft summer breeze
sent a flood of odors stolen from the flowers through
the apartments. The canary birds in their gilt
cages were singing as if ready to split their little
throats in greeting with honors due the beautiful
day; and the very fountain, as it sprang glistening
from its marble basin, seemed to send up from its
falling waters a sort of bell-ringing music,
expressive
of delight.
How sweet, how animating are these
influences
!
thought Fleetwood. God never takes
away from us so much, that he does not leave us
enough to awaken our continual wonder and
gratitude
enough
to fill our hearts and occupy our
thoughts! In this conservatory alone, there are
materials for a life-time of absorbing study and
observation. There is not a leaf, which does not
preach of omnipotence and infinity, had we but the
ears to listen.
At that instant he heard a door open and close,
and, as he issued from the conservatory into the
parlor, he encountered Emily. Her eyes seemed
heavy, as if with unshed tears, and her cheeks
were unusually pale. Poor girl! She had just
come from an interview with her father, and the
task that he had imposed upon her was a severe
one.
Fleetwood did not fail to notice the change in
her aspect, and called to mind the observations
which Dr. Brisk had made the day before.
After congratulating her on the beauty of the
morning, he offered his arm for a promenade.
Each seemed absorbed in thought for some
moments
,
as if studying how to frame a remark.
Fleetwood was the first to speak.
Thanks to your kind watching, Emily, he said,
I am again on the road to recovery. But my
physician recommends that I should visit Europe
what think you of the idea?
Emily remained silent. There was a terrible
sense of oppression at her heart. She had been
commanded by her father to play the hypocriteto
pretend to be the victim of a passion which she did
not feeland a reluctant consent had been wrung
from her. The consciousness that her very
agitation
would now be construed falsely by Fleetwood
added to her anguish, and yet she dared not
undeceive
him, such had been the terrible
imperiousness
of her father.
Emily, we promised each other that we would
speak frankly, said Fleetwood; you first set me
the example, and I am sure you will not think the
worse of me for following it. So recent is this
affliction that has bowed me to the earth, that you
cannot suppose me capable of replacing at once, by
a new tie, that which has been so fatally severed.
Ah, I cannot tell you what I have lost in
her!
If
you knew how I had stored my future with all
bright things because of her, and how it now seems
all weary, stale, flat and unprofitable, you would
not wonder at the crushing effect which the
discovery
of her unworthiness has had upon me. My
heart seems closed to any new affectionarid,
dark and desolate, love and joy must ever find there
but an inhospitable reception. But the blow which
felled me to the earth, has fallen lightly upon you;
and I have been toldremember, we have promised
to be ingenuousI have been told that my
departure
would take from your own lot some of its
brightnessthat
A suppressed sob from Emily interrupted him in
8*
his remarks. Withdrawing her arm from his, she
covered her face with her hands.
Hear me to the end, Emily, he continued. I
frankly tell you how bankrupt is the heart I have to
offer you. In love with you I am not, and never
can be, in the romantic acceptation of the phrase.
But you have won my esteem, my admiration, as
you must that of all who can appreciate the
beautiful
and the good. I should make you a true and
indulgent, if not an affectionate husband;and if I
can contribute to your happiness by assuming that
relation towards you, I pray you let us join our
fates. I offer you my handwill you accept it?
With a despairing gesture, Emily sank upon the
sofa, and bowed her head upon the pillow. Then
suddenly rising, she said, with sudden energy:
I will repay your noble candorI cannot see
you deceived by my own acts into supposing
that
At this moment she looked round the room
distrustingly
,
as if hearing a sound which bade her
pause, and then, with a shudder, she placed her hand
in Fleetwood's, and exclaimed:
Fleetwood, I am yours!
Mr. Gordon immediately made his appearance,
and, seeing Fleetwood's arm about his daughter's
waist, gave utterance to a significant cough.
Fleetwood turned, and telling Emily, who
seemed
violently agitated, to be calm, said to Mr.
Gordon
:
Congratulate me, sir, on my good fortune.
Your daughter has promised to be my wife.
Most heartily do I rejoice at it, my dear
Fleetwood
,
replied Mr. Gordon, taking him by the
hand. You have made this the happiest day of
my life.
When shall we be married, Emily? asked
Fleetwood. Let it be without delay; for I care
not how soon I leave this country for Europe.
Do you not hear, Emily? said her father.
Frederick asks you to fix the happy day.
Let it be when you willwhen you will,
replied
Emilyand, with a sigh, she fainted in the
arms that were supporting her.
Poor child! She faints from very excess of
happiness, said Mr. Gordon, ringing the bell, and
calling for a tumbler of cold water.
CHAPTER XVIII.
At lover's perjuries, Jove laughs.
Shakspeare
.
Two weeks after her interview with her
supposed
brother, Adelaide might have been seen
seated
in the room where that interview had taken
place. She sat lost in thoughther eyes fixed and
dilated, as if the subject, in which she was so
absorbed
,
was painful in its nature.
It may be remembered, that Mr. Gordon, on
learning from Glenham that there was danger of
La Salle's disclosing the plot, of which he had been
made the centre-wheel, had concluded that it would
be necessary to remove Adelaide from her present
place of abode, in order to prevent a discovery
which would materially interfere with the success
of his plans. On consulting with Mrs. Winfield,
they abandoned this idea. All that would be
necessary
would be to prevent the Count's seeing
Adelaide
in the event of his calling, and to persuade
him if possible that she had left the city, so that he
might discontinue his visits. The scheme thus
arranged was successfully carried out. La Salle
had been baffled in all his attempts to learn whether
or no she was in the house.
The same devices, which had been hitherto
employed
to mislead Adelaide in regard to the cause
of Fleetwood's absence, were continued with
success
for some days after the period which he had
fixed for their wedding. And then, as she began
to grow solicitous and alarmed, Glenham appeared
and helped to keep up the delusion, by assigning
new and specious reasons for his friend's apparent
neglect. In one of the forged letters which she
had received, Fleetwood had been made to
commend
this young man to her confidence; and
though she experienced an indefinable sort of
dislike
towards him, she had never yet distrusted the
genuineness of his professions or the truth of his
assertions. His inventive faculties were pretty
severely tasked by the questions which she put.
The absence of her supposed brother, as well as of
her lover, was a matter which required
explanation
.
Adelaide united a child-like ignorance of the
world, as experience shows it, to a premature
knowledge
of it as exhibited in books. It was not
difficult
to persuade her that Ernest, as she called
him, had encountered some opposition at the Custom
House, which required his immediate presence in
Washington, as well to vindicate his character as
to look after his interests.
But Adelaide had other reasons beside that
natural
distrust, which must soon have sprung up in her
mind, for her present disturbed and anxiously
meditative mood. At his last two visits, Glenham
had thrown out mysterious hints in regard to
Fleetwood
,
which had awakened her intensest solicitude.
At first these givings-out were mere expressions
of amazement at his prolonged absence, and
declarations
of inability to explain why he should suspend
writing to Adelaide. Then came the dark inuendo,
the deprecatory insinuation. the torturing doubt.
Under the mask of a disinterested concern for her
welfare, Glenham succeeded in winning her
confidence
.
He had promised her that he would satisfy
himself once for all whether Fleetwood was, as he
had pretended to be, at his country-place, detained by
engagements which he could not neglect, or whether
he had arrived in the city, and had deferred calling
from illness or any other cause. She was now
waiting, in a state of cruel suspense, the coming of
Glenham, who had promised to bring her some
definite information on the subject that morning.
To doubt was to despair with Adelaide. She
would not, therefore, even entertain a suspicion of
Fleetwood's truth; but she feared that some
accident
had occurred to him, the effects of which were
dangerous, and which he was trying to keep
concealed
from her, from motives of generosity.
Suddenly Glenham entered the room, and,
without
pausing to salute her, began pacing the floor as
if agitated and indignant.
What has happened, Mr. Glenham, that you
appear thus excited? exclaimed Adelaide, in a tone
of alarm.
Ah! how shall I communicate it to you, Miss
Adelaide? said Glenham, shaking his head
mournfully
.
I fear that you cannot bear it, or that you
will not believe itand yet nothing can be more
true.
Does it concern Fleetwood?
It does.
Adelaide was silent for nearly a minute, while
her heart beat violently and her cheeks grew pale,
and she grasped with both hands the arms of the
chair in which she sat. At length, as if nerving
herself to endure the worst, she said: Speak
freely. I am prepared to hear.
To keep you no longer in suspense, then, Miss
Adelaide, Fleetwood has forsaken youand he is
now affianced to another.
Adelaide instantly rose, her hands resting upon
the arms of the chair. She surveyed Glenham a
moment with an expression of incredulous scorn,
uttered the simple exclamation, Slanderer! and
sank back into her seat.
I was prepared for this incredulity, said he;
but you do me injustice; andI grieve to say it
I can point out to you the means of satisfying
yourself
at once, that what I have told you is true.
The lady, to whom Fleetwood is engaged, resides
in this city. Her name is GordonEmily Gordon.
Emily Gordon! exclaimed Adelaideand
does she reside in Camden Place?
It must be the same, said Glenham, much
amazed. Are you acquainted with her?
No; but I found a card bearing that name and
address, in a book which my mother procured for
me the other day. I will instantly call on Miss
Gordon.
Non-n-no! that would never do!
stammered
Glenham, who did not know what might be the
result of such an encounter. That would not be
the best way to satisfy your doubts.
Doubts! I have no doubts! said Adelaide
scornfully, rising and moving towards the door.
But I owe it to the lady to tell her what I have
heard this day. Good morning, sir.
And she quitted the room.
Glenham rang the bell violently and asked for
Mrs. Winfield. She was not in the house. He
was in despair. Should he run to Mr. Gordon's,
and put him on his guard? The hour was one
when that gentleman was almost certain to be from
home. While Glenham was yet hesitating what to
do, Adelaide, who had donned her bonnet and
shawl, passed out of the front door into the street.
He thrust on his hat, and rushed after herbut
what could he do? Any remonstrances he might
make would excite her suspicions. He found himself
caught in his own toils. The straight forwardness
of Adelaide's character had been more than a match
for his own craft. Her decision had baffled his
calculating and elaborated policy. He slunk along
the streets keeping his eyes fixed upon her
movements
,
without daring to let her know that he was
following her, and without being able to invent any
new lie, by which he could defeat her purpose.
Adelaide had little difficulty in finding the house
of Mr. Gordon. She rang, and asked to see Miss
Emily. The servant replied that she had gone out
to walk. I will wait for her return, said
Adelaide
;
and the servant ushered her into the parlor,
bowed and left the room. The weather was warm;
and Adelaide, attracted by the sight of flowers and
falling water, moved towards the conservatory.
She had not been there two minutes when she heard
the sound of footsteps and a voice, which made her
tremble. Indeed so powerless did agitation render
her, that she was obliged to cling to the nearest
object
,
which happened to be the trunk of an orange
tree, for support. As she looked through the leaves,
which concealed her from view, into the suite of
rooms beyond, she saw Fleetwood enter with a
lady on his arm. They approached a sofa, upon
which they sat down as if fatigued by their stroll.
The sight seemed to paralyse the functions of
motion
in Adelaide. For an instant, she could not
moveshe could not speak. She thought she must
be under the influence of some horrid night-mare,
and that all that had passed and was passing before
her was but a dream.
To-morrow, then, Emily, said Fleetwood,
to-morrow
sees us united! Why do you sigh? One
would think you had half repented of this
engagement
.
Oh, nono! replied Emily. We ought to
be very happy. I am sure I shall make
one
person
happy, and that is my fatherand I shall try,
Fleetwood
,
to make
you
happy also.
Adelaide had been from compulsion a listener to
these words. Their first effect was terrible; and
she thought she would have swooned. But a sense
of her situation, and, perhaps, an emotion of pride
came to her relief, and made her sinews bear her
stiffly up. The conclusion at which she at once
arrived was, that Fleetwood, surrounded by the
luxury and affluence visible in this abode, had
become
ashamed of his allegiance to one, who was
the child of obscurity, perhaps of dishonor. The
sickening feeling of desertion, of desolation, then
came over her, and almost bowed her to the earth.
But she knew if she gave way to it she was lost.
What should she do? Should she pass out of
the room before the eyes of Fleetwood and the new
companion of his choice, or should she escape
unobserved
by a side-door, which led into the passage
communicating with the front entrance of the
house? She feared that her remaining strength
would give way should she confront Fleetwood; and
what purpose could the meeting answer? The
evidence against him was irresistible. There could
be no delusion in what she had seen and heard.
What further testimony could she ask?
But even in that moment of doubt and desolation,
she could not endure the idea of skulking like a
criminal from the presence of her whom she had
come to seek; and severe as the trial was, she
resolved
to take the bold and ingenuous alternative.
With a bearing at once modest and majestic she
stepped forth from her place of concealment, and
advanced towards Emily. Fleetwood started up
with amazement, as if appalled by the sight of a
spectre; for Adelaide, with a little aid from the
imagination
,
might well have passed for one, such was
the luminous pallor of her countenance.
If this is Miss Gordon, said Adelaide, it is
she whom I came to seek. But I have already
attained
the object of my errand, and it is
unnecessary
that I should say more. I will take my leave.
She was moving towards the door.
Adelaide! exclaimed Fleetwood, gasping for
utterance.
Adelaide! And is this Adelaide? asked Emily
in a tone of pity and surprise.
Adelaide turned, cast a glance full of mournful
dignity upon Fleetwood, and then slowly resumed
her steps towards the door.
Adelaide! speak to me! exclaimed Fleetwood
in a tone of the acutest anguishwas it not all
some horrid delusiona dreama trick of the
senses?
Adelaide paused; there was a mystery in
Fleetwood's
interrogation, which she could not fathom.
The moment was a crisis in her fate. A straw
might turn the balance either wayso as to result
in a triumphant explanation of all doubtful
circumstances
or in a renewed conviction of her
unworthiness
.
Alas! her evil genius prevailed.
At that juncture, Mrs. Winfield burst into the
room.
Why, my dear, dear daughter, are you here?
she exclaimed approaching Adelaide, who
inadvertently
recoiled from her touch. How could
you leave your old mother? Come homecome
home, and all shall be forgiven. Has the villain
forsaken you after promising you marriage? Never
mind, my dearnever mind!
Oh, this humiliation is too much! groaned
Adelaide
,
rushing from the room.
Poor thing! poor thing! said Mrs. Winfield,
turning to Emily. Was it not a sin and a shame.
Miss, for that Count what-d'ye-call-him to treat
the child so basely? I could tear his eyes out
I could!
Fleetwood was confounded. If the day-dream
had ever occurred to him that there was still a
possibility of Adelaide's innocence, this last
occurrence
must forever dispel it.
Poor, degraded Adelaide! he exclaimed. Did
ever sin so clothe itself in the vesture of an angel!
Mrs. Winfield rejoined her daughter on the outer
steps, and hurrying her into the carriage, which
stood in waiting at the side-walk, drove home in
silence.
For days, Adelaide could not weep, although she
ever repaid with a faint smile any little office of
kindness proffered by those around her. But the
fountain of tears seemed to have been parched up.
It is related of Southey, that during the eclipse
of his magnificent intellect in his latter days, when
a gloomy derangement had shut out the immortal
soul from the regular use of its accustomed medium
of communication with the external world, he
retained
to the last his old affection for books. He
would find his way to his splendid library, and there
sit with a black letter volume open on his lap,
gazing
on one page for hours, and at times moving his
fingers, as if making written extracts.
And Adelaide, having been accustomed to find a
never failing solace in books, now sat with some
favorite volume in her hands, and her eyes fixed on
some page, although her thoughts might be far
away. At length a passage, which she had gazed
at for a long while without taking in its meaning
aroused her attention. The lines were these:
Nature hath assigned
Two sovereign remedies for human grief;
Religion, surest, firmest, first and best,
And strenuous action next.
Ay, it is true, she said, with a melancholy
smile. I feel that it is truebut this desolation of
the heartthis tearless, passionless sorrow seems
as if it were without a remedyas if death only
could end it.
The thought had hardly found utterance when a
strain of music from the street beneath the window
at which she sat, fell on her ear. It was the noisy
garish hour of noon, and the rumbling of cars over
the pavements, joined to the cries of the peripatetic
venders of radishes, strawberries and other articles
of summer consumption, afforded little opportunity
for the musicians, whosoever they might be, to make
themselves heard. But above all the chaotic
tumult
,
and running through it like a vein of pure
gold through a rocky mass composed of baser
substances, floated a melody, which at once made
her start and listen as if her very life depended on
the hearing.
Where and when had she heard that strain?
And why should it bring back such a throng of
happy images and thoughts? It was as if her soul
were suddenly transported over dreary years to a
time of contentment and joy in the sunny season of
childhood. She seemed to breathe
A purer ether, a diviner air!
It was as if her spirit had thrown off the memory
of all intervening events, and, by some miracle, had
renewed its youth. While she listened, her tears
fell profuselyher breast heavedand, when the
music ceased, she exclaimed half sobbing and half
laughingI have wept at last! I feared I should
never weep again!
The melody was one which she was
accustomed
to hear years before when she lived in the
family
of Greutze, the German musician. Looking out
of the window she saw two females and a boy, who,
by their dress, were evidently foreigners. The
younger female, a pale and interesting girl, played
upon the harp, and the other sang in a feeble but
sweet and cultivated voice. From the strap over
the boy's shoulder, and the cap in his hand, it was
apparently his office to carry the harp and receive
the scanty pennies, which the passers-by, who
lingered
to listen, might choose to bestow. There
was that in the appearance of each member of the
group, which spoke their superiority to the common
class of strolling melodists. Moved by the
unobtrusive
and unsuccessful appeal, which they made
for charity to their audience, as well as by gratitude
for the effect which their music had produced,
Adelaide
took a gold piece from her purse, and
hurrying
down stairs into the street, placed it in the
hands of the harp-player. The young woman
looked at the gift and at the giver with
astonishment
.
She held the gold piece displayed in her
hand, as if tacitly enquiring whether there was not
some mistakeshe could hardly realize that such
munificence was real.
How long have you been in New York? asked
Adelaide in German; for, from an exclamation,
which the boy had made, she at once guessed
the country of their birth.
We came here last winter, Miss, said the elder
of the two women, who was apparently agreeably
surprised to find that their benefactor could speak
their native language. We came in the
expectation
of meeting a brother, who had sent for us, and
who promised to provide for our wants. On
arriving
in this city we learned that he had left for
Hamburgh in a ship, which has never since been
heard of. Our little supply of money was soon
exhausted; and had we not met a friend, who lent
us this harp, with which to earn what we may, we
should soon have been utterly destitute.
Is this your sister? asked Adelaide, pointing
to the younger woman.
I thank Heaven that I can say she is, was the
replyfor what would I and my five motherless
children do without her? Is she not our support
and our pridelaboring for us all day, although we
have no right to look to her for a penny?
Where did you learn that tune you played
last? asked Adelaide turning to the younger sister.
I lived for some months in the family of a
musician named Greutze, replied the harp-player.
He returned to the village where we dwelt, some
years since from this country. Seeing that I had a
taste for music he was kind enough to instruct me,
although, Miss, I was a mere servant in the family.
It was like him to do so! exclaimed Adelaide,
while her eyes filled again with tears. Did you
leave them wellthe Greutzes?
And did you know them, Miss? Is it possible?
I lived with them for some years, and loved
them much. How could you have abandoned such
a home?
The harp-player hung her head; and the elder
sister, leading Adelaide away a few steps, said, in
a whisper: Poor child! it was no fault of hers.
A young man in the village had promised her
marriage
.
He forgot his promise one day, and having
thrived rapidly in the world, married a daughter of
the musician. Minnie (that's my sister) never
would tell her wrongs, for she saw that her young
mistress loved the man. About that time came
our brother's invitation to us to visit New York.
`Let us go,' said Minnie. `It is best for me that I
should leave this place.' I saw her meaning. We
straightway left Germanyandandyou know
the rest.
Adelaide had been visibly agitated while the
woman
was relating these circumstances; but seeing
that several inquisitive individuals among the
passers-by
had stopped to stare at her, she concluded
to bring the interview to a close, although anxious
to ask many questions about her old friend Greutze
and his family.
In what part of the city do you live? she asked,
turning to the younger and more intelligent
woman
.
I see you have a pencil. I will write the
direction
for you on the blank leaf of your book, said
Minnie.
In her haste Adelaide had retained in her hand
the book, which she had been reading. She
handed
it with her pencil to the harp-player, who wrote
and returned them.
God bless you, sweet lady, said the woman,
and the words were echoed both by the sister and
the boy.
I hope to see you again soon, said Adelaide;
and, with a smile and a wave of the hand, she left
them, and re-entered the house.
CHAPTER XIX.
O night, and shades!
How are ye join'd with hell in triple knot
Against the unarmed weakness of the virgin,
Alone and helpless!
Milton
.
Ungrateful
that I have been! thought Adelaide
as she ascended the stairs to the room, which she
had recently occupied. This poor, uneducated
peasant girl sets me an example of fortitude and
patience
!
I will follow it. I will no longer waste
my days in idle repining. I will go forth into the
world. I will exert the talents which God has
given
me. I will make myself useful to my
fellow-creatures
.
While entertaining reflections like these, a
servant
brought in Mr. Glenham's card, remarking
that the gentleman was below. Adelaide had
declined
seeing Mr. Glenham on all the occasions
and they were manythat he had called, since the
day of her visit to the house of Mr. Gordon. But
now, as the first step towards keeping her new
resolutions
,
she determined to give him an audience.
Glenham could not disguise the admiration, with
which he regarded Adelaide, as she now entered the
room where he was sitting. Distress of mind had
robbed her features of none of their charms. They
had lost a certain archness and piquancy of
expression
,
which they used occasionally to wear; but
in its place there was a composure, a serenity, such
as limners give to their angels.
After interchanging greetings with him, Adelaide
asked: Do you hear anything of my brother, Mr.
Glenham?
Glenham turned away his head, and appeared
confused.
You hesitate! Has anything happened to him?
continued Adelaide in a tone of alarm.
Ah, Miss Adelaide, said Glenham, why is it
my lot ever to come to you as the messenger of
unhappy tidings? I hardly dare tell you all that
has come to my knowledge in regard to
circumstances
,
in which you have been recently involved
but I owe it to youto myselfto disburthen my
mind. You have been the victim of a conspiracy.
He whom you believed to be your brother was an
impostor. He is no kinsman of yours.
Ernest not my brother! Impossible! I could
not have been deceived. There was all the brother
in his look, when we parted, said Adelaide.
O, I doubt not that he played his part quite
adroitly, said Glenham; but he was
nevertheless
an actor in a plotan infamous plot!
How could my mother have been imposed
upon
!
exclaimed Adelaide.
Ah, there is the most afflicting part of what I
have to communicate! replied Glenham.
Speak out, Mr. Glenhamthere are few things,
which I cannot now bear to hear with calmness,
said Adelaide.
And yet what I have to say must inevitably
strike you with consternation and grief, resumed
Glenham; and I fear that I shall again have to
make you distrust my veracity.
No, said Adelaide, with a mournful movement
of her head: after what has passed there is little
fear that I shall be again incredulous.
Your mother, Miss Adelaide
Ah, what of
her?
exclaimed Adelaide, with
an involuntary shudder.
Hush! said Glenham, sinking his voice to a
whisper, and looking cautiously around the room.
Are we in no danger of being overheard?
And what, sir, if we are? replied Adelaide.
There can be no secret between us in any event.
Alas! I know not that, said Glenham
mysteriously
.
Your mother, Miss Adelaide, was a
party
to the plot laid for your ruin.
How, for my ruin? asked Adelaide, in a tone
of amazement.
Must I speak plainly? said Glenham. Know
then, that your motherthat this housepardon
my agitation. In a word, Miss Adelaide, you
cannot
be seen entering this house or issuing from it,
without being considered infamous in the eyes of
the world. Your mother is unworthy of such a
child as you. She is a degraded woman; and,
what is worse, she does not hide her degradation.
In spite of her predetermination to be calm,
Adelaide
could not but feel the crushing effect of this
last blow. She seemed to writhe like the tortured
Laocoon in the folds of the pestiferous serpent; and
she pressed against her eyes with her closed fists
as if to shut out the hideous thoughts which
Glenham's
words had suggested. Unconsciously she
sighed several times like one in the extreme of pain;
and for a minute the internal struggle that was
going
on threatened to rend her delicate frame. At
length, with a sudden effort, she recovered her
presence
of mind, and sat erect with the mien of one
nerved to a heroic calmness.
Why was I made to believe, she asked, that
I had a brother?
Can you not imagine? returned Glenham.
The young man came here for the most
detestable
purposes. He had the consent of your mother
to reduce youif he could so far undermine your
principles of virtueto her own infamous level.
But you are faint?
9
Go on, sir. You seeyou see I am quite
composed
.
The young man, said Glenham, was struck
with contrition on finding you so young, so
innocent
;
and he left youto expostulate with your
mother, who then ordered him out of the house.
Adelaide rose and laid her hand upon the
bell-rope
.
What would you do? exclaimed Glenham,
alarmed.
I would see my mother, and hear what she has
to say to your charges, replied Adelaide.
Stay but a moment, said Glenham, imploringly,
arresting her in the act of ringing.
Adelaide withdrew her hand.
Ah me! What's to be done, should this prove
true? she exclaimed, as if addressing the question
to her own heart. With such a mother I am
more bereaved than an orphanwithout a brother
without a friendwhat shall I do?
Do not say you are friendless, while I am here,
Adelaide, said Glenham, with a sad attempt to
look irresistible.
Adelaide recoiled from him at this familiar use of
her name. With what joy she had heard it, when
Fleetwood first addressed her with the same
absence
of form!
Hear me, Adelaide, continued Glenham,
without
perceiving her aversion. Accept the
honorable
refuge, which I offer you, from all your
dangers
and griefs. I tendered you my hand when I
thought your position as unexceptionable as my
ownwhen I believed you to be wealthy, courted
and caressedand now, when these illusions are
gonewhen I see you discarded, exposed to insult
and degradation, and subjected to social exclusions
by the stain of birth, I renew my offer, and beseech
you to listen to my suit. Surely the generosity,
the disinterestedness of my attachment are now
placed beyond a doubt.
You must have strange ideas of generosity,
sir, said Adelaide, approaching the bell, and
ringing
it, to select an opportunity like this for
addressing
to me a renewal of your offensive
proposal
.
It may be well to say in this place, that
Glenham's
pretended disclosures contained some truth,
mixed up with a considerable quantity of falsehood.
Whatever may have been Mrs. Winfield's
delinquencies
in past years, she was now, and had been
from the time of Adelaide's birth, so far as outward
appearances were concerned, perfectly respectable.
She lived secluded, and, although she kept a
carriage
,
and was evidently in the enjoyment of
abundant
means, yet there was no disposition evinced
on her part to attract public attention, or to make a
show. She belonged, ostensibly at least, to one of the
most rigorous religious sects; and, as she gave
largely
to the church of which she was a member, she was
regarded even by those who were aware of her
history, as a reclaimed sinner, who deserved to be
countenanced and upheld. She was visited by
none but persons of character and respectability,
and Adelaide had never detected aught that could
be recalled to substantiate Glenham's assertions.
And yet when she recollected an occasional
coarseness
of expression or a trait of vulgarity, she
dreaded
lest they might all be true.
For reasons, which we must leave it to the sequel
to explain, Mrs. Winfield was now exceedingly
anxious that Glenham and Adelaide should be
united
;
and she had recently had several anxious
conferences
with the gentleman for the purpose of
arranging
some new plot for the achievement of their
purposes. The notable one which he finally hit
upon, was that, which may be inferred from his
interview
with Adelaide. He thought it would be an
easy matter to persuade her, that her only chance
of receiving honorable protection was in uniting
herself to him, and that it was a moral duty as well
as a matter of advantage for her to accede to his
proposal. The necessity of speedy action on his
part was evident from the recent visit which she had
made to Emily Gordon. Had he not, by the merest
accident, met Mrs. Winfield in her carriage, and
put her upon her guard, a developement fatal to
their plans would inevitably have been the result.
He had, after some persuasion, induced this woman
to agree to his present scheme, and to uphold, should
it be necessary to do so, in order to influence
Adelaide
,
all the falsehoods he had told her in regard
to the reputation of her mother's house.
Having received Adelaide's summons, Mrs.
Winfield
now entered the room. Her demeanor was not,
as it was habitually, imperious and bustling; but
she had the air of a culprit, who shrinks from the
interrogations to which he is about to be subjected.
Is it truewhat this man tells me? exclaimed
Adelaide, advancing and looking her firmly in the
face. O, tell me, is it true? Have I been indeed
deceived? Was he not my brother, who met me
here as such, and who received me with what I
supposed a brother's embrace? You are silent
you hesitate! Can it be true? And are you then
my
mother?
Forgive me, Adelaide; but
Forgive you! And do you then admit that I
have anything to forgive? O, you cannot be
my
mother, if what he tells me is true! The same
blood flows not in our veinsthe same instincts
plead not in our heartsthe same fire kindles not
our souls! O, are you indeed my mother?
And how dare you, sir, said Mrs. Winfield,
turning to Glenham with well-feigned resentment,
how dare you slander me to my own child?
You cannot deny, madam, the truth of what I
have told her, replied Glenham. You cannot
deny that the person you introduced as her brother
was an impostor. Be careful, or I shall bring
witnesses
to prove all that I have said.
Mrs. Winfield looked abashed and turned away
without replying.
You do not speak, madamyou do not
indignantly
repel his charges! exclaimed Adelaide.
O, tell me, have I a brother, or did you deceive
me in telling me that I had one?
Pray don't take on so, child, said Mrs.
Winfield
,
apparently not knowing what to say. Where
was the harm, if, for the sake of a joke, I made you
think the young man was your brother?
A joke! Alas! mothers do not joke in that
manner, replied Adelaide. I have been
betrayed
!
Is there no one on whom I can rely?
Am I aloneall, all alone in the wide world?
Ah, Miss Adelaide, let me guide you in safety
from this house, said Glenham. I will protect
will succor you. If you will not suffer me to be a
husband, you will at least grant me the privileges of
a friend.
And you, madam, are you willing that I should
place myself under his protection? asked Adelaide,
turning a look of piercing inquiry upon Mrs.
Winfield
.
Yes, child, go! said Mrs. Winfield, since he
has persuaded you that you are not sufficiently
protected in my house.
Adelaide paused, and seemed to be in deep
thought for a moment. And then, glancing at
Glenham, she said, Wait till you hear from me,
and quitted the room.
Poor thing! exclaimed Mrs. Winfield, as the
door closed. Do you know, Glenham, that I was
several times on the point of coming out with the
whole truth?
And, if you had, I should certainly have
strangled
you, said Glenham. Do you not see she is
wavering, and that before another day she will
consent to an immediate marriage? Once let her
place herself under my protection, and it will be
easy to persuade her that her reputation is gone
forever unless she becomes my wife.
I don't know what to make of her sometimes,
said Mrs. Winfield. Gentle and soft as she seems
to be, I felt while she was talking just as if I should
have gone down on my knees, and confessed
everything
if she had but said the word. I wish that
you and Gordon had been further before you led
me into this business.
Nonsense! I shall make her a pattern of a
husband, said Glenham; and she will be much
happier with me than she would have been with
that purse-proud Fleetwood.
I would not harm the poor child for the world,
rejoined Mrs. Winfield; and if I thought you
would ever ill-treat her, Glenham, I would not give
her to you for twice the amount of her dowry.
The conversation between these partners in
iniquity was continued nearly an hour longer;
when Glenham becoming impatient at Adelaide's
prolonged absence, requested Mrs. Winfield to go
in search of her.
She is not in her room, exclaimed this woman,
returning from her search; but on her
dressing-table
,
I found this note.
Glenham seized itsaw that it bore his name as
the direction, and, tearing off the envelope, read
these words:
With the blessing of Heaven, I can
protect myself. Farewell. Adelaide
.
Fools, idiots that we have been! The girl has
escaped! exclaimed Glenham, stamping his foot
with rage. She has foiled us after all! After all
our plottingall our manuvring, she has foiled
us!
Gone! Has the child really gone? said Mrs.
Winfield, in tones of alarm.
To be sure she has, old woman!
Old woman indeed! Don't old woman me, sir,
said Mrs. Winfield bristling with choler.
Forgive me, I did not know what I was
saying
,
returned Glenham. I will start instantly
in pursuit. Perhaps I may track her yet. We are
friends again, Augusta?
I don't know that. But go! find out if you
can, where the child has gone to, and bring me
word immediately. It would be ruinous were we
to lose her at this time.
CHAPTER XX.
Against the threats
Of malice, or of sorcery, or that power
Which erring men call
chance
, this I hold firm;
Virtue may be assail'd, but never hurt,
Surpris'd by unjust force, but not enthrall'd.
Milton
.
The
attempt to deceive Adelaide in regard to
the character of her present home had been
successful
.
The confused and indecisive manner in
which Mrs. Winfield had met the gross accusations
brought by Glenham seemed a conclusive proof of
her guilt. But the parties to the deception little
dreamed that the result would be so different from
what they had calculated. They little imagined
that Adelaide, destitute and deserted, would reject
the protection of Glenham, even when offered under
the pretence of friendship.
Appalled by what she had heard, her first thought
was to escape from the house immediately, and at
any hazard. After that had been accomplished it
would be time enough for her to consider what was
to become of her. She ran up stairs into her room,
hastily seized her shawl and bonnet, and gliding
gently down to the street-door, opened it and issued
forth into the open air. Hurrying round the
neighboring
corner, she took a circuitous route from
street to street, until she found herself at the gate of
St. John's Park. The gate was accidentally open,
and, unaware that the residents of the stately houses
which surrounded the square, were alone privileged
to walk in this shady retreat, she entered.
Did that lady show you her ticket of admission,
Patrick? asked one of the deputy gardeners of
another.
Isn't that face of hers ticket enough, you fool?
replied Patrick. Who would think of asking a
lady, the likes of that one, for a ticket?
Adelaide passed on, and took a seat in the shade
of a catalpa tree. It was not till then that she
began
to revolve the question,
where shall I go?
It
suddenly occurred to her to see how much money
she had remaining in her purse. Alas! it was
empty. Her last half-eagle had been given to the
wandering minstrels, who had roused her by their
music under her windows. But stay! She had
their addressit was inscribed on the blank leaf
of one of her volumescould she but recall it to
mind! Ay, memory now serves her a good turn.
She remembers the streetthe number of the
house. I will go to them! she said. I could
not have been deceived in their looks. They must
be honest, though nothing but vagrant minstrels.
Poor as they are, they are the only friends I have
in this crowded metropolis. To whom else can I
look for shelter and protection!
She rose and moved towards the gate. As she
reached it she looked up to see a splendid
olive-colored
barouche roll by, with its liveried driver and
footman. It contained Fleetwood and Emily
Gordon
!
Adelaide paused as if a sudden heart-ache had shot
through her frame. But in an instant she was firm,
and walked on with a proud and elastic step. Was
it an emotion of envy that brought the cloud to her
face? Ah, no! It was a momentary regret that
her young heart's creed had been so early trampled
onthat her faith in human honor had received so
severe a shock. But then came the consciousness
that she herself had never wronged a human being
by thought or deed, and she was re-assured and
sustained.
After an hour's search Adelaide reached the
house, of which she was in quest. It was a more
respectable looking building than she had expected
to find; but she soon discovered that it was
occupied
by some dozen families, and that it would be
a matter of no little difficulty to learn which
apartment
was occupied by her German friends. After
knocking at several doors and instituting a number
of fruitless inquiries, she found herself in the attic
story of the house, with a door on each side of the
landing-place at the head of the stairs. She
rapped
with her sun-shade at the nearest of these
doors, and her summons was speedily answered by
a woman of somewhat elderly appearance who
wore spectacles, and, as she opened the door, stood
bent over in a position to keep a parcel of silk stuff,
on which she had been sewing, from rolling from
her lap.
9*
Can you tell me where a German family, named
Mulder, reside in this building? asked Adelaide.
Pray walk in, Miss, said Mrs. Rugby, for that
was the name of the elderly woman in spectacles.
Adelaide readily complied with the invitation,
for she felt fatigued by her long walk. The room
into which she entered, though an attic apartment,
was large, and received the light from four
windows
,
so that it had a bright and cheerful aspect.
The front exposure looked out upon the North
River; and the Hoboken ridge, with its green
woods, was plainly to be seen on the opposite bank.
A girl apparently not more than ten years of age,
and beautiful as a sylph, was whirling about the
floor with an airy, graceful movement as Adelaide
crossed the threshold. But on seeing a stranger,
she stopped, curtsied, and walked to the window,
which was open.
The furniture of this apartment, though scanty,
was neat and comfortable. A large double bed
stood in the remotest corner. A black walnut
bureau, a wash-stand, a piano or harp stool, a music
rack, half a dozen chairs, a round table containing
a work-box, surrounded by tassels, spangles and
skeins of bright colored silk, were the objects which
the eye took in on a hasty survey.
Pray take a seat, Miss, continued Mrs. Rugby,
throwing down her work, and placing a chair.
The poor foreigners, after whom you ask, are out
traversing the streets in the hope of picking up a
few pennies. They live in the opposite room; and
will be back soonas light as they went, I will be
bound! Poor things! If it hadn't been for the
five dollars you gave them, the landlord would
have turned them neck and heels out of the house
before this.
And how did you know that it was I who gave
them the money? asked Adelaide, surprised.
O, they could speak English words enough to
describe you to me very well, Miss, said Mrs.
Rugby; and the moment I set eyes on you, I
knew that you must be the person they meant. It
was very good of you, Miss, to help them; for they
are as deserving as they are poor.
I suspect I am not the only one who has helped
them, if I may draw an inference from the
harp-stool
without the harp, said Adelaide.
It is very true, Miss, that I lent them my harp,
which I treasure, because it belonged to my only
daughter, who is dead and gone, and who was the
mother of that poor child you see there. But, dear
me! the mere lending a harp is little enough to do
for one's next door neighbor. The will must be
taken for the deed in my case.
You are the friend of these poor people, madam,
said Adelaide, abruptlyyou know their resources
the extent of their accommodations. Think you,
they could receive me for a brief time, and let me
lodge under their roof until I am able to earn for
myself enough to support me?
Receive
you!
exclaimed Mrs. Rugby, almost
petrified with astonishmentreceive you as a
lodger under their roofwhy, Miss, what is the
meaning of such a proposition?
Adelaide hesitated, for she was debating with
herself the propriety of revealing to one, who, until
the last two minutes was an utter stranger to her,
the cause of her abandoning a home, where she was
surrounded by all the luxuries which wealth could
procure. But she thought of the incident of the
harp; and believing that the woman who would do
such an act of kindness, would appreciate the
motives
of her conduct, she communicated with a
simple earnestness of manner, and in a few brief
sentences the whole story of her life up to the
present
moment.
When she had concluded, she looked up, and saw
that her hearer had taken off her spectacles to wipe
her eyes, which were literally suffused with tears.
The little girl, too, had gradually drawn near, until,
leaning on the back of her grandmother's chair, she
listened with a look of premature intelligence.
And are you utterly destitute, my dear? asked
Mrs. Rugby.
Alas! yes, madam! I have nothing with me
but the apparel which you see; and my purse is
empty. Do you think it possible that I can induce
these poor German women to give me shelter for
a while?
They have not the power to serve you, my
dear, however strong they may have the will.
Then, what will become of me?
Become of you! Why, haven't I a nice large
bed, and plenty to eat, with the Croton water at my
elbow, as handy as a pocket in a shirt?
That's my own, dear, dear grandmother!
exclaimed
the little girl, the tears springing to her
eyes, while she threw her arms about the woman's
neck.
Child, child, you will choke me! Get away,
Florinda! exclaimed Mrs. Rugby, trying to make
it appear that it was the child's embrace, and not
her own tears which were choking her.
Is it real? exclaimed Adelaideand do
you
,
madam, whose name even I do not knowdo you
offer mea stranger, an outcastprotection and
shelter?
To be sure I do! said Mrs. Rugby, taking
Adelaide by the hand. And as for clothes, I have
a whole trunk full of clothes that belonged to my
poor daughter, and which I have been keeping for
this child when she is big enough to wear them.
They will just fit you, my dear, and with a little
altering they can be made as fashionable as you
please.
Ah! what goodness! Heaven grant that I may
live to repay you! At present I can give you only
my tearsa melancholy recompense!
Nonsense, child! Wouldn't you do as much
for me, if I was as badly off, and you had the
means? To be sure you would! Here I am,
living
all alone with this little girl, and with nobody
to support but ourselves and Florinda's brother
Charley, we call himwho is at school in the
country.
Ah! I fear that I shall be a burthen. Can I not
assist you in your occupations? What may be the
nature of them?
We belong to the theatre, my dear. To be
sure I am nothing but assistant costumer; but
Florinda
dances between the plays, and is called on the
bills, Fanny Elssler the younger
Fanny Elssler
, in
very big capitals, and
the younger
, in the smallest
possible letters. Ah, my dear, the day of the
legitimate
drama is gone by. Poor Rugby! It was a
terrible blow to him, Miss, to see horses and clowns
and wild beasts draw audiences, while Hamlet was
played to empty benches. Rugby used to play the
ghost of Hamlet's father, Miss. Ah! It was the
death of him when he had to give up the ghost, and
descend to melodrama and pantomime. He never
held up his head after that. The degradation was
too much for him.
And was your daughter an actress?
Yes, poor thing! But she never took kindly to
the stage. She used to play the walking genteel
young ladiesMaria, in the School for Scandal,
and such parts. She married Romainepoor Tom
you may have heard of him, Missthe best
Mercutio
on the boards, and a true gentleman. Poor
fellow! He and his wife were blown up in the
Moselle, while on their way to play at New Orleans.
Their wardrobes had been put on board another
boat, and they were saved. This child and her
brother had been left behind under my charge. I
shouldn't have cared to live a day longer but for
that.
And may I ask if you find your present
employment
profitable?
Ah, my dear, theatricals are at such a very low
ebb, that we costumers can't make a third part of
what we used to. And as for Fanny Elssler the
younger, she has been put on half pay the last
monthso you see business is not quite as
flourishing
with us as it was formerly. But hark! I
hear the Germans on the stairs with the harp!
Mrs. Rugby rose and threw open the door. She
was apparently about sixty-five years old, this
manufacturer of theatrical costumeswith a round,
good-humored contented face, a figure decidedly
stout, and a loud, hearty voice. She was dressed
in a robe of dark calico, and her gray hairs were
concealed by a muslin cap of unsullied whiteness.
Come in, and see a friend! exclaimed Mrs.
Rugby, looking out upon the strolling minstrels,
who were ascending the stairs.
As they entered, the women instantly recognised
their benefactress, and pressed her hand to their
lips with a show of unaffected gratitude. The boy,
who had not seen her at the moment, set the harp
down in its place with a look of discouragement
and discontent.
Poor luck to-day, eh, Gustave? said Mrs.
Rugby.
The boy showed his empty hat, and smiled
bitterly
;
and then, seeing Adelaide, he approached, and,
bowing respectfully, followed the example of his
sisters.
Lest unfounded hopes of farther assistance might
be awakened in the minds of her foreign
protegs
,
Adelaide thought it best to apprise them at once of
the circumstances, under which she came there.
This she did in a few touching words; and when
she made known the fact that she had come to ask
of
them
of them, the poor, despised vagrant
minstrels
succor
and protectionthe sisters looked at
each other with swelling bosoms and moist eyes,
while the boy clenched his fists, and seemed to
swell to the stature of a man.
The minstrels left the room, but in a few
moments
the boy returned, and took away the harp;
and, on looking out of the window some moments
afterwards, Adelaide saw them moving off with
more than ordinary speed, to try their luck once
more in the noisy, music-killing streets.
Mrs. Rugby had another visitor, but in this case
an unwelcome one, before conversation was
resumed
between her and Adelaide. A bill for the
last quarter's schooling of Master Charles Romaine
was brought in by a stiff, severe-looking,
monosyllabic
individual, who presented the account in
silence
and in silence awaited a reply.
Call again on Saturday, said Mrs. Rugby,
while a visible shade of concern passed over her
countenance.
On Saturday, said the austere gentleman.
This is the first time I have ever put off these
schooling bills, said Mrs. Rugby, with a transient
look of dismay. And then resuming her mood of
habitual cheerfulness, she took up her work and
began to chat as if nothing had happened.
But Adelaide was too much immersed in thought
to talk, and Mrs. Rugby was delighted to find that
she had so patient a listener.
I must not be idle with such examples before
me, and under the spur of such necessities, thought
Adelaide. But what can I do?
CHAPTER XXI.
Beware! for my revenge
Is as the seal'd commission of a king,
That kills, and none dare name the murderer.
Shelley
.
Notwithstanding
the undisguised impatience of
Mr. Gordon at the repeated delays of the
consummation
by marriage of the match between his
daughter and Fleetwood, this event, to which he
looked forward so anxiously, was, upon various
pretences, deferred till late in the autumn. But at
length a day, which had been definitely fixed for
the ceremony some time before, had arrived; and
nothing had occurred to induce either party to ask
for a reprieve. In order to render it the more
awkward for them to do so, Mr. Gordon had taken
good care to send out invitations to a large circle
of friends.
The ceremony was to take place at twelve
o'clock. It wanted some forty minutes of that
hour. Fleetwood, who always dressed with
consummate
taste, had not thought it worth while to
make any other change in his attire than to put on
a plain white vest in the place of that which he
usually wore. In a mood half reckless and half
indifferent he entered the parlor and flung himself
at full length upon the sofa.
Some young men, friends of the family, began to
drop in.
Shall I introduce these people to you? asked
Rodney, the master of the ceremonies.
Wait a while, my dear fellow, said Fleetwood;
it will be time enough by and by. Let me rest
in quiet.
Rodney walked away; and Fleetwood, covering
his eyes with his hand, seemed to solicit repose. In
a few minutes, two young men, engaged in
conversation
,
passed him and took seats not far distant.
One of these interlocutors was Glenham; the other
a Mr. Bettencourt.
By the way, Glenham, have you heard of the
new
debutante?
asked Bettencourt.
I haven't been to the theatre since the spring,
replied Glenham, who was evidently bored by the
assiduities of his companion.
Then let me tell you that you have missed a
great deal, said Bettencourt. The prettiest girl
I have seen this many a day appeared for the first
time in opera the other night. Miserably slim
housenobody therebut she astonished the
judicious
fewthat's a fact.
Very likely. By the way, who makes your
boots?
Kimball and Rogers. But let me tell you of
the debutante. She played Amina in
La
Somnambula
Anglicisedand devilish well she did it
that's a fact! Such a scene as she made of that at
the end of the second act, where she sings `I'm not
guilty!' By George! the chorus and all the other
actors on the stage seemed so stupified with
wonder
,
that they forgot their cues. An old fellow,
who sat in the box with me, and who has heard all
the best singing of the last half century, applauded
like a mad person, and, as the curtain fell, swore
that Malibran had never equalled that scene.
Very likely. Why the deuce don't the women
come?
By the way, do you know this girl looks like
Emily Gordon? A confounded sight prettier
though, between ourselves! You must go to hear
her, Glenham, if she plays again.
Thank youI care very little for music.
She hasn't appeared on the boards since the
article in the last week's Scorpion. Do you read
the Scorpion? Capital paper! Full of fun! Has
hits at every bodytouches people on the raw in
fine stylethat's a fact. Well; if the Scorpion's
story is true, this girl is under the protection of the
fellow, who played the lover, Elvino, in the opera
what the deuce is his name? I forget. No
matter
!
You would have said the same thing
yourself
,
if you heard the way in which she sang `Yes,
I am thine, love!' It was perfect nature, and so
earnest, that I am sure there could have been no
sham about it. She meant every word she said.
It wasn't
acting
that's a fact!
Well, Bettencourt, since you have nothing
better
to do, why don't you cut out this Mr. Elvino,
and carry off this Misswhat did you say her
name was?
She was announced on the bills simply as a
young American lady; but the Scorpion says, her
name is Adelaide Winfield, and that she is the
daughter of. Why, what the deuce is the matter
with you, my dear fellow?
Glenham started up, and crossed the room
rapidly
as if to seek a friend in the adjoining apartment;
but in reality he was trying to hide his emotion.
Fleetwood raised himself from his recumbent
posture, for he could not well avoid over-hearing
Bettencourt's remarks, inasmuch as that gentleman
always spoke in a remarkably loud and ambitious
tone. But at that juncture, Mr. Gordon entered
with a party of ladies, and Fleetwood, with a heavy
heart, rose to his feet and bowed.
Well, Fleetwood, my boy, enjoy your single
blessedness while you may, said Mr. Gordon.
You have but ten minutes longer to lead the life
of a bachelor. Had you not better join Emily in
the room overhead?
I presume she will send for me when my
presence
shall be acceptable, replied Fleetwood,
walking
away and seating himself in one of the
luxurious
arm-chairs in the saloon.
Mr. Bettencourt followed, and with the amiable
intention of diverting him, drew a paper from his
pocket, and said: Have you seen last week's
Scorpion, sir? Capital paper! The only paper
in the city worth takingthat's a fact!
It will be time enough for the Scorpion, sir,
after I am married, replied Fleetwood, removing
to another seat.
Very goodvery good indeed! exclaimed
Bettencourt, after a pause, during which he seemed
endeavoring to discover the drift of the remark.
Devilish odd fellow, that Fleetwood! One would
imagine he thought it a confounded bore to get
married.
In the mean while Mr. Gordon could not disguise
his nervous, fretful and impatient mood, so
different
from that which was habitual with him. He
looked at his watch repeatedlywondered why
the clergyman didn't comeput his head out of the
window, and anxiously peered up and down the
streetand then paced the room, as if dreading he
knew not what. There was a violent ring at the
door-bell. He shuddered as if it was some fearful
summons; but was inexpressibly relieved when he
saw the Rev. Mr. Trope enter in all the amplitude
of his clerical attire. Mr. Gordon rushed forward
and took him by the handthen looked once more
at his watchsaw that it was twelve o'clockand
hurried up stairs to protest against the least delay
on the part of the bride and the bridesmaids. The
next moment a servant entered, and whispered in
Fleetwood's ear, that Miss Emily was expecting
him.
So soon? Well! I come, said he, rising and
moving with an air, significant of anything but a
joyful alacrity, towards the door.
An assemblage of some thirty ladies and about
that number of gentlemen had now gathered in the
large parlor adjoining the conservatory. They
were distributed in numerous groups about the
room, and the buzz of commingled voices was heard
on all sides.
At length Mr. Gordon was seen to enter rubbing
his hands with a sort of fidgetty satisfaction, and,
approaching the clergyman, to whisper in his ear.
The Rev. Mr. Trope immediately took his place
near the lofty mirror between the two windows
that led into the conservatory. Under the skilful
marshalling of Mr. Rodney, the company then
formed themselves in a semi-circle fronting the
mirror
,
leaving an opening in the middle of the arc for
the admission of the bridal party. They entered
Fleetwood and Miss Gordon first, arm in arm,
followed
by three groomsmen with as many
bridesmaids
,
all of whom had been, with admirable
fore-sight
,
provided for the occasion by the father of the
bride.
Who was ever so churlish as to refuse to admit
that a bride looked interesting?
But how very pale she is! said Miss Titter,
in reply to a remark made by Mr. Bettencourt.
Doesn't that wreath of orange blossoms become
her vastly?
Brides always look pale, and wreaths always
become them, said Mr. Bettencourt. By the
way, Miss Titter, do you ever read the Scorpion?
Capital paper that! Funny dogs, the editors must
be! There's a first-rate hit at Parson Trope in
the last numberwonder if he has seen it?have
a great mind to ask himhow it will make him
fume!
Well, for a bridegroom, I never saw a man
show so much nonchalance as Fleetwood, said
Miss Titter, who had been looking through her
eye-glass without attending to a word that her
companion had uttered. Look, Mr. Bettencourt!
What is all that? she continued, as she observed a
movement, which seemed to excite considerable
curiosity among the feminine spectators.
It was this. The parties to the ceremony were
about taking their places, and the clergyman had
drawn forth his book to read the marriage service,
when a colored servant, one of those employed by
the caterer, who had been engaged to furnish the
dejeuner a la fourchette
, glided from the
conservatory
,
making his way between two of the
bridesmaids
,
and placed a note in the hands of
Fleetwood
,
saying, at the same time, in a whisper
read it before the ceremony. The movement
was so rapid and so stealthy, that it was finished
before Mr. Gordon could well distinguish its
nature
.
But when the recognition came, the expression
of his face was terrible. He darted forward, and
snatched at the note, but failed in the attempt to
get it into his possession.
Fleetwood looked up amazed, and Gordon, with
a convulsive laugh, said: Wait awhile, my dear
boy. This is no time to read notes. It is
disrespectful
to the company.
Then the company must grant me their
indulgence
,
sir, said Fleetwood; and leaving his
position
by the bride, he moved towards the nearest
embrasure, and read the following words, written
in large and legible letters, though apparently in
furious haste: Come to your own room, at once
before the ceremonyunless you covet a life-time
of the keenest remorse that ever wrung a human
soul. It is of Adelaide I would speak. Dare you
hear the truth? Delay not a moment!
Staggered by this sudden communication,
Fleetwood
pressed his hand to his forehead as if to
collect
his thoughts; and then, crumpling the note in
his hand, he passed rapidly out of the room without
saying a word. The perspiration stood in big
drops upon Mr. Gordon's forehead, while he
watched his movements. He followed close upon
his heels, and, as the bridegroom started to ascend
the stairs, caught him by the arm.
What is it, Fleetwood? What is it, my dear
boy? he said, with an unsuccessful effort to
appear
unconcerned.
It matters notI will use such dispatch as I
may, replied Fleetwood, disengaging himself and
darting up the stairs.
Beware, sir! exclaimed Gordon, hardly
knowing
in his frenzy what he said. Beware, young
man! I have been trifled with long enough. If
this marriage is deferred again
Fleetwood checked himself, and folding his arms,
descended, step by step, till he confronted Gordon.
Well sir, and what then? he demanded with
a freezing
hauteur
.
Beware, sir! I only say, beware!
A parrot can say as much, sir. I see nothing
so wonderful in that. Look you, Mr. Gordon! If
all hell were to cry
beware
, it could not withhold
me, when honor cried
go on!
And without more words, Fleetwood ascended
the stairs to his own room.
CHAPTER XXII.
You have displac'd the mirth, broke the good meeting,
With most admir'd disorder.
Shakespeare
.
The
guilty see in every bush an officer; and
Mr. Gordon had a vague fear that the note, placed
in Fleetwood's hand, had reference to the
disclosure
which he had been so anxiously guarding
against for some weeks past. But still he might be
mistaken in his surmises; and so returning to the
parlor, he asked the clergyman's pardon for the
interruption
said
that the bridegroom would return
in a momentand mingled among his guests,
trying
in a sort of desperation to escape from his fears.
The bride and her companions took seats; and an
attempt was made to get up a little conversation to
relieve the awkwardness of the scene. The
bridesmaids looked at one another, as much as to
say, Did you ever know such a dismal
wedding
?and
the groomsmen pulled off their kid
gloves, indulged in sidelong glances at the mirror,
and then with a grave, self-satisfied air bent over
to whisper to the ladies. Mr. Bettencourt, after
some modest misgivings, approached the Rev. Mr.
Trope, with the view of delicately broaching the
subject of last week's Scorpion. Glenham stood
alone and apart in a corner of the room, quivering
with agitation, and anxiously regarding the
countenance
of the host.
At length the door was thrown open by a
servant
as if for the entrance of an important person
in the little drama. All eyes were immediately
turned towards the spot; and the bridesmaids rose,
expecting to see the groom. But it was not he,
who entered. It was Count La Salle. He was
pale, and the perpendicular furrows between his
eyes were deepened so as to give a frowning
expression
to his face; but he advanced with an air
of serene good-breeding into the room, and bowing,
while he held his hat in his hand, said: Ladies
and gentlemen! I am requested by Mr. Fleetwood
to inform you, that unhappy circumstances,
throwing
no blame, however, upon the lady, have been
brought to light, which must prevent his marriage
with Miss Gordon.
It is a liea trick! shouted the wretched
father
,
finding that the steps he thought he had
ascended to the summit were slipping from under
him.
Oh, sir, here you are! said the Count,
sarcastically
,
while he approached Mr. Gordon. If I
mistake not, I have some little favors to thank you
for. I was knocked down by bullies a month or
two since while loitering in the neighborhood of
your house to meet Mr. Fleetwood, your servants
having denied me admission. I was confined to
my bed for weeks in consequence of the injuries I
then received. But this is not all. I addressed
certain letters to Mr. Fleetwood. Perhaps you can
tell who opened, read and destroyed them, without
delivering them to the owner. I was on Tuesday
lured on board one of the Liverpool packets at the
Hook, in the expectation of meeting a friendthe
steamboat which brought me, made off while I was
in the cabin of the ship, and I found myself on the
way to England. Fortunately a pilot-boat came
along, and I was released. Perhaps, you can
explain
this little accident. For these and other
agreeable favors, account me your debtor.
This is an impostor, ladies and gentlemen!
exclaimed Gordon, absolutely foaming with rage.
I can prove that he made an attempt not long
since to pass himself off as a different person from
what he now pretends to be. He is an impostor;
and I call upon you, gentlemen, to assist me in
arresting
him. Where is Glenham? He can testify
to the truth of what I assert. Glenham, come
forward
!
Ever since the Count's entrance into the room,
Mr. Glenham had been moving stealthily towards
the door, with the view of making a precipitate exit
unobserved. Much to his consternation, however,
La Salle had suddenly caught sight of him, and
thenceforth divided his glances between him and
his senior accomplice.
Ay, I would like to hear what Mr. Glenham
has to say, exclaimed the Count in reply to the
frantic menaces of the master of the house.
Mr. Gordon must be under a mistake, said
Glenham, who dreaded the Count far more than he
did any one else in the room. I can testify to
nothing prejudicial to this gentleman. There must
be some mistake.
Why, thou double traitor! exclaimed La
Salle, pointing at him scornfully with his
fore-finger
protruded. You know that there is
no
mistake
that
what he says is true.
You hear, ladies and gentlemenhe himself
confesses! exclaimed Mr. Gordon, stunned by
Glenham's defection, and hardly knowing what he
said.
But he has not confessed
all
, sir? There is a
sequel, which concerns yourself and thisshall I
call him
gentleman?
no
craven!
La Salle paused, and drawing himself up with
dignity, looked about, scanning the faces of the
company, till his eyes fell on Emily. She was
sitting
in a high-backed chair, supported on either side
by her bridesmaids, her face of a deadly paleness,
and her bosom heaving violently with the anguish,
10
to which she was evidently a prey. This
spectacle
seemed to produce a sudden change in his
feelings
and intentions. An expression of tenderness
played about his mouth. He turned to Gordon,
and said: These are matters, which had better
be discussed in private. I will select a fitter
opportunity
for what I have to say. I need not
inform
you of my address. You have had occasion
to acquaint yourself with it already.
And then, turning to the company, he added:
Ladies and gentlemen, it is due to you that I
should express my regretand I do so most
sincerely
that
I have been obliged to disturb this festive
meeting by making disclosures to Mr. Fleetwood
of a nature the most painful. These disclosures, I
repeat it, do not in any manner reflect upon Miss
Gordon. What they are, you perhaps may never
knowbut I beg you to take my assurance, that
they are of such a character, that neither could I in
honor refrain from imparting them, nor Mr.
Fleetwood
from acting as he has acted on receiving
them. With this explanation I respectfully take my
leave.
There was a long pause as La Salle quitted the
room, unbroken save by the difficult panting of
Emily, who was struggling against a fainting fit.
Suddenly Mr. Gordon who had been looking at
Glenham till that young gentleman seemed to think
it would be a pleasant relief to be rolling down hill
in a cask of spikes like Regulus, started, and
turning
to his guests, exclaimed:
Come, since we are not going to have a
wedding
,
let us have a feast at any rate. Let us adjourn
to the dining-room. Mr. Glenham, hand in one of the
ladies. Mr. Bettencourt, I am sure a little
champagne
can do you no harm. Suppose you persuade
Miss Titter to accompany you. Mr. Rodney, let
me see you lead the way with my fair cousin on
your left; and Mr. Trope, you and I will bring up
the rear. Emily, my dear, I am glad to see you
are recovering. We will give you five minutes
longer to get over this little agitation, which, under
the circumstances, is quite natural.
Emily made a gesture of acquiescence, and the
company left the apartment.
I saywhat would the editors of the Scorpion
give to get an inkling of this business? whispered
Mr. Bettencourt in the ear of his fair companion,
as they passed out with the rest of the bridal party.
Emily remained alone, lost in conjecture as to
the nature of those dreaded disclosures, to which
La Salle had alluded so mysteriously, and which
had sent Fleetwood forth at such a moment so
abruptly, removing forever the prospect of their
union.
CHAPTER XXIII.
The brave, the gentle and the beautiful,
The child of grace and genius!
Shelley
.
Mr. Dryman to Mr. Fleetwood
.
My Dear Sir
:At the request of the
gentleman
,
who will hand you this letter, and in
conformity
with my own duties as the protector of the
interests of my client, I have carefully investigated
circumstances in the history of a young lady known
to you under the name of Adelaide Winfield. I
have ascertained, and can satisfactorily establish,
that she is the legitimate daughter of the late
Edward
Challoner, and that in her mother's right,
who was a daughter of the late John Gordon, Esq.,
she is heiress to a considerable property. The
incidents
,
which led to the concealment of her real
name and history, are simply these: her father
died suddenly, leaving his wife with her unborn
child in humble lodgings, the very locality of
which was unknown save to two or three persons.
She had been discarded by her parents in
consequence
of her marriage, and knew of no one to
whom to apply for relief. An old servant named
Jenny was her only attendant. In the midst of
her distress, and while in the very pangs of
child-birth
,
which had been hastened by the sudden
communication
of the news of her husband's death, a
woman named Winfield called upon her, and
charitably ministered to her wants. The mother
hardly lived to thank her for her kindness,
however
,
but died in giving birth to a female child.
The witnesses to the identity of this child with the
young lady known to you as Adelaide Winfield,
are Mrs. Winfield, the woman Jenny, and Dr.
Brisk, who had accidentally been called in to the
accouchement
, as the nearest physician. In addition
to these there are collateral proofs, which place the
fact of the identity beyond a cavil.
I wish, for the honor of human nature, that I
might stop here in my narrative, and not be
compelled
to unravel the conspiracies which have been
formed against the freedom and welfare of this
young girl. It appears that Mrs. Winfield, having
received intelligence of the death of a daughter of
her own, suddenly formed the determination to
claim and adopt the infant thus suddenly left an
orphan. By heavy bribes she induced the woman
Jenny and the aforementioned Dr. Brisk to conceal
the real name and history of the late Mrs.
Challoner
.
At the coroner's inquest a different name was
mentioned; and, in consequence, the family of the
deceased were kept in ignorance of her fate; and
her father, in his dying moments, overcome with
remorse, left a clause in his will by which a third
of his immense property was to be retained for
eighteen years in the hands of trustees for the
benefit
of his missing daughter, or her child. If, at
the end of that time, no intelligence of either had
been gathered, then the property was to revert to
the other heirs. It now wants but a day of the
expiration of the trusteeship.
Not many years after the death of his father, the
present Mr. Gordon was satisfied of the validity of
the claims of the aforementioned Adelaide, as
inheritress
of the property, which was rapidly
accumulating
under the frugal management of prudent
trustees
.
But instead of manfully promulgating those
claims, he entered into a league with Mrs. Winfield
to keep the girl Adelaide in ignorance of her true
prospects and position, with the view of ultimately
enjoying her wealth. In furtherance of this object,
various plots and counterplots have been entered
into by both parties, each distrusting the other in
turn, and yet being all the while so held by the
other, as to be afraid of coming to an open rupture.
On hearing of the occurrences at Soundside, in
which you were an actor, Mrs. Winfield took the
alarm and went immediately to remove Adelaide,
whom she claimed as a daughter, to her own house
in the city. In the village she encountered an
acquaintance
in the person of Mr. Glenham.
Adelaide
,
true to her promises to yourself, refused to
accompany her mother (as she supposed her to be)
to the city. Fraud was then resorted to, and it
was successful. A letter bearing your signature
was forged, by which Adelaide was made to
believe
that it was your pleasure she should place
herself under the protection of Mrs. Winfield.
They came to the city; and here a new and
important
agent in the plot appeared in the person of
Mr. Gordon. This man seems to have set his
heart on two objects. One was to prevent any
knowledge of the existence of his niece coming to
the ears of the trustees of her property; and the
other was to marry you to his daughter. To
accomplish
these objects no means seem to have been
regarded by him as too base.
You must remember the night of the
thunderstorm
,
when Count La Salle, on entering the
parlor
at Mr. Gordon's found Emily in your arms, and,
in a paroxysm of jealousy, took leave of you both.
In an evil moment he was tempted to wound you
in the same way that he believed you had
wantonly
wounded him. He was told that you were
deeply enamored of Adelaide, at the same time that
you spurned the idea of marrying her. The
scheme, of which you were the victim, was
proposed
to him on the ground that it would save the
young girl from your snares as well as punish you
justly for the wrong you had done
him
. He
consented
to pass himself off, before
you
, as the
fortunate
lover of Adelaide, and before
herself
as her
brother. The success of the imposition was
complete
.
Had you paused but an instant before
jumping
to a conclusion, and heard Adelaide's
exclamation
of brother Ernest! as she rushed to his
embrace
,
you might have been undeceived; but the
shock overwhelmed you, and the plot was managed
by the contrivers with diabolical skill.
You will already have seen how important the
agency of Mr. Glenham has been throughout in
this conspiracy against the peace and welfare of a
young, innocent and noble-minded girl. It was he,
who lured her from Soundside by his vile forgery
it was he who suggested the plot by which you
were to be made to believe she had been
unfaithful
it
was he, who baffled, by his
falsehoods within
falsehoods
and his cowardly intrigues, the repeated
attempts of Count La Salle to enlighten you as to
the imposture that had been practised, or to
communicate
to Adelaide all that he knew and all that
he suspected.
But it seems that traitors cannot be true even to
one another. While Mr. Gordon was counting
upon the zealous co-operation of his accomplices,
Glenham and Mrs. Winfield, these two were
contriving
how they could best subserve their own
interests
apart from his. From prudential
considerations
Gordon had always deferred pledging
himself
in any manner by written agreements to
compensate
Mrs. Winfield in the event of the reversion
of Adelaide's property to himself. But in Glenham
she found a person not quite so wary and careful.
He did not scruple to pledge himself both by
written
and spoken oaths to give her one half the
property
,
which would come under his control on his
union with Adelaide. These calculations were
utterly
baffled by Adelaide, who not only refused to
listen to his proposals, but fled from the protection
which he proffered, as well in the name of
friendship
as of love.
I need not add more except that Mrs. Winfield
has made a full confession of her entire connexion
with this painful and extraordinary affair; and that
she now seems truly penitent. The woman Jenny
and Dr. Brisk have also both made confessions,
which confirm the story I have related, in many of
its important particulars. Count La Salle will
himself
communicate what must satisfy you, were all
other testimony wanting, that you have been the
victim of the most inhuman deception, and that
Adelaide Challoner is innocent and pure. It is
proper that I should mention that I have
communicated
to the trustees of her property the fact of her
existence, and that measures have been already
taken to substantiate her claims. I hardly think
they will be disputed, inasmuch as it can be proved
that the present Mr. Gordon has admitted them
fully.
Hoping, my dear sir, that the young lady may
recover speedily from her present serious
indisposition
,
and that all happiness may be in store for
her and you, I am,
Yours, faithfully,
Littleton Dryman
.
CHAPTER XXIV.
But there was round thee such a dawn
Of light ne'er seen before,
As Fancy never could have drawn,
And never can restore.
Wolfe
.
The
sunshine of a clear autumnal afternoon was
streaming in at the western windows of the
apartment
where we left Adelaide in conversation with
Mrs. Rugby. There had been little apparent
change in the arrangements of this room, save that
a bountiful supply of fresh flowers in vases adorned
the tables and the mantel-piece. A cage
containing
a mocking-bird hung over the window-sill, and,
though the door was open, the little prisoner seemed
to prefer remaining where he was. His loud,
varying
notes, caught from the melodies of a southern
forestthe sunshine turning to amber the white
curtains that shook in the soft, elastic breezethe
sight and odor of flowersand the green branches
in the fire-place, all gave an aspect and a tone of
cheerfulness to the place, which made one forget
he was in the midst of a dusty, populous metropolis,
where there were almost as many breaking hearts
and aching heads as green leaves.
And yet, on the unopened coverlid of the bed,
Adelaide lay an invalid, lost at the moment in a
tranquil sleep. She wore a white morning robe,
and was supported, in a half-sitting, half-supine
posture, by pillows. By her side stood Florinda,
with a fan to keep off the flies. Words cannot
paint the look of adoring affection and tenderness
with which this child regarded the sleeper. There
was but one person more in the roomthe
grandmother
;
10*
who sat quietly sewing by the window,
occasionally turning to look at the face of the
invalid
,
and then, with a suppressed sigh, resuming
her work.
Suddenly Adelaide opened her eyes, and smiled
on seeing Florinda. Then lowering her glance, as
if in the act of concentrating her thoughts, she
asked:
Is it not almost time that he should be here?
Not yet, my dearyou have hardly slept half
an hour, said Mrs. Rugby, pausing a moment, and
then plying her needle with renewed activity.
What, Florinda! Tears again! Naughty
one! exclaimed Adelaide, stooping forward, and
wiping from the child's face the fluid signs of grief.
Why do you weep?
Sweet lady, dear lady, do not ask me.
But I insist on knowing why you weep. Tell
me, my own little Florinda, tell me!
It is because I so dread the thought of your
leaving us.
Is that all, little Bayadere? Why, you ought,
then, to be all the more delighted while I stay.
Come, not another tear! I shall get in a passion
by and by.
And with a playful imperativeness of manner,
Adelaide kissed away her tears till the child
laughed
under her influence.
Suddenly Adelaide checked herself, put her
fore-finger
to her lips, as if to enjoin silence, and changed
the position of her small and delicately-slippered
feet, till they almost touched the floor. Then
starting
from the bed, she exclaimed:
It is he! I know his footstep! She glided
swiftly towards the door, opened it, and was
clasped
in Fleetwood's embrace.
They entered the room, with arms locked about
each other as they walked, and eyes gazing intently
in each other's face. Each saw the changethe
sad, yet endearing changein the other, and tears
came gratefully to the relief of each.
Miserable dupe that I have been! groaned
Fleetwood, kissing the pallid forehead, which
seemed
to invite his lips. How wretchedly have I
been deluded! Can youcan you forgive me
angel of goodness and of love?
All is understood, replied Adelaide. All
that was unpleasant, forgottenall that was sweet,
remembered.
Oh, maledictions on the wretches, who
The grief that overpowered Fleetwood choked
his utterance. He sank into a chaircovered his
face with his handsand gave way to a burst of
grief, which shook his frame as if with a convulsion.
He wept like a child.
Adelaide rested herself lightly on his knee, gently
struggled to remove his hands, then soothingly
thrust her fingers through the locks that fell over
his temples, and besought him to be calm.
Think not of those who have wronged us, she
said; they deserve our pity, and of course our
forgiveness. Do you remember the reply of the
poet to his critic?
`I hate thy want of truth and love,
How
can
I then hate
thee?
'
We should all regard our enemies in this spirit.
In that they are our enemies, or the enemies of any
human being, they deserve our commiseration, not
our vengeance.
Dear Adelaide, you are weakyou are pale
I fear that you have sufferedthat you still suffer
much. But you will recoverO, say that you
will recovergive me that blessed assurancegive
me at least a hope!
There is nothing in death that awes me but the
thought of leaving you, dearhusband, said
Adelaide
,
with a slight pause in her voice before she
uttered the last word. Fleetwood lifted her hand
to his lips, and pressed it silently. Nay, I am
wrong, resumed Adelaide, turning to Florinda and
her grandmother; here are two who will miss
me, and to part with whom will cause a pang.
But, dear friends, be cheerful! It is thus that I
would welcome deathwith flowers, and sunshine,
and musicwith green leaves and floral odors
with happy voices and with smiles. They do
wrong, who dress his altar with weeds of woand
who salute him, on his approach, with
lamentations
;
for does he not conduct us to a nobler and
a happier life? Therefore may the dead be rather
called the living than we who linger on this shore
of time, fettered by material obstructionsby
disease
and pain. O, in our happiest estate, death
should ever be welcome!
You will rive my heart with these words, said
Fleetwood despairingly. O, live, live, at least
long enough for me to make amends for my
dreadful
injustice!
You shall not accuse yourself, said Adelaide.
As you loved me, how could you have acted
differently
?
Ah, my husband, it was a sweet dream,
though passing brief! Do you remember that
rocky ledge on the sea-shore, where we first met,
while the big waves rolled up their smooth, flashing
undulations to my horse's feet? Should you ever
revisit the place, you will love it for my sake.
Ah, why will you thus try to shut out all hope
from my heart? exclaimed Fleetwood.
Could any hope be so sweet as that of our
reunion
hereafter? asked Adelaide. With me the
conviction that we shall meet againmeet happily
is interwoven with my spiritual being. Do you
wonder then, that I am content? But I have some
commissions for you, dear husband; and you must
expect a rebuke from me if you do not fulfil them.
This child, Florinda, whom you seeand here
Adelaide sank her voice to a whisperwill soon
be left an orphan. It was my intention to provide
for her liberallyto protect her as if she were my
own sister. Alas! I know what it is to be an
orphan
!
I leave her, my husband, to your care.
She has a brother. You will look after him also.
O, indulge no more in these melancholy
anticipations
,
sighed Fleetwood. You shall live,
Adelaide
,
to scatter blessings with your own hand.
Approach, Florinda, said Adelaide, feebly
casting her eyes over her shoulders, as she lay in
Fleetwood's arms.
The child drew near, and Adelaide, taking her
little hand, placed it in that of Fleetwood, and said:
For my sake, you must love each other.
Fleetwood returned the pressure of the child's
hand in silent anguish.
Do you remember Cossackmy old dog,
Cossack
?
asked Adelaide abruptly, as if to divert the
sadness of both. Well, you must give him to
Charley Romainethat's Florinda's brotherto
take care of.
Ah, it will be time enough years hence for
bequests
like these, said Fleetwood.
Bear with me if I am over-provident, replied
Adelaide. There is poor La SalleI have been
much concerned on his account. Pray assure him
of my entire forgiveness, and tell him you heard
me say that I wished he were indeed my brother
and give him, in token of my good will, a gold
mounted riding-whip, inscribed with my name,
which you will find in one of my trunksMr.
Dryman
will tell you where.
You are exhaustedyou need repose! said
Fleetwood, pressing her as if she were an infant in
his arms.
The Gordons, FleetwoodI would say
something
of
them
, continued Adelaide. Do what is
best to rescue the father from those pecuniary
difficulties
that have driven him to deeds, which, in
his better moments, he must bitterly deplore. And
as for Emilycousin Emily, I must call her now
Mr. Dryman will tell you how I have remembered
her. What others are there, of whom we should
be thoughtful? I have already, through Mr.
Dryman
,
sent such messages to Mrs. Winfield as I
think must give her consolation; and I have
provided
a modest competence for some of my
protegs
,
a German family among the rest. All that I
ask of you in regard to Glenham is, that should you
ever have an opportunity of doing him a benefit,
you will not neglect it. I do not require a promise.
I but make the request.
I pray you now take a little repose, Adelaide,
said Fleetwood, with a trembling voice. You
have fatigued yourself with talking.
In one moment you shall be obeyed, my
husband
,
said Adelaide; and then turning to the child,
who sat weeping at her feet, she feebly murmured:
Come here, little Fanny Elssler the Younger: I
have something to say to you in private. Bring
your ear nearer my lips. It is bad manners to
whisper in company, but I must be indulged this
once.
And for nearly five minutes, Adelaide addressed
the child in a whisper audible to her alone.
Florinda
listened with an air of rapt attention, glancing
occasionally at Fleetwood, and then looking down
as if in thought. Adelaide, in concluding, kissed
her affectionately, and calling Mrs. Rugby, said:
You, who have been all to me that a mother could
be, and who, in your humble and contemned sphere,
have shown a heart so rich in all the good
affections
take
a chair near me now, and we will have
music. Why is our mocking-bird so quiet all at
once? Go, Florinda, and tell Minnie to come with
the harp, and let her bring her sister and the dear
children. I love to see their bright, contented
faces. And now, my husband, you shall not have
to urge me longer to take repose. One kiss more!
Raise the curtain, Mrs. Rugby! While we are
sitting before the window, we may as well enjoy
the beautiful sunset. There! Is it not lovely
beyond
a painter's conception, dear Fleetwood? And
the riverhow the fresh breeze plays with its
crimsoned waters, as it sweeps onon in its
perpetual
flow to the great ocean! I always loved to
look on flowing waterI know not why. But
here come Minnie and the rest with the harp.
Now, my husband, fix me comfortably in your lap,
and let your arms clasp me about as if I were a
child; for truly I feel like one, lying thus, my head
against your breast. Another kiss! There!
Good evening, Minnie! Good evening, Estelle!
And good evening, children all! Now, Minnie,
the old tunesyou know what I mean.
The children stood hand in hand, quiet and grave
spectators of the scene; and Minnie played the
tunes which she knew Adelaide loved to hear as
associated with the memories of her early days.
At the close of the music, Adelaide raised her head,
and said, in German: And now, Minnie, play the
tune I taught you. And then, after claiming
another
kiss from Fleetwood, she again closed her
eyes and nestled her head against his breast.
Fleetwood started. That tunewhere had he
heard it before? Yes, it was the same he had set
to the little song in honor of Adelaide. which he
had sung on the night of the serenade. With
pleased surprise he followed the air to its close.
As it ended, the deepest silence prevailed in the
room. Suddenly the mocking-bird poured forth a
rich, exulting melody, so shrill and loud that all
were startled and looked up to the cage; and then,
as if he had but wished to call attention to the fact
of his emancipation, the winged chorister flew out
of the window, and up, up into the sky, till he was
lost from view.
Turning to the sweet burthen he held in his arms,
Fleetwood saw a smile of the serenest beauty upon
the lips of Adelaide Challoner. He bowed his head
to feel her breath against his cheeks. Alas, no
breath came! Her gentle spirit had fled.
CHAPTER XXV.
Can I then love the air she loved?
Can I then hear the melting strain
Which brings her to my soul again,
Calm and unmoved?
And thou to blame my tears forbear;
For while I list, sweet maid! to thee,
Remembrance whispers, such was she!
And she iswhere?
Dale
.
Mrs. Davenant in Paris to a friend in New York
.
Dear Madeline
:We have returned north,
you see, with the return of warm weather, and
here we are once more in the great metropolis of
fashion and philosophy, of gayety and science, of
revolutions and of arts. It is still the same
delightful
Pariswith much to admire and reprove, to
fascinate and offendan epitome of the world and
an emblem of life itself, where you can partake of
the influences of all that is most base and all that
is most elevating in the institutions of man.
But I will come to that subject, about which I
know you will feel most concern, my health.
Rest content then, dear Madeline, for know that it
has much improved since I wrote you from
Leghorn
.
I was well enough last Wednesday to
accompany
Mr. Davenant and Florinda to the annual
festivities at Longchamps. The weather was
gratefully mildso much so that we rode in an
open carriage all the way. Florinda was as usual
dreadfully stared at; and young men on horseback
were continually riding by our carriage, obviously
to get a sight at her.
You ask me, by the way, if the stories which
Mrs. W. brought you from Italy in relation to my
young charge are not exaggerated. I know not
what those stories were, but can imagine that they
may have seemed to you very extravagant and yet
have been true. It is now some five years since
Florinda was placed under my protection by
my son-in-law's unfortunate friend, Fleetwood. I
was, at the time, about visiting Europe.
Fleetwood
wished to cross the Atlantic in the same
ship; and I cheerfully consented to take his little
protge
under my care. She had recently lost her
only remaining female relative. She seemed about
ten years old. I have understood that she was of
humble parentageboth her father and mother
having been public performers at the theatre. But
there are traces of gentle blood in her, more
conclusive
than family pedigrees. Her ancles, feet and
hands are exquisitely symmetrical; her figure is
perfect, and her temper angelic.
Florinda has a handsome annuity secured to her
by the will of Fleetwood's short-lived lady-love,
whose history you know. The bulk of Miss
Challoner's
immense property was, you may remember,
left to Fleetwood himself; but, after adding to
some of the legacies, which Miss Challoner had
made, he transferred it to the Gordon family; and,
I am told, it came very opportunely to lift them to
affluence from threatened bankruptcy.
You ask me for some description of Florinda. I
will not attempt it, for I am sure I should fail. I
will only say, she is strangely beautiful. Until her
fourteenth year, she was pretty constantly in the
society of Fleetwood, who guided her in her studies,
and imbued her with many of his own tastes and
views. I have noticed that the pursuits in which
she excels are precisely those to which he was
most attached. She is the most consummate
artiste
in all the minor as well as the higher
embellishments
of life. She exhibits an original and a truly
admirable taste in dress, which is allowed to be
so superior, that by the tacit consent of the
Parisians
,
young as she is and unmarried, she now fixes
the standard for the season. She has made the
fortunes of several poor dress-makers, whom she
has chosen to employ; and yet her modes have
this peculiarity, which renders them unpopular
save with the few beautiful women, who here sway
the fashions: they are so severely simple that they
are adapted only to the most elegant persons. But
Florinda pleases herself; and seems indifferent to
the sceptre, which has been confided to her. I
have heard of threats of
disembarrassment
among
the fashionable
modistes
, who find themselves all at
once shorn of their importance. Do you know
what the term means? You are said to
disembarrass
yourself when you kill off by poison an
individual
,
who incommodes or displeases you. A dainty
phraseis it not?
I have said that Florinda was pretty constantly
in the society of Fleetwood, from the time I became
acquainted with her till her fourteenth year. He
then left us for the east, and we have not seen him
since. The settled melancholy, to which he was
a prey after Miss Challoner's death, hardly seemed
to have abated at the period of his departure.
What travel and time may have done for him I
cannot say. His chief solace used to be in
superintending
the education of Florinda; and he was
accustomed to take long rides with her on
horse-back
,
which I think were advantageous to the
health of both. Suddenly he appeared to avoid
the child's society as much as he had coveted it
Whether anything had occurred to prejudice him
against her I cannot say. I have my suspicion,
however. It is this: He saw that Florinda, child
though she was, was becoming altogether too much
interested in himin short, that she threatened to
be in love. Indeed, from the earliest time that I
saw them together, I was struck by the constant
effort on her part to divert his melancholy, and
engage his attention. She had no eyes for any
one else while he was in the roomno ears for
any one while he was speaking. She would
anticipate
his slightest wishes by his looks, and show
an anxiety to please, which he at first placed to
the account of childish affection and gratitude, but
which he afterwards, I suspect, attributed to causes
more calculated to awaken his solicitude.
There are other circumstances, which I can now
call to remembrance, which go to confirm my
suspicion
.
For a month or two after Fleetwood's
departure, I recollect that Florinda visibly failed
in health and in spirits. She became pale, reserved
and thoughtful, and lost all that vivacity, that
earnestness
of disposition, which is perhaps her most
winning charm. At length she roused from this
depressionapplied herself with redoubled ardor
to her studies, and acquiesced in all that I proposed
for her amusement or instruction. Two seasons
since I introduced her into society. Her beauty,
her figure, and that enchanting grace which marks
all her movements, caught perhaps from her early
practice as a
danseuse
, made her at once an object
of extraordinary attraction. Her
conquests
have
been numerous, and of the most brilliant
description
.
But she has never
stooped
to conquer. She
seems to shrink from the admiration which courts
her. She is a perfect enigma both to the women
and the men.
I think I have hit upon the solution. How else
should it be that, at her age, she should pass
unscathed
,
with such decorum and statue-like
propriety
,
through the gay and tempting scenes, the
bewildering allurements, to which she is subjected?
How should it be that she should receive unmoved,
save perhaps by an emotion of pity, the passionate
devotion of the most accomplished, elegant and
distinguished
young men in Paris? Her heart's
palladium
,
I am convinced, is a previous attachment
a strong, enduring and irreversible one. I tremble
for her future when I ask myselfis there any
likelihood that it will ever be returned?
We received a letter from Fleetwood about a
week since, under the date of Constantinople. He
writes that he shall be in Paris before Juneand
the roses in our garden are already in bloom! The
color fled from Florinda's cheeks as I announced
the news. Her agitation was so violent that I
feared she would faint. I pretended not to notice
her, and she gradually recovered firmness enough
to remark: Mr. Fleetwood has been absent a
long, long while!
Fleetwood cannot but be amazed at the change
in his pupil's appearance. He left her a puny
though lovely girl. He will find her in the full
bloom of womanhoodwith a figure developed to
the proportions of the most consummate beauty
to which all the graces seem to lend their zone
by turnsa face that would charm an anchorite,
and give him purer dreams of heaven while it
charmeda voice, that, in its commonest tones, is
musicand, better than all, a heart
Dearer than Plutus' mine, richer than gold!
He will find her surrounded by all that can distract
the young and the healthycourted, flattered and
caressedreceiving the homage of the gifted, the
noble and the proudand yet, amid all these
fascinations
,
retaining, as I am persuaded, his image
enshrined in her soul as its dearest and paramount
human object of veneration and love.
I have ordered his old apartment in our hotel to
be made ready. We are hourly expecting his
arrival. He will come; but will he still turn with
dismay from the danger of awakening in this young
girl an attachment to which he cannot respond?
He has suffered much. He is alone in the world,
without a relative. There are circumstances which
should endear Florinda to him forever. Did they
not exist, he might well be proud of her preference.
You will smile, dear Madeline, to see that I, who
have inveighed so often against meddlesome
matchmakers
,
am in danger of becoming one myself.
But is not this a case wherein I might exert some
influence, and venture upon some management,
with propriety? I am full of anxiety on Florinda's
account; and my concern for Fleetwood is not less
lively. Can it be that he will shun the matrimonial
haven, where he cannot fail to find happiness after
his wanderings and his griefs? I have no facts on
which to base my calculations as to his present
intentions
and dispositions. Whether he is still
sorrowing, or whether activity has allured
cheerfulness
to join its train, I cannot say. But be
assured
,
if my influence can avail, it shall not be
wanting
to bring about a result which, according to my
notions of the fitness of things, ought to be among
the pre-arranged adjudications of that place where,
I can readily believe,
some
matches, at least, are
made.
THE END.My dear Adelaide
:
You were decidedly right in resisting your
mother's importunities to leave Soundside until you
had heard from me. I shall not forget such a proof
of your attachment and fidelity. My business here
is of that importance that I cannot possibly quit the
city till Friday afternoon. Otherwise I would
most gladly fly to you at once. Under these
circumstances
,
and since your mother is so
exceedingly
anxious to have you accompany her, I do not
see but that we had better yield to her wishes.
Our marriage can as well take place here as at
Soundside; and I see no good reason why it should
be deferred beyond the period we originally fixed.
Present my respects to your mother, and tell her
that for her daughter's sake she shall be dear.
Should you see Glenham, remember me to him
kindly. I owe him much. Poor fellow! he has
cause to envy me your affection; but I know that
he is incapable of any such passion. Apply to him
unreservedly, should you have occasion for friendly
and discreet advice. Let me know you mother's
address, that I may call as soon as you reach the
city. I am compelled to write in haste, as I only
received your letter a few minutes since, and mine
will miss the mail if I delay even to tell you with
how much sincerity and love,
I am ever yours, dear Adelaide,
Frederick Fleetwood
.